Weeknights, 8-10pm ET Anderson Cooper goes beyond the headlines to tell stories from many points of view, so you can make up your own mind about the news.
By Kyung Lah and Stephanie Becker, CNN Updated 12:10 PM ET, Sat September 30, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)The scene is terrifying -- entire sections of a Mexico City office building fall away and crash to the ground. The screams of people reacting are almost worse. (CNN)The scene is terrifying -- entire sections of a Mexico City office building fall away and crash to the ground. The screams of people reacting are almost worse. That moment, captured on cellphone video, shows just one of a number of buildings, from apartments to schools to governmental offices, that collapsed during the 7.1 magnitude quake that hit Mexico on September 19. "I've seen that video," says Mark Schlaich, vice president of engineering at Los Angeles-based Alpha Structural Inc. "It's what we're trying to prevent here." Schlaich waves at the central Los Angeles multistory apartment complex he's standing under, a pre-1978 wood-frame soft-story building -- so-called because the first story is substantially weaker and more flexible than the stories above it, lacking walls or frames at the street level, usually reserved for parking spaces. Alpha Structural is retrofitting the apartment complex's ground floor, installing much thicker steel beams and columns, rebar and heavier plywood. Mexico City's numerous building collapses were a stark reminder of what's to come in California. "Every 20-25 years, Los Angeles has been hit by a major earthquake," says Schlaich. It has been 23 years since the 6.7 magnitude Northridge earthquake hit the city in 1994. "Statistically, it's coming." Reducing the number of buildings that might collapse In a 2008 study, the US Geological Survey found there's a greater than 99% chance of a 6.7 magnitude quake or larger hitting the California area over the next 30 years. That type of quake along the San Andreas Fault in Southern California could kill an estimated 1,800 people, the study said, injure 53,000 and result in $214 billion in damage. California's infrastructure could be crippled for weeks, if not months. In a stark recognition of those numbers, in October 2015, Los Angeles enacted the nation's most sweeping seismic regulations, requiring about 14,000 buildings to be retrofitted so they will withstand violent shaking. The apartment building Alpha Structural is retrofitting is one of those city-identified vulnerable buildings. Schlaich points to a new steel column next to a clearly smaller, older column. The steel column goes 5 feet into the ground, plus 2 feet of additional concrete below it. "This column keeps the people alive, so the building won't collapse," explains Schaich. The only problem with the retrofitting in Los Angeles, say seismologists, is the expensive process is happening too slowly, expected to be complete in 2022. In San Francisco, a similar city law for retrofitting soft-story buildings was enacted in 2013. Rolling out in four phases, San Francisco has seen compliance at near 99% for phase one and two, and above 85% for phase three, says Bill Strawn, spokesman for San Francisco's Department of Building Inspection. The fourth and last phase of retrofitting the city's soft-story buildings wraps in September 2018. Strawn says once complete, the building collapse rate substantially improves in San Francisco. "We go from an estimated 1 in 4 collapse rate of these nonretrofitted buildings during a quake to 1 in 30. And that's with minimal retrofitting," says Strawn. The 2008 study estimating damage at $214 billion was based on the state of buildings at that time, and efforts to retrofit buildings at the city level "undoubtedly change the statewide damage estimates," says geophysicist Doug Given, who serves as the earthquake early warning coordinator for USGS. Developing an early warning system There is another tool that would save lives and reduce costs in an earthquake, one that Given calls "a no-brainer." The Earthquake Early Warning system, as it's called, is the best available technology to give seconds' -- at times, minutes' -- notice that an earthquake is coming. It would use seismometers buried underground to detect shaking crucial moments before it's perceptible in all the areas that will experience the quake, and sensors distributed across the West Coast capture the data in real time. The most beneficial part of those 30-60 seconds, says CalTech engineering and seismology professor Tom Heaton, is simply the heads-up. Children can get under desks or move to safer areas of the school. Surgery can stop. Trains can come to a halt. "This system is to provide as much information as is possible so you can make the best decisions during the earthquake," says Heaton. In the Mexico City quake, the early alert system warned people up to 30 seconds in advance that an earthquake was about to hit, allowing them to flee vulnerable buildings or move to safer areas. Mexico put its robust warning system into place after nearly 5,000 people died in the 1985 Mexico City quake. An early warning system has also been in place in Japan for decades. Today, cellphones and school alarms ring in unison when a quake is about to hit, a high-tech system installed after the Kobe earthquake in 1995. But in the United States, the early warning system is in development, stalled due to federal funding constraints. USGS says only 40% of the necessary sensors for the EEW system are in the ground. Hurdles stand in the way "We only have two-thirds of the annual operating funds," says Given. "We're trying to build a system with that limited funding stream and will never get to a fully functioning system at this rate." "I can't help but think of Mexico City, people killed by buildings and falling debris. ... We don't want to see the same situation here," he says. "I fear we will regret we didn't do this when we had the chance." USGS and the CalTech Seismological Laboratory started research on the EEW in 2006 with a thin budget, relying on federal funding and some private donations. In 2012, they went live with a beta system, and earlier this year rolled out a pilot program to train systems and some utilities. This year, underscoring the lack of national urgency for an EEW, the Trump administration initially budgeted nothing toward the USGS EEW system. Bipartisan demands by members of Congress tentatively restored the USGS EEW funding to $10.2 million for this year, although Congress has yet to vote on the budget. The state of California last year also allocated $10 million to developing the EEW system. But USGS says the EEW system will cost roughly $38 million to build and $16 million a year for operation and maintenance. "It's frustrating," says Heaton. "If you look at other countries, they got the will and message after big and important earthquakes. We'd like to do it before that happens." He points to the nation's attention to other disasters and political priorities as one of the reasons for the slow rollout for the EEW system. As a result, he says, "we're not ready." Heaton underscores what a 7.2 earthquake in Southern California would mean. "You'd see collapse of literally hundreds of older concrete frame buildings," he says. "You'd see the collapse of many tall steel buildings built before 1995. We might even see collapse of today's most modern tall buildings. It could be a very bad scenario. I honestly don't want to live to see that day." More than 100,000 people -- even as many as 300,000 -- could be displaced if a major earthquake were to hit Los Angeles, estimates Aram Sahakian, general manager for the Los Angeles Emergency Management Department. As cities and states try to prepare for the Big One, seismologists and city officials also recommend being prepared at a personal level. "A major disaster, like a 7.2 earthquake, will overwhelm our resources," says Sahakian. "You as a person, your family, and your neighborhood need to be prepared to get no response if you call 911. You need to be able to survive on your own for hours or days."
By Tony Marco and Ralph Ellis, CNN Updated 1:58 AM ET, Wed August 19, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Three people were unaccounted for Tuesday after a landslide struck a new-home development outside a city in the Alaska panhandle, authorities said. Four people missing today in #Sitka after flash flooding, landslides and sinkholes http://t.co/XUGYhaO6NZ pic.twitter.com/MmGHxGRWvq (CNN)Three people were unaccounted for Tuesday after a landslide struck a new-home development outside a city in the Alaska panhandle, authorities said. Four people missing today in #Sitka after flash flooding, landslides and sinkholes http://t.co/XUGYhaO6NZ pic.twitter.com/MmGHxGRWvq The three were working in the housing development when heavy rains caused the landslide, authorities said. "We are not able to do anything on the ground as far as search and rescue because the ground is so unstable," Police Chief Sheldon Schmitt said. " A significant part of the hillside has come down. Homeland Security is coming in to assess the situation. ... We are sitting tight right now because it's so unstable, and it's continuing to rain." One house was destroyed and another was heavily damaged, the city website said. A state of emergency was declared for the city and borough. Sara Peterson, the city's public information officer, said three landslides struck the coastal city of about 9,000 people. The city has ordered the evacuation of 20 to 30 homes, she said. Gov. Bill Walker planned to visit Sitka on Wednesday. "Our thoughts and prayers are with those who are missing and all the people affected by the disasters in Sitka today," Walker said. "Thank you to all the volunteers and emergency responders from the Sitka police and fire departments who are working so hard to protect the lives and property of Alaskans."
Manu Raju is a senior congressional correspondent at CNN, covering Capitol Hill and campaign politics. Full Bio Manu Raju is a senior congressional correspondent at CNN, covering Capitol Hill and campaign politics. Raju is a veteran reporter in Washington, having previously served as a top Capitol Hill correspondent at Politico for seven years. Prior to his time at Politico, Raju reported for The Hill newspaper, Congressional Quarterly and Inside Washington Publishers. He has long been a frequent guest on political talk shows on TV and radio. Raju has won multiple journalism awards for his reporting on the major battles consuming Washington and his coverage of campaign politics. In 2012, Raju was part of a team of four reporters who won the White House Correspondents Association's prestigious Merriman Smith award for presidential reporting under deadline pressure for their coverage of the debt ceiling crisis. In 2015, Raju also was awarded first prize by the Society of Professional Journalists in D.C. for beat coverage of the 2014 midterm elections, and a Folio: Eddie Award for a feature profile on Senator Elizabeth Warren. Raju has developed a reputation as a reporter who can find out what politicians are privately discussing out of the public's view. And he is well known for his sharp and skillful questioning of politicians, a skill he showcased in 2014 when he moderated debates in two of the biggest races in the country -- for a key Senate seat in Colorado and a hotly contested governor's race there as well. Raju got his start in media working at the student newspaper The Badger Herald at the University of Wisconsin-Madison, his alma mater. And his writing roots extend to his late grandfather, Gopalakrishna Adiga, a legendary poet from South India who wrote in the language of Kannada. Raju is a long-suffering Chicago sports fan and a native of the Greater Chicago area.
John Berman is the co-anchor of "CNN Newsroom" with Poppy Harlow. Full Bio John Berman is the co-anchor of "CNN Newsroom" with Poppy Harlow. He previously served as co-anchor of CNN's morning show "Early Start" with Christine Romans and "At This Hour" with Kate Bolduan. Before coming to CNN, he worked at ABC News since 1995, and has appeared on television there since 2001. He was a regular contributor to all of ABC's broadcasts, including "World News with Diane Sawyer," "Good Morning America," "Nightline," "20/20" and contributed to ABCNews.com. Berman helped lead GMA's coverage of the GOP primaries in 2012 and covered the 2008 presidential campaign, following Republican candidates Sen. John McCain, R-Ariz. and former Massachusetts Gov. Mitt Romney during the GOP primaries, as well as, then-Sen. Barack Obama, D-Ill., in the general election. In 1999 and 2000, Berman worked as an off-air reporter for ABC News covering George W. Bush's presidential campaign. He logged more hours with then-candidate Bush than nearly any other reporter, following Bush to 45 states from his early fundraisers through his first months in the White House. Berman has covered stories ranging from the war in Iraq to the best way to catch catfish barehanded. He has interviewed newsmakers from Barack Obama to Lionel Richie, from the Prime Minister of Iraq to MC Hammer. He was an embedded reporter during the invasion of Iraq and reported on the Israeli invasion of Lebanon in 2006. Berman also covered the Indian Ocean tsunami from Banda Aceh, Indonesia, and the steroids scandal in American sports. From 1997 to 1999, Berman was the head writer for "World News Tonight With Peter Jennings." He traveled with Jennings to the Columbine school shooting in Colorado, and to Cuba for the pope's historic visit. He also worked with Jennings throughout the impeachment hearings of President Clinton. Berman was part of the "World News Tonight" team recognized with a 2004 Edward R. Murrow award for best broadcast, and was awarded a James Beard Award in 2010. Berman started at ABC News as a desk assistant working the overnight shift in 1995. A native of Carlisle, Mass., he graduated from Harvard University, where he was president of Hasty Pudding Theatricals. He likes the Red Sox. Have a problem with that?
Michael Bass is CNN's Executive Vice President of programming. In this role, he oversees all New York- and Atlanta-based live programs, including mornings, dayside, prime time, and weekends. In addition, he manages network-wide booking, sponsored content and special projects, "CNN Heroes" and in-house original documentaries. Bass is based in New York. Full Bio Before coming to CNN, Bass served as co-executive producer of "Katie" in 2012-13. Prior to joining the daytime talk show, he was senior vice president of strategic initiatives at NBC Universal from 2008-2012. In that role, he managed a variety of company-wide projects in support of NBCU's strategic priorities, working closely with the entertainment, sports, news, local media and cable divisions -- and on cross-platform events like the Super Bowl and UpFronts. Previously, Bass served from 2002-2007 as senior executive producer for CBS News' "The Early Show," "The Saturday Early Show," and "The CBS Morning News." Prior to that, he was senior broadcast producer for NBC's "Today" from December 1995 to December 2000, and served as the show's interim executive producer from December 2000 to May 2001. During his tenure, Bass was responsible for planning and producing Today's coverage of the Summer Olympics in Atlanta (1996) and in Sydney (2000). He also conceived the popular series "Where In The World Is Matt Lauer?" and launched the third hour of the program as executive producer of "Later Today." Bass was also the executive producer of "Weekend Today" from February 1998 to June 1999. He held the position of broadcast producer on "Today" from 1994 to 1995 and was a producer on the show from 1989 to 1990. Also at NBC News, Bass was supervising producer of "NBC Nightly News with Tom Brokaw" from September 1992 to January 1994. He held producer roles for NBC Sports' coverage of the 1988 and 1992 Summer Olympics and also produced NBC's Olympic late-night program in the summer of 1996. He is the recipient of five Sports Emmy Awards for his Olympics work. Bass was a staff writer for the San Diego Union-Tribune from 1985 to 1986, and prior to this, his broadcast career began at ABC Sports as an Olympics researcher, from 1983 to 1985. He was a writer for the Peabody Award-winning Wide World of Sports 25th Anniversary Show. Bass graduated with honors from Harvard University with a degree in history and literature.
By Katishi Maake, CNN Updated 5:44 PM ET, Fri October 6, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Washington (CNN)Democratic lawmakers expressed outrage Friday after the Trump administration announced a rollback to Obamacare's contraceptive mandate. The rule announced today is yet another attempt to sabotage the Affordable Care Act, and a direct attack on women. Launching such an attack on the Friday before a long weekend isn't fooling anyone -- women are smarter than that, Mr. President. #handsoffmyBC Outrageous and wrong. #Birthcontrol is healthcare that shouldn't be decided by a woman's boss or the government. #handsoffmyBC https://t.co/9dFWCvRN1L The rollback of birth control coverage is a direct attack on the rights of women and their access to health care. This cannot stand. 1/ https://t.co/G5lqE9Y3Si Washington (CNN)Democratic lawmakers expressed outrage Friday after the Trump administration announced a rollback to Obamacare's contraceptive mandate. The rule announced today is yet another attempt to sabotage the Affordable Care Act, and a direct attack on women. Launching such an attack on the Friday before a long weekend isn't fooling anyone -- women are smarter than that, Mr. President. #handsoffmyBC Outrageous and wrong. #Birthcontrol is healthcare that shouldn't be decided by a woman's boss or the government. #handsoffmyBC https://t.co/9dFWCvRN1L The rollback of birth control coverage is a direct attack on the rights of women and their access to health care. This cannot stand. 1/ https://t.co/G5lqE9Y3Si The new rules would let a broad range of employers -- including nonprofits, private firms and publicly traded companies -- stop offering free contraceptives through their health insurance plans if they have a "sincerely held religious or moral objection," senior agency officials in the Department of Health and Human Services said on a call about the implementation and enforcement of the new rules. More than 55 million US women have birth control coverage with zero out-of-pocket costs, according to the National Women's Law Center. Democrats are calling the administration's decision, which would restrict access to birth control, an attempt to sabotage the Affordable Care Act and an undermining of women's health. Frustration with Trump's decision quickly trended the #handsoffmybc hashtag on Twitter. House Minority Leader Nancy Pelosi was quick to criticize the decision, calling it "despicable" and "a sickening attack on women's health." "This administration's contempt for women reaches a new low with this appalling decision to enable employers and health plans to deny women basic coverage for contraception," Pelosi said in a Friday news release. Senate Minority Leader Chuck Schumer criticized what he said was an "outrageous decision." "We have long turned the page on the days when a boss could stand in between a woman and her own healthcare decisions -- this decision drags the country backwards," he said in a statement. "This decision is just the latest in a series of moves the Trump Administration has made to undermine and sabotage our health care system." Rep. Katherine Clark, D-Massachusetts, said the move is "outrageous and wrong." Democrats plan to resist Trump's latest measure and said they fear restricted access to contraceptives could have effects like an increase in unplanned pregnancies. "Millions of Americans -- both women and men -- rely on contraception to prevent pregnancy, avoid sexually transmitted infections and manage a range of health conditions," Sen. Elizabeth Warren of Massachusetts said in a news release. Senate Minority Whip Dick Durbin echoed Warren's sentiments in a Friday statement. "Denying health care to millions of women across America is dangerous and unfair," he said. "And we know that denying access to family planning leads to more unplanned pregnancies and sadly more abortions." But several Republicans, including House Speaker Paul Ryan, applauded Trump's decision as protecting religious freedom. "Under the Obama administration, this constitutional right was seriously eroded," Ryan said in a statement, adding: " The conscience protections installed will ensure that people and organizations can freely live out their religious convictions and moral beliefs." Ohio Republican Rep. Jim Jordan, a member of the conservative House Freedom Caucus, said the measure is a victory for people of faith and upholding First Amendment rights. "The HHS mandate forced religious employers to pay for services that violated their consciences," he said in a Friday news release. "I applaud President Trump and his administration for boldly standing up for the Constitution and the First Amendment."
Award winning journalist Carol Costello is the host of HLN's Across America with Carol Costello, a two hour news show airing weekdays from 11-1pm ET, covering the day's news and most-talked about stories. She is based in the network's Los Angeles bureau. Full Bio Award winning journalist Carol Costello is the host of HLN's Across America with Carol Costello, a two hour news show airing weekdays from 11-1pm ET, covering the day's news and most-talked about stories. She is based in the network's Los Angeles bureau. Prior to joining HLN in February of 2017, Costello anchored the 9 a.m. to 11 a.m. (ET) edition of CNN Newsroom. Costello has interviewed four former U.S. presidents, President Jimmy Carter, President Ronald Reagan, President George H.W. Bush and President Bill Clinton and has covered four presidential inaugurations. Costello also covered the 2016 political campaign for CNN and anchored from both conventions and was part of the network's coverage during the debates. Costello covered the terrorist shootings in San Bernardino and Orlando and anchored wall-to-wall coverage of flight MH-370 and the George Zimmerman trial. Additionally, she was a part of CNN's Peabody Award winning coverage of the Gulf Oil Spill, the 2008 presidential election and Hurricane Katrina. During her time with CNN, she has also reported on the Boston Marathon Bombing, on the last Space Shuttle launch, the Ohio midterm elections, the shooting at Virginia Tech, the tsunami disaster in South Asia, the Russian school hostage crisis and Hurricanes Charley, Frances, Ivan and Jeanne. Costello's work has been honored numerous times, a 1991 Emmy Award for a special on crack and cocaine, a UPI award, several Associated Press awards and multiple Emmy nominations. Costello joined CNN in October 2001 from WJLA-TV in Washington, D.C., where she'd worked five years as an anchor and investigative reporter. Before that, she spent three years at WBAL-TV in Baltimore as an anchor and co-anchor. She began her career as a weekend anchor and reporter for WAKR-TV in Akron, Ohio, then moved to WBNS-TV in Columbus, Ohio, to work as the station's principal weeknight anchor. Costello earned a degree in journalism from Kent State University in Kent, Ohio.
By Daniel Burke, CNN Religion Editor Updated 10:46 AM ET, Fri November 11, 2016 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Dilshad Ali had never felt the fear. This series explores the lives of Muslims in the age of ISIS and Islamophobia. I'm scared that today will be the last day I felt somewhat safe wearing my hijab. https://t.co/C29V7GGOXj CNN's Tim Hume contributed to this report. (CNN)Dilshad Ali had never felt the fear. This series explores the lives of Muslims in the age of ISIS and Islamophobia. I'm scared that today will be the last day I felt somewhat safe wearing my hijab. https://t.co/C29V7GGOXj CNN's Tim Hume contributed to this report. Not when Donald Trump proposed banning Muslims from entering the United States, a plan his own running mate called "offensive and unconstitutional." Not when Trump suggested monitoring mosques and said he thinks "Islam hates us," attributing anti-American enmity to a faith of 1.6 billion people. Not even when Islamophobic incidents spiked to their highest levels since the 9/11 attacks. In some ways, Ali, a 40-year-old mother of three, had been buffered from the long and brutal 2016 presidential campaign. She trods familiar ground in her Virginia home. She drops her children off at school, where the teachers know her and she knows them. She shops at the same grocery store, where the people smile at her and she smiles back, her face framed by a hijab. At her polling station on Tuesday, she was greeted warmly by neighbors, even the ones whose cars bore pro-Trump stickers. As the editor of the Muslim section of Patheos, a website specializing in spirituality, Ali had edited plenty of stories about other Muslims' distress. She knew their fears intimately. But she had never herself felt the stomach-churning anxiety. Until Wednesday morning. "I woke up today and I finally felt it. It felt personal, like the election was a vote against me." As a tumultuous Tuesday ticked toward a worry-producing Wednesday, scores of Muslim imams and activists, soccer moms and scholars, commiserated over their concern and uncertainty, even as they pledged to hold fast to their faith and build stronger coalitions with fellow minorities. More than 7 in 10 Muslims had said they would vote for Hillary Clinton, the Democratic nominee, according to an October survey by the Council on American-Islamic Relations. Just 4% had said they would vote for Trump, and perhaps as few expected him to win. Some said his election felt like a betrayal, as if half the country had turned on them. "Our worst nightmare materialized last night," said Wardah Khalid, a writer and foreign policy analyst. "A man that built his platform on bigotry, misogyny, and the vilification of Muslims and minorities won the highest office in the land." 'Open season' on Muslims "Shock. Complete and utter shock," said Yasir Qadhi, a well-known Muslim scholar in Memphis, Tennessee. He, like many others, said he had expected Clinton to win the presidency. "And all of us are genuinely worried. I fear for the safety of my wife in hijab; of my children in the streets; of minorities everywhere struggling to understand what happened." Sahar Aziz, a professor at the Texas A&M University School of Law, said Trump's election represents a regression to a less tolerant and inclusive America. "The general mood I am seeing among Muslims is concern that a Trump presidency will be open season on them. Some Muslims worry their children may experience bullying at school because Trump's victory validated the mainstreaming of Islamophobia. Some women are afraid to wear their headscarves in public in case this invites physical or verbal assault." Amirah Waite, a 19-year-old American-Indonesian college student who lives in Hawaii, said Wednesday she was "so terrified that I can't stop shaking ... stuck in a country that hates me." The secret costs of Islamophobia Other Muslims said they fear Trump will install anti-Muslim activists, whose work he has promoted, in powerful roles at the Justice Department and other agencies. "We could go back to that post-9/11, witch hunt-type environment," said Sheikh Hamza Yusuf, a scholar and co-founder of Zaytuna College, the country's first accredited Muslim college. In California, Abdullah bin Hamid Ali said he and other African-American Muslims are somewhat less unsettled than their immigrant co-religionists. They have seen enough of American history to sense that elections often hinge on turning out white voters, sometimes through fear and demonization of "others." "While I can't say I'm 'happy' with the results (I wasn't rooting for Clinton, either) I am somewhat hopeful that Trump's election will force people to come closer and be much nicer to one another," said Abdullah, a professor at Zaytuna. Omid Safi, director of Duke University's Islamic Center, likewise said he hopes Trump's election will foster a sense of solidarity among the marginalized, including Muslims and Hispanics, African-Americans and Native Americans, poor people and gays and lesbians. "If we want to see an America that we are proud of, we have to build that America. It is not in our present, and was not part of our past, it can only be in our shared future." Determined not to change Dalia Mogahed, a researcher and pollster, said she is in shock, unable to believe that more than 50.5 million Americans voted to elect Donald Trump as president. "I'm scared of what this means for my family, especially my kids. What kind of an America will they inherit?" But Mogahed said she is determined not to change a "single plan." She will continue to advocate on behalf of this country's estimated 3.3 million Muslims and to wear her hijab in public, proudly announcing her identity as a Muslim. Many Muslims expressed similar thoughts on Wednesday, resolving to continue to fight for their civil rights, and to remain vigilant against any encroachments on their claim to an American identity. "I'm assuming that the next four years will be hard, but we must use a Trump victory to renew our connection to God and communities so we can organize around important issues that concern us all," said Imam Suhaib Webb, a popular cleric based in Washington. "Regardless of the situation, God commands us to stay dedicated to good and to each other. Nothing changes. My passion is greater than it was yesterday." 'God's got us' On Wednesday morning in Texas, Sheikh Omar Suleiman had one of the toughest conversations he can recall with his young daughter. "She couldn't understand why America would elect a bigoted bully. And neither can I. But I reminded her what we do with bullies: We stand up to them." Hundreds of miles away, Ali had a similar conversation with her 13-year-old daughter. The middle-school student had become deeply invested in the presidential campaign. Her class held mock elections and watched the debates for extra credit. She knew that Trump had mocked a disabled reporter. She heard what he said about Muslims and women. As her daughter sobbed on her shoulder, Ali tried to comfort her. But her bluff was called. "You're right, it's not OK," Ali said. "None of this is OK. But eventually, it will be OK. We are a practicing Muslim family and presidents and elections and nationalism and culture are one thing, but God is above all of us. And God has his reasons for doing things that we don't understand, but I fully believe that he's got us." Later on Wednesday, after Ali's husband dropped their daughter off at school, Ali called the school counselor. She asked the counselor to check on her daughter, quietly, and not let her know that Ali was worried.
Jacque Smith manages the CNN Digital Video domestic news team. Full Bio Jacque Smith manages the CNN Digital Video domestic news team. Her team produces, shoots and edits digital video news and feature content. Smith has been with CNN since 2008, working as a writer with the CNN Digital Features team and the CNN Health team before joining the digital video team as a cross-platform producer in 2014.
CNN Belief covers the faith angles of the world's biggest stories, from breaking news to politics to entertainment. It's edited by CNN's Daniel Burke with contributions from CNN's worldwide newsgathering team. See previous content here
Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. The Lead
By Amanda Barnett, CNN Updated 2:51 PM ET, Sun September 29, 2013 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Exploring the heavens with spaceships and fancy orbiting telescopes like the Hubble is pretty routine stuff for NASA. But the space agency is going low-tech to get a good look at an eagerly anticipated comet. The space agency plans to launch a balloon -- yes, a balloon -- to study Comet ISON, the much-hyped comet that many hope will put on a big sky show in coming months. Astronomers are scrambling to figure out ways to learn more about the comet, and that's where the balloon comes in. This isn't the kind of balloon you buy for kids at a party store, but they do have some things in common. NASA says its scientific balloons are made of polyethylene film like the material in plastic bags, and it will be filled with helium, just like a party balloon. But the NASA balloons can carry a payload weighing 8,000 pounds (3,600 kilograms), or about the weight of three small cars. It has a gondola to carry the instruments. Some similar balloons can fly up to 26 miles high and stay for up to two weeks. The 671-foot-tall balloon that will monitor ISON is called BRRISON, or Balloon Rapid Response for ISON. According to NASA, it will float about 120,000 feet above Earth to observe the comet -- and other science targets -- using a telescope and other instruments. It is expected to stay up from nine to 11 hours. "By ascending above 99.5% of the Earth's atmosphere, BRRISON will be able to study the materials within the comet," Andy Cheng, principal investigator, said on BRISSON's website. "It's possible that water and organic chemicals on comets may have played an important role in the evolution of life on Earth." The launch, from NASA's Columbia Scientific Balloon Facility in Fort Sumner, New Mexico, is targeted for 8 p.m. ET on Saturday, weather permitting. Comet ISON is nearing Mars on its way toward the sun and will fly about 730,000 miles above the sun's surface on November 8. If it survives, it could brighten and put on a big show as it passes Earth's orbit on its way back to the outer reaches of the solar system. Comet enthusiasts hope they will be able to see it without binoculars or telescopes. Its closest approach to Earth would be December 26, and it could be visible from the Northern Hemisphere for weeks in early 2014. Things to know about Comet ISON The comet was discovered by Russian astronomers Vitali Nevski and Artyom Novichonok in September 2012. It is named after their night-sky survey program, the International Scientific Optical Network, a group of observatories in 10 countries organized to track objects in space. Amateur astronomers already are posting pictures and making calculations about the comet's future. For those who want to try to track Comet ISON themselves, NASA has some tips on its Comet ISON website.
Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Newsroom
By Stephanie Elam, CNN Updated 5:49 PM ET, Fri October 13, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Las Vegas (CNN)Even though she could see it in his eyes that he was going back in, Debbie Gomez wanted her husband to leave the Route 91 Harvest Country Musical Festival with her. But as a Clark County Firefighter, Jesse Gomez was trained to respond to emergencies. It didn't matter that he was off duty at the time. Do you know an officer who has gone above and beyond what the job requires? E-mail us at BeyondtheCallofDuty@cnn.com. Las Vegas (CNN)Even though she could see it in his eyes that he was going back in, Debbie Gomez wanted her husband to leave the Route 91 Harvest Country Musical Festival with her. But as a Clark County Firefighter, Jesse Gomez was trained to respond to emergencies. It didn't matter that he was off duty at the time. Do you know an officer who has gone above and beyond what the job requires? E-mail us at BeyondtheCallofDuty@cnn.com. Programming note: Watch "New Day" and "CNN Newsroom" each Friday to see inspiring stories of officers going above and beyond the call of duty. As Jesse's cousins Opal and Steve Ruiz start driving out of the parking lot, other people are desperately trying to get a ride too. "People just started pounding on the car," Debbie said, beginning to cry as she recalled her fear. "I was still on the floorboard just screaming, 'you can't leave! You can't leave! Jesse's still there!'" But Steve and Opal also realized they needed to help, telling Debbie that they were going to put victims in her car to get them to the hospital. Debbie, still in shock about leaving Jesse behind, couldn't wrap her head around what they were asking of her. Read more about how Jesse Gomez and another off-duty firefighter saved lives at the concert. Stopping the car and moving the seats of Debbie's Chevrolet Tahoe, Steve and Opal loaded a man who had been shot into the car. A woman who didn't know this man but who had been staying with him jumped into the car as well. 'You have to get it together!' "They all just yelled at me and they said you have to get it together," Debbie said. "You are the only one that is a local here. You are the only one that knows how to get to a hospital, Debbie!" As Opal drove close to 90 miles per hour to get to the hospital, a sense of calm finally washed over Debbie. Steve was trying to get vital information from the man to share with the doctors. The other woman was trying to contact the man's wife. Debbie would later learn that when the gunfire erupted, he had been shot in the back protecting his wife and her two best friends. But for now, her job was just to keep this man talking. "We were joking around with each other -- me and the victim," Debbie recalled, remembering how she told him he looked like he drove a truck. He said he did drive a Ford F-150. "I said 'well, you are being taken in a Chevy so you better trade that in because I am a Chevy girl!'" By the time they get to the hospital, the man can't speak anymore. He's just moaning. In light of the attack and the false reports of multiple shooters on the Las Vegas Strip, Spring Valley Hospital was on lockdown. Steve pounded on the glass of the emergency room door. "We got a victim! We got a victim!" he yelled until the doors opened and the medical professionals came to get the man who was losing consciousness. The young woman hopped out the car and went in with him. A new perspective on what first responders do Debbie couldn't sleep for days until she found out what happened to the shooting victim she helped save. The man, who has chosen to keep his identity private, survived and is back home in Texas. As for her husband, it was some three hours after the shooting began when they reunited at another hospital. "I remember he was just standing on a curb. There was like no one around -- a lonely curb," Debbie said, remembering how she jumped out of the car to hug her husband. "I couldn't believe I was holding him." The whole experience has given Debbie a new perspective on what Jesse does every day as a first responder. "When he comes through that door and you know he has seen some bad stuff and at night you are upset because he just wants to be by himself for awhile," Debbie said, taking a pause to reflect. "I get it now. I get it."
By Ariane de Vogue, CNN Supreme Court Reporter Updated 6:16 AM ET, Fri October 6, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Washington (CNN)At 10:00 a.m. on Tuesday morning, about 400 people, including journalists and former California Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger, settled into their seats at the US Supreme Court to hear what turned out to be an incredibly lively and educational argument over partisan gerrymandering. Washington (CNN)At 10:00 a.m. on Tuesday morning, about 400 people, including journalists and former California Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger, settled into their seats at the US Supreme Court to hear what turned out to be an incredibly lively and educational argument over partisan gerrymandering. Everyone else had to wait. The case could have a profound effect on future elections and the political direction of the country, but while a ruling may not come for months, Tuesday's oral arguments are a reminder that the Supreme Court sets its own path when it comes to transparency. Court junkies around the country erupted in outrage when transcripts for the oral arguments appeared later than usual on the court's website. On top of that, Chief Justice John Roberts had denied a congressional request to release same-day audio of the proceedings. And, as always, no video cameras were allowed. With a blockbuster term including cases on religious liberty, immigration, privacy and voting rights, questions are again being asked why the Supreme Court remains so opaque. "SCOTUS still living in the 70s when it comes to technology and transparency," Josh Douglas, an election law expert at the University of Kentucky College of Law, tweeted. "This is the most important election law case in years -- one that may impact the entire foundation of our democracy," Douglas said later. "Yet those of us who could not be in DC at the oral argument were left waiting hours to read a cold transcript of what the justices said." The court regularly posts all audio on its website the Friday after arguments. But to some, that's not good enough. In fact, four congressmen wrote Roberts last month asking him to provide live audio for the redistricting case to no avail. "In the past 17 years, the court has released same-day audio for 26 cases with heightened public interest," wrote Democratic Reps. Gerry Connolly, Mike Quigley and Jerry Nadler, along with GOP Rep. Ted Poe. "This case undoubtedly meets that bar." In a separate statement, Connolly said the Supreme Court "is not some mystical priesthood" and that in the digital age "it strains credulity that this modest effort at transparency would prove impossible." What the congressmen, really want, however, is for the court to televise its proceedings. Last January, they introduced the Cameras in the Court Act, legislation they believe would "increase public transparency and improve understanding of its proceedings." But there is no sign that the justices are going to budge on that issue. "I can tell you the day you see a camera come into our courtroom, it's going to roll over my dead body," retired Justice David Souter said in 1996. Things haven't really changed. While some justices seemed open to the idea before taking the bench, they changed their minds once they reached the high court. As things stand, there is no support among the current justices to have proceedings televised. In an appearance last month at the Newseum, Justice Sonia Sotomayor said that during her confirmation process, she met with several senators who told her they thought that when the Senate installed cameras in their chamber in the 1980s, it stopped members from having to sit next to each other, listen and discuss problems in person. She feared that televising proceedings at court might lead to some justices playing to the cameras or others to refrain from asking questions. She acknowledged that audio is released but feared cameras would change the institution. What Sotomayor didn't add is that the court is currently the most collegial branch of government. Implicit in her comments: if it ain't broke, don't fix it. As things stand, according the court's public information officer, there are approximately 400 seats in the courtroom, which include the bar section, the justices' guest box, 36 press seats and the public section (240 seats for the general public, groups and guests of the court.) Often the line forms early in the morning, and even the previous day for big events where hopeful individuals (and sometimes hired placeholders) begin to arrive with sleeping bags in tow. Jeffrey P. Minear, the counselor to Roberts, responded to the congressmen, he said, because the chief justice was "busy with the current argument session." Minear said Roberts "has worked throughout his tenure to make the Supreme Court's work more accessible to the public." He noted that the court now posts its opinions online simultaneously with their announcement, posts oral argument transcripts as soon as possible and posts audio recordings by the end of the week. In addition, in November, the court plans to launch an electronic filing system that will make virtually all filings accessible online, without cost, to the public." But no live broadcasts. Minear reiterated that live broadcast or streaming of oral arguments "could adversely affect the character and quality of the dialogue between the attorneys and justices." He added, "The chief justice appreciates and shares your ultimate goal of increasing public transparency and improving public understanding of the Supreme Court." That sentence gave hope to Gabe Roth, who runs an organization called Fix the Court and has pressed for more transparency. Roth points out that some lower courts offer live access to appellate arguments and that "pro-transparency reforms" come in fits and starts. For example, the court ran live audio last year from the Great Hall for Justice Antonin Scalia's memorial. And things are at least going electronic, Roth noted. "The justices' financial disclosures have yet to be released online, but as of this summer the press and public may obtain them via thumb drive and not just via paper," he said. "The court refuses to post some basic information online, such as why the justices periodically recuse themselves from cases, yet as of next month, attorneys will be able to file their cases and motions electronically."
By Jennifer Hansler, CNN Updated 1:52 PM ET, Tue October 24, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)And then there were two: the US and Syria. CNN's Bijan Hosseini, Angela Barajas, Kevin Liptak, Ben Westcott and Steve George contributed to this report. (CNN)And then there were two: the US and Syria. CNN's Bijan Hosseini, Angela Barajas, Kevin Liptak, Ben Westcott and Steve George contributed to this report. As Nicaragua signs on to the Paris Agreement, the United States and Syria are now the only two nations in the world who have refused to be members of the climate pact. The Central American country held out on signing the deal for two years, based on criticisms that it was "insufficient" in addressing climate change. On Monday, however, the Nicaraguan government announced its intent to join the accord. Vice President and first lady Rosario Murillo said they sent a "document of adhesion" to the United Nations, according to Nicaragua's state-run media outlet El 19 Digital. "It is the only instrument we have in the world that allows us to unify intentions and efforts to face climate change and natural disasters," she said of the agreement. The landmark pact was agreed upon by nearly 200 countries in 2015 and is dedicated to lowering emissions and strengthening countries' abilities to deal with the effects of climate change. Nicaragua was the only country to reject it at the time. Syria, plunged in a civil war, was not present at the negotiations. US President Donald Trump announced in June that the nation would withdraw from the climate accord, a process that will be complete in 2020. "We're getting out," he said. "And we will start to renegotiate and we'll see if there's a better deal. If we can, great. If we can't, that's fine." The leaders of France, Italy and Germany indicated in a joint statement that the US could not unilaterally renegotiate the agreement. The UN body that facilitated the deal said it "cannot be renegotiated based on the request of a single party." The White House reiterated last month its intention to pull out of the deal unless changes are made. "There has been no change in the United States' position on the Paris agreement," White House spokeswoman Lindsay Walters said. "As the President has made abundantly clear, the United States is withdrawing unless we can re-enter on terms that are more favorable to our country. Trump's decision to leave the accord sparked massive outcry. Former President Barack Obama, whose administration negotiated the agreement, said the decision would hurt American workers, saying "the nations that remain in the Paris Agreement will be the nations that reap the benefits in jobs and industries created." Numerous foreign leaders decried the decision. Mayors and governors throughout the US vowed to carry on the commitments of the climate accord in their own jurisdictions. The US trails only China as the world's worst emitter of carbon dioxide, according to the European Commission's emissions database. In 2015, it released 5.1 million kilotons of carbon dioxide, more than all 28 European Union countries combined, and makes up almost a sixth of all global emissions. Fiji will host the next round of climate talks in Bonn, Germany, at the UN Climate Change Conference (COP23) next month. According to the UN Framework Convention on Climate Change (UNFCCC), world leaders will discuss how to "advance the aims and ambitions" of the Paris Agreement.
By Sara Ganim, CNN Updated 6:50 PM ET, Tue July 7, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)They called it the "dog pound." Email your story ideas and tips to CNNtips@cnn.com. WHEN @coachbeckman is fired you'll hear plenty more stories but right now he's dangling scholarships like a carrot (CNN)They called it the "dog pound." Email your story ideas and tips to CNNtips@cnn.com. WHEN @coachbeckman is fired you'll hear plenty more stories but right now he's dangling scholarships like a carrot It was a separate practice for women's basketball players at the University of Illinois, a majority of them black, where athletes were often allegedly harassed and attacked for things that had nothing to do with basketball. Like the neighborhoods where they grew up. Or their family life. It was common, these women told CNN, for an assistant coach to refer to race, and to tell them their "culture" was "poison" or "toxic" to the starting team, which was predominantly white. During road games, the players say they were segregated -- black players separated from the white ones in hotel rooms. It was so bad, the women said, four players from this past season transferred out of the program at the University of Illinois to other schools. Nearby, at the university's Memorial Stadium, some members of the football team say they were being harassed too. They recalled two instances where players were physically hit by their coach. Another player, with Type 1 diabetes, said he was shamed about his weight. CNN has spoken to 15 recently departed players on the football and women's basketball teams, and they allege a wide range of misconduct and persistent bullying of athletes by coaches. In addition, players and their families have complained to CNN that they were pressured to play through injuries that go far beyond the typical tough nature of college sports. In one case, a women's basketball player says she was forced to play with an injured toe that ended up being diagnosed as a broken foot. Athletes on the football team also complained that injuries were not taken seriously -- one recalling a time when coaches threatened from the sidelines that he would lose his scholarship as he limped across the field with a knee injury. Overall, students and parents on both teams say there was a culture of coaches bullying students, with frequent threats to take away their scholarships even though university policy says an athlete can't lose his or her scholarship because of injury or performance in sport. The university's athletic director, Mike Thomas, acknowledged that the allegations are serious and call into question the culture of the program. "I was certainly troubled by all the allegations. And those allegations don't match our core values," he said. "Certainly our student athletes need to be in an environment that's safe, that's healthy, that takes their well-being as primary importance." Women's basketball head coach Matt Bollant and head football coach Tim Beckman declined to comment through a university spokeswoman. "Look at what the university has to lose," said Lydia Tuck, the mother of one former women's basketball player. "I'm sure they're worried about Title IX funding. I'm sure they hope that we go away." Racism alleged on women's basketball team The women's basketball team lost four girls to transfer this year -- all for the same reasons: They allege pervasive emotional abuse. Eight former players -- seven of them have since sued the university -- talked to CNN, and all said that assistant coach Mike Divilbiss verbally attacked players daily, going after them for personal issues such as learning disabilities, family life or the neighborhood in which they grew up. Divilbiss could not be reached for comment. "The way he would attack you personally was just horrible," said Jacqui Grant, a former player. "He came after my character," said former player Alexis Smith, claiming that Divilbiss reprimanded her for moving into the same apartment as two of her teammates who were Bollant's recruits. "He said, 'I feel like you are trying to poison these girls. Why did you even move in with them? You are trying to poison them.' " "When I tried to defend myself," she added, "he was like, 'Don't try to come after me, I'm the wrong person.' " Kierra Morris, who left the team after being put on medical disability, said the coaches told her they didn't want her "culture carrying over" to their new recruits. Another former player, Amarah Coleman said that race was a constant underlying distinction and that Divilbiss often said things like, "you know how black people play." And another former player, Taylor Tuck, said Divilbiss made a comment about three black players sitting together at a restaurant, saying, "All the black girls are sitting together, that's segregated." Divilbiss left the university after coming to what administrators call a "mutual understanding" with Bollant, following complaints from some parents, but Bollant remains in his position. Several former players or their parents told CNN that separate practices were held for the team -- one practice group was majority black, and called "the dog pound," which the players understood to mean they were not in favor. The other practice group was majority white, made up of the starters on the team. In addition, tension between the groups was encouraged, parents wrote in letters of complaint to the university in April. The players said those in the "dog pound" were called "crabs," which, on a conference call, seven of the players explained like this: "Crabs can never get out of a bucket because they always pull each other down. That is how he explained it in practice. ... They all just climb on top of each other and pull each other down. Like, bums, we are just dragging everybody down." Coleman said she felt uncomfortable when her team was preparing to play one that was majority African-American, "because coach Divilbiss would single out the blacks on the team to talk about what the other black team was thinking. ... The division of the team during that time made it feel like coach was thinking all blacks think alike." She continued with more examples: "In practice when a black player would do a certain move, he (Divilbiss) would make a comment stating 'that's the West Side coming out' (referring to Chicago's predominantly black West Side). People should be proud of where they are from, but coach was saying it to make fun of where they are from." Recruitment by a previous coach Six of the former players who spoke to CNN said that Divilbiss made several comments that singled out the black players who were primarily recruited by the previous coach, also an African-American, from the white players who were primarily recruited by Bollant. The players say race wasn't the only factor that led to their mistreatment; they say they believe it also had to do with the fact that they were recruited by a previous coach. "It was a combination. Like you were African-American, and you weren't recruited by them," former player Nia Oden said. In their lawsuit, and in interviews with CNN, the women said they were divided by race when sharing hotel rooms during road games. After the women's parents complained in April, the school did an internal investigation through its diversity council, and "preliminary findings" found no wrongdoing when it came to the allegations of racism and bullying. That led to an outcry from former players and their parents. And in response to them and to questions from CNN, the university announced five days later that it had hired a Chicago law firm to "finalize the preliminary review" that found no wrongdoing. "There's no rush to judgment. You know we will go through an investigative process, and when that process is complete we will look at the next steps," said Thomas, the university's athletic director. "... I think you and I could be watching practice, and you could hear a coach say something to two different kids, those two different kids might take it a different way and you and I might take it a different way. So I think for coaches, not just at the University of Illinois but across the country, these are the kind of things that we're going to be paying attention to moving forward." The university has also hired a separate law firm to look at the claims of medical mistreatment on different teams. Allegations now include a lawsuit filed on June 8 by a former Illinois soccer player who says her concussion was mishandled. The suit says the university failed to follow its own protocol for handling concussions when defender Casey Conine was injured, returning her to play before doctors cleared her. 'A culture of mental and emotional abuse' Divilbiss' departure comes after three sets of parents wrote letters to the administration in late April. In one of the letters, Tuck, the former player, and her husband wrote that bullying and racial tension on the team are systematic and "epidemic," and they accused Bollant, the women's basketball head coach, of creating "a culture of mental and emotional abuse." The family of another player, Taylor Gleason, wrote that she was "bullied and demoralized daily" and was forced to play with an injured toe, which later was diagnosed as a broken foot. "She's just happy to be at a new school and starting over," her father told CNN later. "Just happy to be out of there." Many of the players who left are now playing at other schools, and they said they are having much different and much better experiences. Tom Grusecki, the stepfather of one former player, wrote in a letter to the school that Divilbiss belittled his daughter in front of the team because of her estranged relationship with her father and because of her dyslexia. More than one player said they became so depressed, "it hurt to get out of bed." "The things they said were so personal, attacking, that they would single you out and you felt you were alone," Gleason said. Sarah Livingston, who transferred after the 2014 season, said the final straw, for her, was when another coach just turned away after one of Divilbiss' rants. "That kind of embodied the whole attitude of everyone that wasn't Divilbiss," she said. "He wouldn't stand up for us. He wouldn't tell coach D to stop. Coach Bollant would be quiet and continue with practice," Smith said. Thomas, the university's athletic director, said the university is reevaluating its practice of allowing head coaches to do most of the vetting of assistants they bring in. The university responded by saying that it's disappointed the lawsuit came before the findings of its internal review and that Thomas has asked staff to closely monitor team activities in the meantime. "I cannot stress enough that anytime we learn that a student feels the experience at Illinois isn't excellent, we take those concerns seriously. We intended that through the external review process the student-athletes and their families would help us better understand their concerns and perceptions," Chancellor Phyllis Wise said in a statement. Many players and parents told CNN they won't be happy as long as Bollant remains. One said, "When you are the head coach, you should stop that when you see it. If you can't stop bullying amongst your own staff, that is a problem." Tuck, whose daughter graduated from the program, said the behavior of the coaching staff changed drastically when Bollant was hired after her daughter's freshman year. And, she said, the attitude of the coaches is drastically different from those of her other daughter, who plays under much better circumstances at Connecticut. Football allegations The alleged bullying at the University of Illinois wasn't isolated to one program or one coach. There are also allegations of wrongdoing in the football program. Recently graduated football player Kenny Knight and three other former players who spoke to CNN say they witnessed two incidents in the past two years in which head coach Tim Beckman was physically rough with players. One player is still on the team and declined through his teammates to talk about what happened. But witnesses said that at the start of one practice, the player ran onto the field with his helmet unbuckled, and Beckman ran over to him, grabbed his face mask and jerked his head back and forth, yelling at him. In 2013, Knight says, a similar thing happened to him. He says Beckman grabbed and tackled him from behind, throwing him to the ground during a practice. Two former teammates who witnessed the incident backed him up. They say it happened after Knight was hit "dirty" by another player with his head down -- something that's prohibited in college football. "I immediately got in his face about it," Knight said of the player who hit him. "Before I had the chance to lift a finger, in a matter of seconds, I was grabbed by my shoulder and thrown on the ground. I was livid, I thought I was going to look up and see one of my teammates had thrown me down, but I looked up and saw Tim Beckman staring in my face. I was shocked. I don't think I uttered a word." The university says Beckman thought he was breaking up a fight; Knight and several other players who witnessed the incident said there was no physical fight happening when Beckman hit Knight. Knight's father said the night of the incident, Beckman told him, "Kenny accidentally fell backwards over him." Knight and his father tried to look at the practice tape to review what happened. "There was 35 seconds of blank screen. I could see the dial was moving to let me know that it was still playing, but there was no film to be seen. It wouldn't play for me or for anybody else," he said. Two other players said they, separately, also looked for the incident on the practice tape, but it was not there. The university says the "dead time" between plays is not normally recorded during practice. Knight says Beckman called him the day after speaking to his father to apologize, but Knight never reported the incident to anyone at the university out of fear that he'd lose his scholarship. "He should never be allowed to coach again," Knight said. The National College Players Association is also involved, offering guidance to the players who are coming out publicly and demanding that Illinois fire all coaches involved in physical and verbal abuse. "You can be tough as hell without abusing players," said NCPA president Ramogi Huma. "Everywhere, coaches yell and cuss. That happens everywhere. What doesn't happen everywhere is racism," Huma said, referring to the women's basketball team. "What doesn't happen everywhere is forcing players to play through serious injuries. It's not regular for coaches to put their hands on players -- that's not breaking up a fight, that's starting a fight," he said, referring to the alleged incident with the football team. "At the end of the day, it's about the student-athlete experience, and part of that is their safety, well-being and health," said Thomas, the university's athletic director. "And abuse is not acceptable. We hold our staff to a high standard. That line of what's acceptable and not acceptable is really under the microscope right now." Brothers allege bullying on football team Knight and others are speaking up after fellow former teammate Simon Cvijanovic went on Twitter in May to say that he'd been pressured by Beckman to go back on the field too soon after knee surgery and to play through a shoulder injury. Instead, he quit the team, started the hashtag #BanBeckman and inspired several more teammates to speak up, including Knight, and former player Nick North, who told CNN that he, too, was pushed back into practice after hurting a knee ligament. "They kept saying, 'You need to go back out there,' even though they knew I wasn't 100 percent," North said. "I'd literally be limping while running, and you could see it. ... They were like, if you can't do this, you're going to have to leave. You can't play here. We're going to take your scholarship." North graduated in December. All the players CNN spoke to said that many more stories like these exist, but players are afraid to speak up because they're still on the team. "WHEN @coachbeckman is fired you'll hear plenty more stories but right now he's dangling scholarships like a carrot," Cvijanovic tweeted. He later said, "They act like our bodies are just disposable and we should feel that way also or else we're not team players. ... There's nowhere to turn to so Twitter is where I went." He says Beckman threatened to say bad things about his character to National Football League scouts unless he returned to the field after injuries. Once, he says, he was pressured to return two weeks after an ankle injury that his doctor told him needed a six- to eight-week recovery. His younger brother, who also played football but quit the team, struggled as well. A Type 1 diabetic, Peter Cvijanovic had trouble gaining weight and says he was bullied daily by coaches for it. "They made him step on the scale three to five times a day," Simon Cvijanovic said. "Every time he walked by, coach would make him step up on the scale, and Peter would hang his head and get up on the scale. We were both throwing up in the morning from anxiety -- me from my knee and him because of the weight issue." The university says it cannot discuss the Cvijanovic brothers' or Nick North's allegations in detail because of privacy laws. Thomas said he had not been aware of many of the allegations until being asked for comment by CNN, adding that he would ask the firm investigating to expand its scope. "Anytime you receive these types of allegations, it brings you great concern," he said, later adding, "Here at the University of Illinois, the health and well-being of our student athletes is our number one priority. ... Anytime anything rises to a level of a student athlete being mistreated, I would address it immediately."
Tom Sater is a meteorologist and weather anchor for CNN International. A five-time Emmy winning meteorologist, Sater has also provided reports on sister networks CNN/U.S. and HLN. Full Bio Tom Sater is a meteorologist and weather anchor for CNN International based at the network's global headquarters in Atlanta. A five-time Emmy winning meteorologist, Sater has also provided reports on sister networks CNN/U.S. and HLN. He is a member of the National Weather Association (NWA), and has earned the Seal of Approval from the American Meteorological Society (AMS). Sater has covered many international weather stories including Super Typhoon Haiyan in November 2013. While covering the landfall impact in the Philippines, he was one of the first international broadcasters to report that the storm's intense winds made it the strongest typhoon to make landfall on any landmass in recorded history. Earlier this year CNNI won the 'Best News Coverage -- International' category for its reporting of Typhoon Haiyan at the prestigious Royal Television Society Awards. Before joining CNNI, Sater worked as a meteorologist in a number of U.S. markets including Washington, D.C.; Atlanta, Georgia; Cincinnati, Ohio; Montgomery, Alabama and Lexington, Kentucky, where in 1998 he won a regional Emmy for Outstanding Weather Anchor at WKYT as the station's chief meteorologist. He ended up winning the same award four consecutive years during his time at WTTG in Washington, D.C. Broadcasting runs in his family. Sater's wife, who was born in Punjab, India, is a morning news anchor for a local television station in Atlanta. They have twin girls and live on a small horse farm in north Georgia.
Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Erin Burnett Out Front
Coy Wire is a former professional football player who joined CNN Sports in 2015 as a full time anchor and correspondent. Full Bio Coy Wire is a former professional football player who joined CNN Sports in 2015 as a full time anchor and correspondent. From his home base at CNN Center, Wire anchors daily Bleacher Report segments, covers events and serves as an expert contributor across all platforms. He appears regularly on CNN programs Early Start, New Day and CNN Newsroom, in addition to HLN's Morning Express with Robin Meade and Weekend Express with Lynn Smith. He also contributes to CNN International's World Sport program and to CNN Digital on a broad range of crossover sports stories. Wire's many field assignments include on-the-ground coverage of the 2016 Rio Summer Olympics, 2015 FIFA Women's World Cup, and Super Bowl 50. As a former college and pro athlete, Wire brings insider experiences, insight, credibility and contacts to his new role. He graduated from Stanford University, and was the first player in modern school history to lead the team in rushing one year and tackles in another. Post college he was drafted into the NFL by the Buffalo Bills in 2002. He would be named team captain for both the Bills and the Atlanta Falcons during his career which spanned nine years. He also received the Ed Block Courage Award, the Walter Payton Man of the Year Award, and Special Teams Player of the Year honors during his career. With his athletic career as a backdrop, Wire wrote an inspirational book, Change Your Mind, which was published in 2012. He then served as a game analyst, studio analyst and online writer for Fox Sports before joining CNN. Wire grew up just outside of Harrisburg, Pennsylvania, and he enjoys cheering on his Keystone State sports teams in addition to the Bills, Falcons, and Nerd Nation... the Stanford Cardinal.
Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Across America with Carol Costello
Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Situation Room
By Jessica Schneider, CNN Updated 12:51 AM ET, Sat September 30, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Washington (CNN)Trump administration lawyers are demanding the private account information of potentially thousands of Facebook users in three separate search warrants served on the social media giant, according to court documents obtained by CNN. Washington (CNN)Trump administration lawyers are demanding the private account information of potentially thousands of Facebook users in three separate search warrants served on the social media giant, according to court documents obtained by CNN. The warrants specifically target the accounts of three Facebook users who are described by their attorneys as "anti-administration activists who have spoken out at organized events, and who are generally very critical of this administration's policies." One of those users, Emmelia Talarico, operated the disruptj20 page where Inauguration Day protests were organized and discussed; the page was visited by an estimated 6,000 users whose identities the government would have access to if Facebook hands over the information sought in the search warrants. In court filings, Talarico says if her account information was given to the government, officials would have access to her "personal passwords, security questions and answers, and credit card information," plus "the private lists of invitees and attendees to multiple political events sponsored by the page." These warrants were first reported by LawNewz.com. Facebook went through seven months of legal proceedings so it could make all three of the Facebook users aware that the government attorneys wanted their online details. "We successfully fought in court to be able to notify the three people whose broad account information was requested by the government," a Facebook spokesperson said Friday. "We are grateful to the companies and civil society organizations that supported us in arguing for people's ability to learn about and challenge overly broad search warrants." The American Civil Liberties Union, representing the three Facebook users, filed a motion to quash the warrants Thursday. "What is particularly chilling about these warrants is that anti-administration political activists are going to have their political associations and views scrutinized by the very administration they are protesting," said ACLU attorney Scott Michelman. Facebook was initially served the warrants in February 2017 along with a gag order which barred the social media company from alerting the three users that the government was seeking their private information, Michelman said. However, Michelman says that government attorneys dropped the gag order in mid-September and agreed that Facebook could expose the existence of these warrants, which has prompted the latest court filings. Michelman, however, says all court filings associated with the search warrant, and any response from Facebook, remain under seal. The Justice Department is not commenting on these search warrants, but government attorneys have issued a similar search warrant to the web provider DreamHost seeking wide-ranging information about visitors to the website disruptj20.org, which provided a forum for anti-Trump protestors. In that case, DOJ modified its initial search warrant seeking millions of IP address for the visitors who merely clicked on the disruptj20.org website. But DC Superior Court Judge Robert Morin largely granted prosecutors' request to collect a vast set of records from the company, which will include emails of the users who signed up for an account associated with the website, and membership lists. In addition to the account of Talarico and her disruptj20 page, the search warrant also seeks all information about the personal accounts of Lacy MacAuley and Legba Carrefour. Carrefour is a self-described political activist and pushed back against the search warrant in court filings, saying that his Facebook account "contains a significant amount of private material concerning my personal life." Carrefour denied that he was involved in any of the riots in Washington, DC, on Inauguration Day, but acknowledged that he has "participated in or helped to organize dozens of demonstrations and events of various types in service of political causes."
Samantha Barry is the Executive Producer for Social and Emerging Media at CNN Worldwide. Barry leads the social teams at all of the CNN bureaus and works closely with the CNN Digital leadership in their editorial strategy. Her teams span publishing, newsgathering, digital and TV. Full Bio Samantha Barry is the Executive Producer for Social and Emerging Media at CNN Worldwide. Barry leads the social teams at all of the CNN bureaus and works closely with the CNN Digital leadership in their editorial strategy. Her teams span publishing, newsgathering, digital and TV. Under her leadership, CNN has become the most followed and fanned news organization in the world. She has led her team and the organization at large to do compelling work for social audiences on an array of platforms including Facebook, Snapchat, Twitter, Instagram, Line, Kik and other emerging media. While at CNN, Barry spearheaded CNN's 2016 Election coverage across social platforms, which received the first ever Edward R. Murrow Award for excellence in social media and a Webby Award recognizing the same 2016 campaign work. Born in Ireland, Barry has worked in over 25 countries, reporting and training other journalists in broadcasting, technology and social media. Barry joined CNN from BBC World News in London, where she served as a social media producer and journalist, focusing on using social media as a tool for both newsgathering and audience building. Barry previously worked as reporter and producer for RTE and Newstalk in Ireland. She's spent time in Papua New Guinea with the Australian Broadcasting Corporation (ABC) and has worked as a social media and technology trainer for the U.S. State Department, the United States Institute of Peace and Internews. Barry graduated from Dublin City University with a Masters in Journalism. She is a 2016 fellow of Columbia University School's prestigious Sulzberger executive program and is a guest lecturer at Yale. Barry is based in New York but continues her extensive domestic and international travels.
Arwa Damon is an award-winning senior international correspondent based in CNN's Istanbul bureau. Full Bio Arwa Damon is a senior international correspondent based in CNN's Istanbul bureau. As one of the network's Middle East specialists, Damon frequently reports from conflict zones across the Middle East and North Africa region, often focusing her work on humanitarian stories. Damon's coverage has latterly focused on the fierce fighting in Iraq between militant Islamist group ISIS and the Iraqi national army and associated paramilitary groups. Her reporting has proven essential, guiding viewers through the complexities of the bloody and ongoing conflict. In late 2016 Damon spent several weeks in Iraq covering the Mosul offensive. When traveling with Iraqi special forces into ISIS-held Mosul, the convoy came under attack multiple times forcing Damon and CNN photojournalist Brice Laine to seek shelter in a civilian house. For more than 28 hours Damon, Laine and the Iraqi soldiers were trapped by ISIS fighters who had surrounded the house. Damon, who kept notes throughout the battle, and Laine, who shot video throughout despite suffering minor injuries, were eventually rescued by the Iraqi military. Damon and Laine's reporting on this deadly attack was recognized with a prestigious George Foster Peabody Award for their "calm, clarity, and razor-sharp photography" on a story that demonstrates the "psychological burden of the ISIS reign of terror, especially on children." Their work was also recently honored with two Edward R. Murrow Awards in the 'Excellence in Video' and 'Reporting: Hard News' categories. A recipient of the International Women's Media Foundation's 2014 Courage in Journalism Award, Damon has also extensively covered the bloody civil war in Syria and the deepening humanitarian crisis which has spread across the region in its wake. Her reports have focused on -- amongst other subjects -- the refugee crisis across Europe, the effect of devastating 'barrel bombs' air raids on the civilian population of Aleppo and moves by Turkish security forces to reinforce the country's historically porous border with Syria. At the height of Europe's refugee crisis in 2015, Damon followed refugees from Syria and Iraq as they traveled by foot, boat and train across Hungary and neighboring countries. Her relentless - and moving - coverage demonstrating the dire situation these refugees were facing was recognized with an Emmy Award and Gracie Award in 2016. After Boko Haram kidnapped more than 200 Nigerian girls from a school in Chibok in April 2014, Damon travelled to West Africa -- including the islands of Lake Chad -- as the hunt for the Islamist militant group intensified. This enterprise storytelling contributed to CNN's 2015 Peabody Award, which recognized Damon's "high-risk field reporting" that made the network's coverage of this story "comprehensive and indispensable." In 2013 Damon travelled to the Odzala National Park in Congo where she filmed the documentary 'Arwa Damon Investigates: Ivory War', following an elite team of rangers as they track the poachers who kill thousands of endangered elephants each year. Following the attack on the US embassy in Benghazi in 2012, Damon was one of the first journalists to arrive at the scene, recovering from the ruins of the building the personal diary of slain Ambassador J. Christopher Stevens. The Investigative Reporters and Editors (IRE) presented Damon with their top award, the IRE Medal, for her in-depth reporting on the attack and its aftermath. Before moving to Istanbul, Damon was based at CNN's Beirut bureau and was part of the network's team covering the Arab Spring. For her work reporting on the popular uprisings in Egypt and Libya, Damon was awarded Emmy for Outstanding Live Coverage of a Current News Story, as well as a Peabody Award for "CNN's reporting of the Arab Spring including Worldwide Coverage: Egypt --Wave of Discontent and Uprising in Libya". Damon has also focused on environmental issues and visited the forests of central Indonesia for the special documentary 'Sumatra: Paradise Lost?' to uncover issues including deforestation and the threats of extinction that man species face. In 2015 Damon launched a non-profit organization, The International Network for Aid, Relief, and Assistance (INARA), based on her personal experience in war zones and war-torn nations. INARA focuses on building a network of logistical support and medical care to help children who have fallen through the cracks and need lifesaving or life altering medical treatment. As a result of INARA's incredible impact in a short period of time, Damon has recently been recognized with multiple awards including the 2017 James W. Foley Humanitarian Award; the World of Children's 2017 Crisis Award; the Syrian-American Medical Society's Humanitarian Award; and Time Warner's 2016 Richard Parsons Community Impact Award and Excellence in Service Award, which was voted on by the employees of Time Warner (parent company to CNN). Damon began her career at CNN in the network's Baghdad bureau. She was based in Iraq from 2003-2010, covering a number of landmark stories from Iraq including the deadly battle for Fallujah, the trial and execution of Saddam Hussein and the country's first national elections following the toppling of the Ba'ath regime. Before joining CNN, Damon spent three years covering Iraq and the Middle East as a freelance producer for various news organizations including Feature Story News (PBS) and CNN. Damon graduated with honors from Skidmore College in New York with a double major in French and Biology and a minor in International affairs. She was born in Boston, Massachusetts but spent most of her childhood in Morocco and Turkey. She is fluent in Arabic, French and Turkish.
Rosemary Church is an award-winning anchor for CNN International, with more than 25 years of experience covering major global events. Full Bio Rosemary Church is an award-winning anchor for CNN International, with more than 25 years of experience covering major global events. She can be seen on CNNI in the morning across Europe, Africa and the Middle East, and in the afternoon across Asia and Australia on 'CNN Newsroom,' which airs on CNNI and CNN/US Monday through Thursday from 8-9am GMT/ 3-4am ET. Based at the network's headquarters in Atlanta, Church has been with CNN since 1998. In that time, she has anchored all major world events that have unfolded across the globe, including the rise of ISIS in Syria and Iraq and the resulting coalition airstrikes against the militant group; the global fight against the deadly Ebola virus; the search for Malaysia Airlines Flight 370; the crash of Malaysia Airlines Flight 17 over Ukraine; the Arab Spring; Japan's 2011 earthquake and tsunami; the killing of Osama bin Laden; the capture of Saddam Hussein; the wars in Afghanistan and Iraq; and the September 11th terrorist attacks against the United States in 2001. In October 2014, Church and her colleagues, Nick Paton Walsh and Phil Black, won the best "Short News Report" category at the 2014 Association for International Broadcasting (AIB) awards in London. They received the award for their coverage of unrest in Ukraine, which involved a deadly shooting in Kiev's Independence Square during anti-government protests in early 2014. In June 2014, they were also awarded the prestigious Golden Nymph award for Best 24 Hour News Programme at the Monte Carlo Television Festival, for the same coverage. Church anchored all the main stories of 2013, including the Boston Marathon bombing and the manhunt that followed; Syria's civil war; North Korea's missile threat; and the death of South Africa's iconic leader, Nelson Mandela, as well as the days of mourning that followed. In 2012, Church anchored CNNI's coverage of the U.S., Egyptian and French elections, as well as the ongoing violence in Syria and instability in Egypt. On March 11, 2011, news broke of an earthquake in Japan - and possible tsunami - just as Church was starting her show. She anchored four hours of breaking news coverage, while the tragedy unfolded across the northeastern coast of the country. Earlier that same year, Church anchored breaking news of the Arab Spring, including the protests in Tunisia; the eventual fall of Egypt's Hosni Mubarak; the overthrow of Libya's Moammar Gadhafi in August and his eventual capture and killing on October 20. News of the death of Osama bin Laden broke on Church's watch in May 2011, and she also anchored CNNI's coverage of the death of North Korea's Kim Jong Il in December 2011. Some of the global news stories that Church covered in 2010 include the deadly earthquake in Haiti; Chile's earthquake and tsunami in February; the deadly plane crash in April that took the life of Poland's President; and the eruption of Iceland's volcano that disrupted global travel. In June 2009, Church did extensive anchoring on Iran's deadly uprisings, following the presidential elections. Just days after that, she reported on the sudden death of pop icon Michael Jackson. In 2006, Church anchored CNNI's coverage of the Israel-Hezbollah conflict, which later earned the network an Edward R. Murrow Award. Prior to joining CNN, Church spent five years as the Senior Anchor with Australia's first international satellite news service, Australia Television (ATV), also filing stories for ATV and the Australian Broadcasting Corporation's (ABC) Foreign Correspondent program, when she traveled to Asia. While at ATV, Church won the New York Festival's TV programming award for coverage of the Hong Kong Handover to China in 1997. Church started at ABC TV in 1991 as a reporter and anchor for the main evening news bulletin in the state of Tasmania, where she also anchored the summer edition of ABC TV's World at Noon program. Before this, Church spent five years at Parliament House, Canberra, with the National Media Liaison Service, while also anchoring weekend news bulletins on Channel Ten's news service. In 1984, she worked as a media officer and speechwriter for a Member of Federal Parliament. Born in Belfast, Northern Ireland, Church lived in London until her family moved to Australia when she was 8 years old. She has a Bachelor of Arts degree from the Australian National University in Canberra and has completed graduate studies in media and law at the University of Canberra. Church is married with three children.
Follow CNN's coverage as PyeongChang, South Korea, hosts the Winter Olympics, February 9-25, 2018.
Mark Preston is CNN's executive director of political programming and senior political analyst. He hosts "Full Stop with Mark Preston" on SiriusXM POTUS 124. Full Bio Mark Preston is CNN's executive director of political programming and senior political analyst. He hosts "Full Stop with Mark Preston" on SiriusXM POTUS 124. Preston joined CNN in 2005 as political editor and has received a number of prestigious honors, including Emmys -- in 2006 and 2012 -- for the network's award-winning election night coverage. In 2008, Preston played a key role in the network's Peabody Award-winning coverage of the presidential primary debates and campaigns. His work has also been recognized with several award nominations, including two Emmy nominations for CNN's 2008 political programming. Additionally, Preston's work contributed to CNN earning Syracuse University's i-3 Mirror Award for the YouTube presidential debates in 2008, a National Headliner Award in 2009, an EPPY Award in 2009, multiple Webby Award honors, and a Shorty Award in 2013. Before being named executive editor in 2014, Preston served as CNN's political director. Prior to joining CNN, Preston was a senior staff writer for the Capitol Hill newspaper Roll Call, where he worked for six years. His career also includes correspondent roles at States News Service, a wire service in Washington, and at the Marietta Daily Journal in Marietta, Georgia, where he won several Georgia Press Association and Georgia Associated Press reporting awards. Preston received two bachelor of art's degrees, in journalism and history, from the University of Massachusetts at Amherst.
By Thom Patterson, CNN Updated 3:10 PM ET, Thu January 29, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Imagine putting wings on the White House and getting it to fly around the world. CNN's Joe Havely contributed to this report. (CNN)Imagine putting wings on the White House and getting it to fly around the world. CNN's Joe Havely contributed to this report. It's been done. That's basically Air Force One in a nutshell. Now the Pentagon has announced the next generation of this world-class icon will be a military version of the 747-8. For nearly 30 years, the current jumbo jet Air Force One has been a customized version of the 747-200B. The newer 747-8 is longer and more efficient than its older brother. Why is a new one necessary? "It is time to upgrade," Air Force Secretary Deborah Lee James said in a statement Wednesday. The difference between the civilian version and what the President will fly on: the commander in chief gets a plane that's tricked out with top-of-the-line parts and backup systems. And a lot of technology that's -- well -- classified. Related: What's new about the 747-8? Let's remind ourselves why the world is so fascinated with this flying technological marvel. For more than half a century, passengers aboard the U.S. presidential aircraft have been witness to American history. Consider the fact that all these things happened on an Air Force One: -- President Kennedy's body was flown to Washington for burial. -- Lyndon Johnson was sworn in as president. -- LBJ let a reporter interview him in the plane's stateroom, while dressed only in a towel. -- The only woman ever to swear-in a U.S. president did so aboard Air Force One. -- President Richard Nixon became the first American president to visit China, where he historically opened the door to U.S.-Chinese relations. -- Air Force One served as President George W. Bush's command center during the first hours following the 9/11 attacks. One of the main goals for the new plane, the Air Force said, will be affordability. Although the plane is designed to be more fuel efficient than its predecessor a new 747-8 lists for around $368 million. Add all the presidential bells and whistles and the sticker price goes north rather quickly. The 747-8 is made in the U.S., which the Air Forced hinted was a plus. "The Boeing 747-8 is the only aircraft manufactured in the United States (that), when fully missionized, meets the necessary capabilities," Wednesday's statement said. The four-engine Airbus A380 -- the world's largest airliner -- which is made in France, was thought by some to be Boeing's only competition for Air Force One. When will the President get a new jumbo jet? Hard to say. If everything goes smoothly, Boeing likely will work with the Air Force on hammering out a timeframe and production schedule. In December, Boeing had 36 unfilled orders for 24 passenger versions and 12 freighter models. From humble beginnings as a small, less than impressively outfitted plane during the FDR administration, to its current jumbo jet status, Air Force One has become a world-class icon representing power and privilege. Members of Congress, celebrities and advocates clamor for seats on it, to get rare access to the President -- arguably the most powerful person on the planet. The plane's well-known blue and white color scheme was largely created by legendary industrial designer Raymond Loewy and approved by JFK himself. Officially, the aircraft is only called Air Force One while a sitting president is aboard. The presidential fleet includes several aircraft, other than the two 747s, that from time to time carry the "Air Force One" call sign. The presidential helicopter is operated by the Marine Corps and is often seen ferrying the President to and from the South Lawn of the White House. It's called "Marine One." On the rare occasion the President travels by Army aircraft, that is known as "Army One." By the same logic, aircraft used to carry the vice president are given the call sign "Air Force Two." Over the years, the various "Air Force Ones" have had their fair share of Hollywood screen roles. For example, the technological wizardry onboard the present 747s got wide play in the 1997 Harrison Ford action movie "Air Force One," in which the President's jet is hijacked by Russian nationalists. However, many of the more outlandish gizmos featured in the film owed more to, shall we say, artistic license than to airborne fact. The plane for example has no escape pod. Nor is it equipped with parachutes -- the massive slipstream created by an aircraft the size of a 747 means they can't be used. Designed to operate as independently as possible from ground services, the aircraft can fly halfway around the world without refueling. They carry their own automated baggage loaders as well as built-in front and aft stairs enabling them to operate self-sufficiently at airports and airfields around the world, minimizing security risks. Capable of in-flight refueling from airborne tankers, manufacturers say the aircraft has "virtually unlimited range" -- its passengers sustained by galleys capable of storing up to 2,000 meals at a time. The entire aircraft is shielded against the effects of electromagnetic pulse -- a wave of energy generated by the detonation of a nuclear device that can disable unprotected electronics. It features private accommodation, office space and a workout room for the President, first lady and family; as well as accommodation and offices for support staff and security personnel. Also on board is a stateroom and conference rooms that can, should it ever be necessary, be converted into a fully functional airborne medical center.
By Doug Criss, CNN Updated 8:53 AM ET, Thu October 5, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Thomas Gunderson was one of the almost 500 people wounded in the Las Vegas shooting attack at the Route 91 Harvest Festival last weekend. (CNN)Thomas Gunderson was one of the almost 500 people wounded in the Las Vegas shooting attack at the Route 91 Harvest Festival last weekend. He was hospitalized with a gunshot wound to the leg. Gunderson was laying in his hospital bed Wednesday when President Donald Trump and first lady Melania Trump swung by. The President and first lady went to Las Vegas to meet and talk with survivors of the shooting, as well as first responders, doctors and nurses during the visit. As Trump neared Gunderson's hospital room, the wounded man made it a point, despite his leg injury, to stand up when the President entered his room. "I will never lie down when the President of this great country comes to shake my hand!" Gunderson wrote on the Facebook video he posted of the brief meeting. "There may be plenty of issues in this country but I will always respect my country, my president and my flag. Shot in the leg or not, I will stand to show my President the respect he deserves!" The video has been viewed millions of times. In the video, Melania Trump enters the room first and greets Gunderson, who begins to get out of bed. She tells him he doesn't have to get up, but he insists. When the President comes into the room, Trump shakes Gunderson's hand and says "This guy looks tough to me." In a later post, Gunderson said he shared the video on Facebook, "with the intention of spreading an uplifting message during this horrific time in our country." Fifty-eight people lost their lives in the massacre at the country music festival, the worst mass shooting in modern American history.
By Peter Bergen, CNN National Security Analyst Updated 3:01 PM ET, Sat January 24, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Peter Bergen is CNN's national security analyst, a vice president at New America and professor of practice at Arizona State University. He is the author of "Manhunt: The Ten-Year Search for bin Laden -- From 9/11 to Abbottabad." (CNN)On Tuesday President Barack Obama will visit Saudi Arabia to pay his respects to the family of the now-deceased King Abdullah and to his successor, King Salman. Peter Bergen is CNN's national security analyst, a vice president at New America and professor of practice at Arizona State University. He is the author of "Manhunt: The Ten-Year Search for bin Laden -- From 9/11 to Abbottabad." (CNN)On Tuesday President Barack Obama will visit Saudi Arabia to pay his respects to the family of the now-deceased King Abdullah and to his successor, King Salman. This is a smart move by Obama and his foreign policy team. After all, the world's most absolute monarchy and the world's most powerful democracy have long been allies because they are bound together not, of course, by common values, but by common interests: The ready flow of reasonably priced oil and, more recently, the need to fight jihadist terrorist groups. However, a number of significant tensions have arisen in the U.S.-Saudi relationship, which a presidential visit likely will help to smooth over. The U.S.-Saudi marriage of convenience was first initiated on February 14, 1945, on a U.S. warship as it cruised in the Suez Canal. It was on the deck of the USS Quincy where President Franklin Delano Roosevelt first met with Saudi King Abdul Aziz to discuss areas of common interest. In the seven decades since that meeting, the relationship has largely worked well for both countries. During most of that time, Saudi Arabia provided economic support by ensuring a steady supply of oil and political backing for such American moves as the effort to repel Saddam Hussein's invasion of Kuwait and to seek a two-state solution to the Israeli-Palestinian conflict. The relationship took a nosedive after the revelation that 15 of the 19 hijackers on 9/11 were Saudis. But oil has a wonderful way of soothing even the most troubled waters. Even though the United States is not as dependent on Saudi oil as many countries are, the Saudis can choose to raise or lower their oil production and those decisions have substantial effects on global oil prices. That's because Saudi Arabia is the world's largest oil producer and it has around a fifth of the world's proven oil reserves. Today, as oil prices are tumbling to prices we haven't seen since the Great Recession of 2009, the Saudis have not lowered their production of oil, which is a great boon to the U.S. economy, even as the Saudis take a real hit resulting from their lower oil revenues. Many suspect that an equally important motive for the Saudi move is to weaken its arch-nemesis Iran, also a major oil producer. Despite Saudi oil policies that benefit American economic interests, the Saudi-American alliance--which was more like a melding of minds under the George W. Bush administration--has in recent years frayed. The Saudis remain irritated that Obama didn't follow through on his "red line" threat to take action against the Syrian regime of Bashar al Assad regime after it used chemical weapons on its population. Syria is an ally of Iran. The Saudis are also watching the continuing Iranian-American dialogue over Iran's nuclear program with great concern. They believe that the United States will get played by the Iranians and will allow them to retain some kind of nuclear capacity suitable for making a nuclear weapon. The Saudis are also still angry that the Egyptian dictator Hosni Mubarak was abandoned by the Obama administration during the "Arab Spring" of 2011. How would Washington react if the Saudi monarchy faced its own serious internal opposition: Would it too be thrown overboard? The Saudis have also long resented the largely uncritical embrace of Israel by both Republican and Democrat presidents. A common interest that overrides many of these differences is Syria, where both Washington and Riyadh are threatened by the rise of ISIS and also of al Qaeda's affiliate there, the Nusra ("Victory") Front. As of early 2014 some 1,200 Saudis had traveled to Syria, of whom 220 had returned to the kingdom, according to a senior Saudi official. As a result, there was great concern in the kingdom about the potential "blowback" problem posed by these militants with battlefield experience acquired in Syria. That's why Saudi Arabia made it a crime in early 2014 for its citizens to travel to fight in overseas conflicts such as the Syrian war. That move coincided with the appointment of Prince Mohammed bin Nayef to head the powerful Saudi Ministry of the Interior. Nayef, who al Qaeda's Yemeni affiliate tried to assassinate in 2009, has been an implacable foe of jihadist groups in the Arabian Peninsula, which has made him a vital ally of the United States. In many ways the real news about King Abdullah's death, which was long expected--as was the appointment of King Salman and his brother Muqrin as crown prince--was the appointment of the 55-year-old Nayef as deputy crown prince. This passes the torch of Saudi succession beyond the gerontocracy of King Abdullah's brothers to a new generation. It also strongly signals that the Saudi royal family values the firm stand on jihadist terrorist groups that is favored by Nayef and by Washington. That's why Saudi planes are now taking part in the U.S.-led coalition to bomb ISIS positions in Iraq and Syria. Saudi Arabia and the United States also have a strong interest in stabilizing the situation in Yemen. Houthi rebels have seized the Yemeni capital, Sanaa, and the largely pro-American government of President Hadi stepped down last week. Both the Saudis and the Americans regard the al Qaeda affiliate in Yemen as a real threat and they also are both watching with alarm as Houthi Shia rebels -- whom the Saudis view as stooges of Iran -- have taken over the Yemeni ministries that have played a key role in fighting al Qaeda. There will be much to discuss when the American President and his foreign policy team meet with the Saudi King and his advisers on Tuesday. Read CNNOpinion's new Flipboard magazine. Follow us on Twitter @CNNOpinion. Join us on Facebook/CNNOpinion.
Bob Van Dillen is the meteorologist for HLN's Morning Express with Robin Meade. He joined the network in September 2002. Prior to HLN, he was a meteorologist for local stations including WCNC (Charlotte, NC), WTVH (Syracuse, NY), and at WUTR (Utica, NY). His career began in Long Island, New York, as a forecaster for the Metro Weather Service. He received the American Meteorological Society (AMS) Seal of Approval in 1997.
By Julian Zelizer, CNN Political Analyst Updated 8:10 PM ET, Sun October 1, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Julian Zelizer is a history and public affairs professor at Princeton University and the author of "The Fierce Urgency of Now: Lyndon Johnson, Congress, and the Battle for the Great Society." He's also the co-host of the "Politics & Polls" podcast. The opinions expressed in this commentary are his own. (CNN)From the start of his administration, President Donald Trump has used presidential tweets as a wrecking ball that divides, insults and spreads false information -- confusing the nation in ways that potentially benefit his administration. Join us on Twitter and Facebook Julian Zelizer is a history and public affairs professor at Princeton University and the author of "The Fierce Urgency of Now: Lyndon Johnson, Congress, and the Battle for the Great Society." He's also the co-host of the "Politics & Polls" podcast. The opinions expressed in this commentary are his own. (CNN)From the start of his administration, President Donald Trump has used presidential tweets as a wrecking ball that divides, insults and spreads false information -- confusing the nation in ways that potentially benefit his administration. Join us on Twitter and Facebook And this weekend was no exception. With residents of Puerto Rico struggling to survive a humanitarian disaster, the President sent out a barrage of hate-filled tweets, invoking racial stereotypes and fueling division in the body politic. It would be a grave mistake to ask, as the media often does, whether this is another "distraction" from the serious issues confronting the Oval Office, an effort to shift public attention away from the President's more serious problems like the collapse of health care legislation or the growing tension with North Korea. But presidential tweets are in fact serious business, and they should be considered political acts of the first degree. Since the founding of the Republic, and even more so in the age of radio, television and now the Internet, presidential rhetoric is one of the most powerful tools that the commander-in-chief has at his disposal. The bully pulpit, a concept which Trump takes literally, allows the president to pit social groups against one another or to unite them, to convey critical information to help in times of trouble or to spread false information that skews public conversations, and to assist allies or delegitimize opponents. In other words, presidential rhetoric, including tweets, are incredibly significant, and every 140-character missive should be treated as a deliberate political move. What has President Trump done with his power to tweet? The most important use of this medium has been to stir social and political divisions, aggravating deeply rooted cultural tensions within the national psyche. We have seen this at numerous points in this presidency, including recently with his tepid response to white racist protesters in Charlottesville and his blasts against African-American players protesting racial injustice by kneeling during the national anthem. These are not "dog-whistles," but megaphones, which he uses to get across his message loud and clear. And in his latest tweet about Puerto Ricans, he appears to be comfortable using his words to reinforce obvious social stereotypes about their being lazy or "uppity" that are extraordinarily damaging. President Trump has also used his Twitter power to spread false information that strongly influences the national conversation. He understands that in the 24-hour news media environment, it is almost impossible for reporters to ignore what he says, and once they start discussing his latest attempt at shock and awe, it is hard to stop. As a result of several of his tweets, we have had national conversations -- and an official commission -- about massive voting fraud despite there being no evidence this has been a problem. We've also debated whether or not President Barack Obama wiretapped Donald Trump during the 2016 campaign, a claim that FBI officials dismissed. And during the health care debate, President Trump frequently made misleading claims about the legislation being considered, such as his promise that Medicaid spending would go up under the proposed bill. He later blamed the failure of the health care legislation on the filibuster, even though it was being considered under the rules of reconciliation which only require a majority vote -- a number the Republicans simply could not meet. Trump has also used the tweet as a bludgeon against his opponents. The tweets of this sort have ranged from his ongoing smear of the media as "Fake News" to his attacks against fellow Republicans in Congress, who he accuses of incompetency. And when it comes to foreign policy, we have seen some of the most dangerous effects of his tweets, as his escalating war of words with North Korea has heightened the potential for a serious military conflict in the near future. Just today, as news broke that the administration is trying to find a diplomatic solution to the crisis in North Korea, the President tweeted: "I told Rex Tillerson, our wonderful Secretary of State, that he is wasting his time trying to negotiate with Little Rocket Man...." When the President tweets, the world hears about what he has to say, and people are listening to a person who holds tremendous power and authority. Make no mistake about it, the words that a president chooses to use can matter as much as public policy. Those words can have long-term political and policy consequences. Never have we seen a verbal barrage like what we have witnessed since January. When historians look back at this presidency, Trump's Twitter feed will be the first thing they examine, an x-ray into the troubling soul and strategy of our Commander-in-Chief.
By Scott Bronstein and Drew Griffin, CNN Updated 10:15 PM ET, Wed February 11, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Car repair shops say auto insurance companies are coercing them to use cheap parts and sometimes dangerous practices to fix vehicles involved in accidents. Email your story ideas and tips to CNNTips@cnn.com. Watch Anderson Cooper 360 weeknights 8pm ET. For the latest from AC360 click here. (CNN)Car repair shops say auto insurance companies are coercing them to use cheap parts and sometimes dangerous practices to fix vehicles involved in accidents. Email your story ideas and tips to CNNTips@cnn.com. Watch Anderson Cooper 360 weeknights 8pm ET. For the latest from AC360 click here. Headlights held together by glue, dented rims and a new hood that's already coming apart are among the kinds of parts allegedly being pushed to go into cars as part of the repairs, according to some repair shops and attorneys general. Owners say the insurance companies steer their policy holders toward body shops that follow their rules, providing a vital source of business. And they add, if a body shop refuses to make the suggested repairs because of quality issues, the insurers steer their clients elsewhere. Major insurers deny the claims of impropriety. More than 500 garages from 36 states are joining in a lawsuit against the top insurance companies, and states like Louisiana, Mississippi and Oklahoma are also getting involved. Buddy Caldwell, attorney general of Louisiana, has filed suit against State Farm insurance, saying its low-cost repair program could be dangerous for customers who get back on the road in vehicles that are not roadworthy. He said he fears thousands of Americans could be driving round in vehicles repaired with what he calls junkyard parts after seeking repairs from body shops recommended by their auto insurance companies who took their premiums and picked up the bill. The issue is a nationwide one, said John Eaves, the lead attorney for the body shops involved in the lawsuit. "It involves people from Maine to Mississippi to California. Every state in the Union has experienced the same sort of struggle here between the body shops trying to do the work the right way, and the insurance companies trying to cut corners and force them to use unsafe parts and unsafe methods on their cars," he said. Risky business for shops, customers U.S. Sen. Richard Blumenthal, who used to be Connecticut's attorney general, says not only is there a potential for small businesses to be hurt, but he, too, believes cars repaired through insurance company's preferred service centers pose a safety risk. He has asked the U.S. Department of Justice to investigate. "The practice of steering involves jeopardy to the consumer because of the concern about parts," said Blumenthal, referring to the practice of steering customers towards certain preferred service centers. "Safety concerns are raised by this practice of steering because often it involves the use of parts that may be salvaged or inferior or even counterfeit and that is a real urgent and imminent safety concern for the consumer who may have no idea what the origin of the parts are, who made them, or even whether they're installed properly." "I have been concerned for years about it and why I think the Department of Justice should be investigating," he said. "I believe strongly that federal watchdog agencies have a role in protecting consumers because serious safety concerns are raised by this practice of steering often involving the use of inferior or even salvaged or counterfeit parts," Blumenthal said. John Mosley, an auto body shop owner in Clinton, Mississippi, explained how he saw insurance companies pushing consumers to "preferred" shops where repairs are done faster, cheaper, and at times unsafely. "The insurance industry has set up networks of shops, direct repair programs," he said. "And the way these shops' performance are measured is by the amount that it cost to repair cars at that particular shop. ... Just get the car in, make it look like it's fixed and get it out the door." Insurance companies can cut costs by approving recycled parts or those not made by the original car manufacturer. 'This is junk' In Parker Auto Body shop in Monroe, Louisiana, Matt Parker has plenty of examples. He takes a replacement Toyota Tacoma headlight out of its wrapping. It's clearly been damaged and later glued and screwed back together. "You can see right here where this bracket was knocked off from a previous accident," Parker told CNN. "It's got a hole in it here, and you can see where they screwed this bracket back on the vehicle. You can see here where all these parts were knocked off and glued back together." Parker pointed to a crack in the lens that he says will fill with water the first time it rains. "This came wrapped up, out of this box, like it was supposed to be a new part," he said. "The insurance company wants us to put this stuff on their cars. If we refuse to use the part, then they label us as a shop not willing to go along with their program, and then they try to steer our business away from us. "This is refurbished junk is what it is," he said. "This is junk." Louisiana Attorney General Caldwell said he chose to sue State Farm Insurance because State Farm is the biggest insurer in his state. In legal filings, the company denies all the allegations, including that it insists on using aftermarket parts. State Farm would not grant an interview, but said in a statement: "Our customers choose where their vehicles are going to be repaired. We provide information about our Select Service program while at the same time making it clear they can select which shop will do the work." State Farm told CNN to talk to Neil Alldredge, of the National Association of Mutual Insurance Companies, for more specifics. "It is just not in the economic interest of the insurer to have a car go in and out of an auto body shop three or four times to get it right," said Alldredge. "And so the notion that somehow this is meant to ... do shoddy work or to encourage the idea that we have to get it done quickly and move on to the next one really isn't in the insurance company's economic interest." When asked why insurance companies would require or recommend used parts, fixed parts, or aftermarket parts, he said: "Most companies don't require this. Most companies offer a choice to consumer. Any sort of aftermarket part that you might hear about are usually cosmetic parts. So they're nothing related to the safety, the mechanical parts of the operation of the vehicle. ... In many cases these parts are no different. They're made in the same factories. One just comes out with an auto manufacturer's name on it." He declined to comment on recycled parts -- such as the broken headlight CNN saw -- saying he did not know the circumstances. Alldredge said he did not believe "steering" was happening. He said a benefit of a preferred-shop program came for customers getting repairs done quickly, but it was always a customer's choice. "The insurance company may provide a list of auto body shops, and the customer can say, 'No. I wanna go to Joe's Body Shop around the corner.' And that's their choice. The issue of steering is already something that's not consistent with state law and not something that insurance companies do," he said.
Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds.
Tony is a News Editor at CNN's National Content Center in Atlanta, joining the network in 2000. He works with crews across the country facilitating live coverage and news gathering for TV and digital stories. Tony usually works on stories in the western part of the US, where he grew up.
By Doug Criss, CNN Updated 6:12 AM ET, Mon September 25, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Hurricane Maria's still out there -- and the devastation it's left in Puerto Rico is "apocalyptic." Here's how you can help the victims. And here's what you need to know to Get Up to Speed and Out the Door. (You can also get "5 Things You Need to Know Today" delivered to your inbox daily. Sign up here.) (CNN)Hurricane Maria's still out there -- and the devastation it's left in Puerto Rico is "apocalyptic." Here's how you can help the victims. And here's what you need to know to Get Up to Speed and Out the Door. (You can also get "5 Things You Need to Know Today" delivered to your inbox daily. Sign up here.) 1. NFL protests The NFL snapped back against President Trump's inflammatory criticism of players who protest during the national anthem. Dozens of players at all of Sunday's games either knelt or raised a fist during "The Star-Spangled Banner." Other players, often with team owners, locked arms. The Pittsburgh Steelers didn't come out for the anthem at all, but Steeler offensive lineman Alejandro Villanueva -- an ex-Army Ranger -- stood outside the tunnel with his hand over his heart while it played. Trump, unsurprisingly, didn't back down, saying owners "should do something" about the protests and that he thought it was "very disrespectful." Fans of America's most popular sport are divided too. Lots has been written about a white, conservative President lambasting protests in a sports league filled with African Americans, but Trump said his comments had nothing to do with race. Here's a piece that explores the unexpected connection between slavery, NFL protests and the national anthem. 2. Travel ban President Trump's controversial travel ban is out (it expired over the weekend), so new travel restrictions are in. The new restrictions hits travelers from eight countries: Chad, Iran, Libya, North Korea, Somalia, Syria, Venezuela and Yemen. In most instances, travel from these nations will be broadly suspended, while in other cases, travelers will have to undergo enhanced screening and vetting requirements. These new restrictions don't kick in until October 18. 3. Elections and referendums As expected, Angela Merkel won a fourth term as German Chancellor, but the story of the election was Alternative for Germany, a hard-right party founded just four years ago. It won enough votes to became the first far-right party to enter Germany's parliament since the 60s. It'll also be the third-largest party in parliament. Here's a piece on why the German elections matter to the rest of the world. There's another vote happening now that's worth watching: Kurds in Iraq are voting in a referendum on independence. The Kurds, who live in a semi-autonomous region in northern Iraq, are the country's largest ethnic minority. Tensions between them and the Iraqi government are high. So Iraq has blasted the referendum; so has Turkey, which also has a sizable Kurdish minority. Both countries fear a vote for independence in Iraq might galvanize other such movements. 4. Health care The drive to repeal and replace Obamacare is never quite dead. The newest last-ditch effort that GOP Senate leaders are considering involves tweaking the Graham-Cassidy bill to win over a couple of more votes. They've already lost Rand Paul and John McCain so they can't lose another one. They're hoping to win over Alaska's Lisa Murkowski -- who's leaning 'no' -- by loading the bill up with a few more Medicaid goodies for Native Americans and Alaska Natives in her state. Whatever they come up with, it has to be done this week. The deadline for repealing Obamacare through reconciliation -- meaning with just 50 votes and VP Pence as a tiebreaker -- is at the end of the month. The bill's architects, Sens. Lindsey Graham and Bill Cassidy, will debate Sens. Bernie Sanders and Amy Klobuchar in a CNN Town Hall Debate on health care. It starts at 9 ET tonight on CNN. 5. Church shooting A woman was killed and seven other people injured after a shooting at a church in Tennessee. A man shot and killed the woman in a parking lot just as services at Burnette Chapel Church of Christ in Antioch were ending. He then entered the church with two pistols and continued firing. He was stopped by a church usher. During the struggle with the usher, the suspect accidentally shot himself. The shooter, a Sudanese man with legal US residency, once attended the church. BREAKFAST BROWSE People are talking about these. Read up. Join in. Thanks for the memories Millennials, kiss another one of your 90s icons goodbye. The "Family Matters" house is being torn down. Cool and creepy? Walmart will not only deliver food to your house, but with a new service the retail behemoth will have someone put the food away too. Need a ride? Uber's been deemed not "fit and proper" for London so, for now at least, you may have to hail one of those stylish black cabs to get around the city. House hunters His daughters needed a playhouse, so this Michigan dad built one. It's two stories and comes with a bridge, a slide, hardwood floors and lights! AND FINALLY ... Slamma jamma Yes, we're knee-deep in football right now, but basketball season's right around the corner. So let's get ready with Bini the slam-dunking bunny. (Click to view)
Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Amanpour
Flora Charner is a producer and multimedia journalist for CNN based in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. Full Bio Flora Charner is a producer and multimedia journalist for CNN based in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. In her role, Charner is responsible for producing reports and features for CNN International's platforms from Brazil and Latin America. Some of the major news coverages she has produced with CNN include Rio de Janeiro's preparations for the 2016 Summer Olympics, the Zika outbreak, the socioeconomic crisis in Venezuela and the impeachment process of President Dilma Rousseff. Before joining CNN, Charner held writer and producer roles at Al Jazeera English, America's Quarterly and Associated Press Television in Brazil and Washington D.C. Charner graduated Cum Laude from Emerson College with a B.S. in Broadcast Journalism, and holds an M.A. in Politics from Columbia University's Graduate School of Journalism. She is fluent in English, Spanish and Portuguese.
Learn more about environmental impacts and the ways we use energy in our everyday lives.
By Scott Bronstein and Curt Devine,CNN Investigations Updated 9:51 PM ET, Fri September 4, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Memphis (CNN)Federal agents from Washington raided Memphis Goodwill this week as part of a growing national fraud investigation into AbilityOne, the top taxpayer-funded program that provides work to disabled workers, according to inside sources. Email your story ideas and tips to CNNtips@cnn.com. The AbilityOne program was first created with ambitious, altruistic goals by President Franklin D. Roosevelt and Congress in 1938 to help give jobs to the blind. CNN's Drew Griffin contributed to this report. Watch Anderson Cooper 360 weeknights 8pm ET. For the latest from AC360 click here. Memphis (CNN)Federal agents from Washington raided Memphis Goodwill this week as part of a growing national fraud investigation into AbilityOne, the top taxpayer-funded program that provides work to disabled workers, according to inside sources. Email your story ideas and tips to CNNtips@cnn.com. The AbilityOne program was first created with ambitious, altruistic goals by President Franklin D. Roosevelt and Congress in 1938 to help give jobs to the blind. CNN's Drew Griffin contributed to this report. Watch Anderson Cooper 360 weeknights 8pm ET. For the latest from AC360 click here. Watch the latest on the investigation into AbilityOne tonight at 8 p.m. ET on AC360. More than two dozen agents from numerous federal agencies drove onto the Memphis Goodwill headquarters on Wednesday, sealing the back of the property containing the corporate headquarters, which administers millions of dollars in Federal contracts throughout the Memphis metropolitan area. The fraud investigation into the government program was first detailed in an exclusive CNN story several weeks ago. AbilityOne and its management operation, SourceAmerica, are now under investigation by at least four separate Offices of Inspectors General, and also by the U.S. Department of Justice, according to inside sources. AbilityOne and SourceAmerica, and many of the contracts they administer, are being investigated over allegations of financial fraud, operating illegal contracts, not employing the legally required number of disabled workers, bid-rigging, contract "steering," and possible racketeering, according to sources. The program is one of the nation's largest taxpayer contracts programs, awarding some $2.3 billion annually to contractors across the country. Companies awarded the taxpayer-funded AbilityOne contracts are required by law to have 75% of their work performed by blind or severely disabled employees. But as many as half the contracts across the country may be operating illegally and not hiring enough disabled workers, inside sources tell CNN. One former top officer has stated repeatedly in recorded conversations that the entire program is run like organized crime. "That's the way they play the game. We are dealing with the Mafia here, the old SourceAmerica Mafia," said Jean Robinson, the former top attorney for SourceAmerica. She described the contract-awarding process as a "sham" driven by insider influence and cronyism. Robinson was later fired and sued by SourceAmerica and has not replied to CNN for comment. AbilityOne and SourceAmerica have denied wrongdoing in their operation and have issued numerous statements in recent weeks assuring their contractors and allies that there is no problem in the program. Officials in AbilityOne and SourceAmerica at first said they had no knowledge that any investigation was under way by the Justice Department. In recent weeks, the officials with SourceAmerica have confirmed the investigation is, in fact, ongoing. In the Memphis raid, the agents descended on the corporate offices just after 9 a.m., arriving in about 10 federal unmarked vehicles and escorted by the same number of Memphis police cruisers. The federal agents, wearing mostly black and brown unmarked federal police gear, moved their cars around the entire corporate offices, sealing in office workers and officers, and then had Memphis police create a "wedge" blockade of police vehicles, preventing anyone from entering or leaving. Agents moved in and out of the corporate offices, carrying in numerous empty boxes and large containers, while keeping nearly all the staff inside, where many were interviewed and asked about the operations. As the day wore on, workers inside the corporate office were let out, one by one. They left quietly, climbed into their cars, and were then allowed outside the police blockade. Almost none of the employees spoke to reporters, most simply waving and then departing. One man who was identified by Goodwill workers as the manager of the corporate office was escorted by agents several times to his black SUV, where he pulled out material and then went back inside. Eventually he was allowed to leave, looking shaken as he passed. When asked if he would comment to CNN he simply put up a hand and said, "No comment please. No comment." Another employee spoke to reporters, but said she had "no idea" why the agents were there and that they gave her no indication what was going on inside. Typical Goodwill stores and operations recognized by the public are not believed to be under investigation, but rather only the specific programs that get the lucrative AbilityOne contracts. The main Goodwill store at the location was not affected and remained open throughout the day. Only the corporate offices, where the millions of dollars of contracts are administered, were raided. Dozens of Goodwill employees from the main store were left bewildered and uninformed about what was happening at the headquarters. Since 2010, Memphis Goodwill Industries has received more than $22 million in AbilityOne contracts to provide services such as janitorial work for the IRS and Public Buildings Service and to operate call centers for the Department of Veterans Affairs, according to a government database of federal contracts. Memphis Goodwill continues to list job opportunities related to federal contracts on its website. Goodwill offices are among the major contractors in the AbilityOne program. Goodwill offices across the country receive hundreds of millions of dollars in taxpayer-funded contracts to conduct numerous operations ranging from sewing uniforms to conducting janitorial and cleaning services. But the Goodwill operations that receive the contracts appear independent from state to state, and the contracts are awarded to the local offices to administer. Goodwill is only one of hundreds of contractors nationally that receive the AbilityOne contracts. The Memphis raid, led by agents from the Office of Inspector General for the Treasury Department and the General Services Administration, is only the first of what are expected to be more raids nationally, sources tell CNN. The federal agents at the raid in Memphis declined to speak to reporters, and when asked if they could provide any information, they directed reporters to the U.S. Attorney's office in Memphis, a division of the Department of Justice. Calls to the U.S. Attorney's Office were returned by a spokesman, who told CNN "no comment" and would not confirm any information regarding the investigation. The AbilityOne and SourceAmerica program have been sued multiple times in recent years by contractors who allege the bidding process to get the lucrative contracts is "rigged," and inside favoritism and "steering" determines where the taxpayers' money is awarded. Several of the lawsuits also allege that the contractors who get the taxpayers' money are not operating legally and are not hiring the required ratio of disabled workers. AbilityOne and SourceAmerica have vigorously denied the validity of those claims, but sources tell CNN that contracts across the country are operating illegally and out of compliance, not hiring the required number of disabled workers. One manager overseeing employees working on an AbilityOne contract told CNN, "The majority of the individuals that were being hired were not severely disabled." "The jobs are being given to individuals who are able-bodied, who could go find employment anywhere else," the manager said. SourceAmerica and AbilityOne have both declined CNN's repeated requests for interviews. In a recent written statement, SourceAmerica denied the problems. "The allegations have no basis in fact, and are being advanced by two disgruntled nonprofit agencies through lawsuits and a PR campaign ... SourceAmerica has conducted and continues to conduct business with the utmost integrity and complies with all federal and state requirements," SourceAmerica said. In response to CNN's questions about Memphis Goodwill, AbilityOne said, "As a federal agency, the U.S. AbilityOne Commission does not comment on any federal investigations." Memphis Goodwill Industries President Tony Martini told CNN his organization is "working diligently alongside everyone involved to help them get the information they need. We're hopeful to know more soon." National representatives of Goodwill did not respond to CNN's request for comment.
Maribel Aber is a business correspondent for CNN Newsource and the "Money Talks" correspondent for HLN's daily news program "Michaela." Full Bio Maribel Aber is a business correspondent for CNN Newsource and the "Money Talks" correspondent for HLN's daily news program "Michaela." Aber also appears regularly on "Morning Express with robin Meade" and "Weekend Express with Lynn Smith." Aber covers business, money, personal finance and the economy from the perspective of how it affects families and consumers. She has also reported breaking news for CNN and covered stories including the China Market Crash in 2015, the Sandy Hook Elementary school shooting and Facebook IPO in 2012. She began her career with the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. (now known as FINRA) with a focus on securities regulation. Aber joined NASDAQ in 2000 as associate director, global sales & member services. Her work led to an appointment as chief of staff for the vice chairman of NASDAQ in 2001 and later promotion to vice president of the NASDAQ MarketSite, home of the NASDAQ Opening Bell. Aber was responsible for running the seven-story tower and broadcast studio. In her tenure at NASDAQ, she partnered with CNN in "America Votes 2004" live from the NASDAQ MarketSite and negotiated a partnership with Reuters Group Limited that combined the NASDAQ Tower and Reuters Sign properties to create the world's largest outdoor digital display system, located in Times Square. Prior to joining CNN Newsource in 2012, Aber was host and producer for "Wall Street Week" and entertainment host, correspondent and producer for The Broadway Channel covering the Tony Awards and all major red carpet events on Broadway. Aber was also a freelance host for AOL, MSN and the syndicated educational television show, Brain Fuel TV. Aber began her television career as a regular contributor on money and career issues for "The Better Show," a syndicated daytime television show produced by the Meredith Corporation, publisher of "Better Homes and Gardens," "Ladies Home Journal" and "Parents." Aber graduated from the University of Virginia with a bachelor's degree in foreign affairs and a minor in German. She earned her Juris Doctor from New York Law School.
Marian Liu is a senior multiplatform editor, managing the various platforms and social media for CNN Digital Worldwide, including CNNMoney, Media, Tech, Travel and Entertainment, in Hong Kong. Full Bio Marian Liu is a senior multiplatform editor, managing the various platforms and social media for CNN Digital Worldwide, including CNNMoney, Media, Tech, Travel and Entertainment, in Hong Kong. Currently, Liu covers Asian entertainment focused on K-pop, J-pop, Canto and Mando pop and Bollywood. Prior to joining CNN, she covered entertainment as an editor, critic and writer for The Sun Sentinel, The Seattle Times, San Jose Mercury News and Source Magazine. Liu has an executive MBA from the University of Washington and a bachelor of arts in Integrative Biology and Mass Communications from the University of California, Berkeley. She is based in Hong Kong.
By Sara Ganim, CNN Investigations Updated 12:50 PM ET, Fri September 18, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)As two Delaware teens recovering from pesticide poisoning struggle to eat, walk and sit up on their own, an investigation into what went wrong highlights failures on several levels, including lax oversight and a history of corruption at the U.S. Virgin Islands government agency in charge of exterminators. Methyl bromide is a restricted-use pesticide that the U.S. EPA has considered "highly toxic" for more than two decades. Inhalation of methyl bromide, even short-term, can cause severe lung damage, while long-term inhalation can lead to "neurological effects." Studies on lab animals caused degenerative lesions in the nasal cavity and had effects on the testicles of male animals. Source: EPA Email your story ideas and tips to CNNtips@cnn.com. The EPA has long known of the toxic effects of methyl bromide, and in 2005 banned it except for certain agricultural applications; before the ban took effect, there were several serious incidents involving Terminix. (CNN)As two Delaware teens recovering from pesticide poisoning struggle to eat, walk and sit up on their own, an investigation into what went wrong highlights failures on several levels, including lax oversight and a history of corruption at the U.S. Virgin Islands government agency in charge of exterminators. Methyl bromide is a restricted-use pesticide that the U.S. EPA has considered "highly toxic" for more than two decades. Inhalation of methyl bromide, even short-term, can cause severe lung damage, while long-term inhalation can lead to "neurological effects." Studies on lab animals caused degenerative lesions in the nasal cavity and had effects on the testicles of male animals. Source: EPA Email your story ideas and tips to CNNtips@cnn.com. The EPA has long known of the toxic effects of methyl bromide, and in 2005 banned it except for certain agricultural applications; before the ban took effect, there were several serious incidents involving Terminix. The teens and their parents fell gravely ill and suffered seizures during a March vacation to St. John. The family was exposed to methyl bromide, a restricted-use pesticide. Recovery from their nerve damage has been slow and agonizing for the whole family, but it's been the worst for the boys. The brothers were in medically induced comas for weeks. They are now conscious, family attorney James Maron said, but they are barely able to move. Six months after the horrifying incident, their father, Steve Esmond, is slowly getting better as well, but suffers from severe tremors, struggles to speak and can't turn the pages of a book, Maron said. "Neurologically, it's like being in a torture chamber," Maron said. Esmond and his boys are mentally "strong as an ox" and "100% cognizant," but they are trapped in bodies badly damaged by the nerve agent, Maron said. Prior to the incident, the boys were athletic stars at their schools. The older brother had big prospects playing lacrosse and was already touring colleges. Their mother, Teresa Devine, had less exposure to the toxic gas than the rest of the family and has made the strongest recovery, but she spends her days and nights keeping vigil over her boys. "They're extreme fighters, and that's why they're hanging on," Maron said. The family was on vacation at the Sirenusa resort on St. John when two employees of the local Terminix fumigated the villa below theirs March 18 with methyl bromide, even though it is not approved for residential use. After the family became ill, the Environmental Protection Agency found traces of the lethal gas in their villa. The exposure was so significant inside the treated unit that 6 weeks after the family fell ill, dangerous amounts of methyl bromide were still being detected inside the rental villa, according to EPA documents. Methyl bromide is incredibly toxic to humans, said Dr. Reynold Panettieri Jr., the deputy director for the Center of Excellence in Environmental Toxicology. "I would say the prognosis, at best, is guarded," said Panettieri, who has not personally treated the family. "As we know the victims have been off ventilators and they've been improved. But if that dose, even though it appeared to be acute, was over (a period of) hours, the damage to the nerves and to the brain itself may render it irreversibly damaged." Delaware boys in critical condition after resort illness, possibly from pesticide Maron said Terminix has agreed to enter mediation, done by Ken Feinberg, who negotiated the settlements for the victims of the September 11 attacks. Mediation begins September 28. What went wrong New details are emerging about the incident that so drastically sickened the Esmonds. Six others on the islands had mild symptoms of methyl bromide exposure -- headache, fatigue, cough and shortness of breath -- after the botched March fumigation of the Sirenusa resort. Four of those were emergency workers who helped the Esmond family, according to the EPA. CNN has also learned that the day the pesticide was applied, an exterminator tented and taped off the treated area of the resort villa with 6-millimeter plastic that the gas should not have been able to penetrate. A source familiar with the investigation speculated that the plastic could have come loose, and the chemical perhaps traveled through the air-conditioning system. According to documents received from the EPA in a FOIA request, the EPA also speculated about a gap in the ceiling of the lower unit's air conditioning unit, speculating that the gas may have traveled to the upper unit. Even so, methyl bromide should not have been used on a residential building in the first place. The pesticide manufacturer, Chemtura, told CNN that an odor is supposed to be added to methyl bromide before any use, much like the artificial odor added to natural gas so that people can detect it. But family attorney Maron said no odor was added in this instance. Terminix will not comment on that part of the investigation. CNN previously reported that methyl bromide was used across the islands on different occasions by Terminix. Other pest control companies on the Virgin Islands were found in possession of methyl bromide and officials said they are checking records to see whether it was used improperly. Ken Mapp, the governor of the Virgin Islands, said it was. "What these companies did or appear to have been doing is clearly a violation of the law, and they'll be held accountable for it," Mapp said. He said he learned his own complex was fumigated with methyl bromide in 2013. Methyl bromide is highly restricted because it's dangerous to the environment. It's only legal to use for agriculture. But pesticide experts tell CNN it's very effective on the powderpost beetle, which bores into wood and is prevalent throughout the islands. So even though it's not legal to use it in residences, some pesticide companies apparently fumigated with it anyway, according to Mapp. Sources tell CNN that there were two Terminix employees on the job at Sirenusa the day the Esmond family was poisoned. One, who was a Terminix salesman, has left the company. His job that day, sources say, was simply to help carry supplies. Pesticide probed in resort illness of Delaware family Jose Rivera, the applicator who used methyl bromide, was the branch manager of the corporate-owned location, and had been in the pest control business for at least a decade. He is on administrative leave. Neither employee has been charged with any crime, and neither would comment to CNN on the case. Workers who fumigate with methyl bromide are supposed to have special training, and they're supposed to file paperwork with the EPA, detailing how they plan to apply it, every time methyl bromide is purchased. But the key section of those EPA documents was left blank in this case, according to the family's attorney. The EPA says the forms stay with the distributor, who reports back to the EPA on how much methyl bromide has been sold on a quarterly basis. The EPA says this particular distributor "was not to our knowledge collecting applicator certifications and certainly was not reporting to EPA as a distributor." The distributor has not responded to CNN's requests for comment. The EPA, Terminix, and the local Department of Planning and Natural Resources all declined to specifically respond to that allegation, citing an ongoing investigation. A pattern of problems In the U.S. Virgin Islands, allegations of lax oversight by the Department of Planning and Natural Resources surfaced long before the Esmond family fell ill. The DPNR is the local environmental agency, which receives funding from and is regulated by the EPA. The DPNR has been riddled with corruption for years, and the EPA inspector general recently found deficiencies with the department related to management and oversight in several areas. In May of 2014, the EPA designated it "high risk," saying the agency "does not meet management standards." In addition, nearly $100,000 in federal funding that the DPNR received to train local pest control workers did not go toward training. That meant there were no classes whatsoever on the island of St. Thomas, where Terminix is based, according to the former director of the USVI Pesticide Safety Education Program, Joe Williamson. Pesticide applicators are supposed to be retrained every year in order to keep their certification. But because there were no available classes on the island, pest control workers were being recertified without being retrained, Williamson said. That was the case with Rivera, who applied the pesticide at Sirenusa. He was recertified in 2014 without taking additional training -- though Williamson says that even if the classes had been available, Rivera would not have been trained to use methyl bromide, because it's not supposed to be used indoors. The EPA said it was assured by the DPNR that the funds are in the process of being allocated correctly. The EPA also said that Rivera's certification history is under review by the DPNR. But this is just the latest problem with the DPNR. According to the Department of Justice, three DPNR officials -- a former commissioner and two directors -- have been sentenced to jail terms since 2008. That year, former Commissioner Dean C. Plaskett was sentenced to nine years for receiving kickbacks in awarding local government contracts. And in 2014, a director pleaded guilty to using his position to engage in illegal drug trafficking while he was head of environmental enforcement at DPNR. He was sentenced to 70 months in federal prison. But Mapp, who took office as governor of the territory in January, told CNN the misuse of methyl bromide had nothing to do with governmental failures but was the result of bad decisions on the part of the pest control companies. "It occurred because someone was cutting corners, thought they could enhance their profit margin and thought they could get away with it. And apparently in my own residence, someone had been getting away with it for quite some time," Mapp said. Williamson said the EPA bears responsibility as well. "EPA really needs to take the leadership on this, look at the mistakes that have happened here. And the very most important thing for them to do is to quit allowing methyl bromide and these other fumigants to be available to just about anybody with the certification card," Williamson said. EPA officials tell CNN that they are working on proposals to strengthen training requirements and certifications for people who use methyl bromide. What's changed Since this incident, the EPA and Terminix have done national inventories, checking for improper methyl bromide use, sources said. The EPA also had a meeting with every region in the nation about the case and sent out a safety alert to all states and territories, asking for "increased vigilance of distribution and use of methyl bromide to ensure the product is not being applied in residential settings." In a statement, Terminix said: "All of us continue have this family in our thoughts and prayers. We are cooperating with the authorities and conducting our own thorough investigation." The company also said it has taken steps to ensure this doesn't happen again, including halting fumigation in the U.S. Virgin Islands, reinforcing policies with employees and speaking to technicians about the specific products they use and how they're applied.
Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Anderson Cooper 360
By Manu Raju and Jeremy Herb, CNN Updated 10:45 PM ET, Fri October 20, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Washington (CNN)Senate intelligence committee investigators have spoken with several Russians who attended a June 2016 Trump Tower meeting with Donald Trump Jr., a sign that the matter remains a significant focus for lawmakers looking into potential coordination between Trump associates and Kremlin-linked operatives during the presidential campaign. CNN's Pamela Brown contributed to this report. Washington (CNN)Senate intelligence committee investigators have spoken with several Russians who attended a June 2016 Trump Tower meeting with Donald Trump Jr., a sign that the matter remains a significant focus for lawmakers looking into potential coordination between Trump associates and Kremlin-linked operatives during the presidential campaign. CNN's Pamela Brown contributed to this report. Sen. Richard Burr, the chairman of the Senate intelligence committee, told CNN that the panel has interviewed some of the Russians who were at that meeting, which Trump Jr. attended after being promised dirt on the Clinton campaign and being informed that the Russian government wanted his father to win the presidency. Paul Manafort, who was then the Trump campaign chairman, along with the President's son-in-law, Jared Kushner, also attended the meeting. The intelligence committee has previously met with both Kushner and Manafort, but has not yet brought in Trump Jr. Burr said the committee is "sequencing" its interviews to speak with everyone else "involved in the meeting before we know exactly what we want from Don Jr." Burr, R-North Carolina, would not say which Russians, or how many, investigators have spoken with. Committee officials declined to comment further. At the same time, a second Senate panel, the judiciary committee, which met privately with Trump Jr. last month, is trying to finalize plans to bring the President's son in for a public hearing -- something one committee source said could happen as soon as this month. Eight people attended the June 2016 meeting at Trump Tower, including British music publicist Rob Goldstone, as well as four people present as part of the Russian contingent: Russian lawyer Natalia Veselnitskaya, Russian-American lobbyist Rinat Akhmetshin, translator Anatoli Samochornov and Ike Kaveladze, who works for the Russian oligarch who initiated the meeting. CNN reported earlier this month that Akhmetshin was added the morning of the meeting at the request of Veselnitskaya, who wanted him present because of his knowledge about the Magnitsky Act -- US sanctions that Moscow wants lifted -- according to an email exchange between Veselnitskaya and Goldstone. Veselnitskaya's talking points for the meeting obtained by CNN show her focus was on the sanctions -- a matter of significant interest to the Kremlin -- with only a passing mention to the Clinton campaign. But emails leading up to the meeting between Trump Jr. and Goldstone paint a different picture. "The Crown prosecutor of Russia met with his father Aras this morning and in their meeting offered to provide the Trump campaign with some official documents and information that would incriminate Hillary and her dealings with Russia and would be very useful to your father," Goldstone wrote. "I love it," Trump Jr. responded. Representatives for the Russians at the Trump Tower meeting either declined or did not respond to requests to comment. Trump Jr. has downplayed the matter. The President's son said Veselnitskaya began the meeting by talking about "individuals connected to Russia" who were funding Clinton but she provided no details the support those claims, and the bulk of the meeting focused on the Magnitsky Act. "To the extent they had information concerning the fitness, character or qualifications of a presidential candidate, I believed that I should at least hear them out," Trump Jr. said in a statement to the Senate judiciary committee. Investigation close to finished? The June 2016 meeting is one focus of the Senate intelligence committee probe, as lawmakers continue to search for any links between Trump associates and Russians tied to Russian President Vladimir Putin. Some Republicans on the panel, like Idaho Sen. Jim Risch, believe the committee is close to reaching a dead end on the issue of collusion. "The whole Russia thing was an excuse for the Democrats losing the election," Trump said at the White House this week, as he has in many past instances. "There has been absolutely no collusion. It's been stated that they have no collusion. They ought to get to the end of it because I think the American public is sick of it." But Democrats say there is far more to investigate -- including the circumstances around the Trump Tower meeting. And the senators want to bring Kushner, along with Manafort, back to Capitol Hill for another round of questioning. "The members of the committee have not even had a chance to talk to the vast majority of those individuals, and we could tick through those names -- you know the names as well as I," Virginia Sen. Mark Warner, the Democratic vice chairman of the committee, said Thursday. "We're going to, again, let the facts take us where the truth leads." Burr said the committee is making progress but did not say if he agreed with Risch that the investigation is at a point of "diminishing returns." "The list of folks that we have to talk to is smaller than it was when we started," Burr told CNN. "It'll be over when we finish. And so -- and so there's no chunking of people off the list because we see a pattern as to what the final product looks like." He added, "We have a responsibility to check to check everybody that might have any information that's pertinent to the areas that we're looking at. We're not going to stop until we've seen all of them."
Alex Marquardt is an award-winning Senior National Correspondent based in the network's New York bureau. Full Bio Alex Marquardt is an award-winning Senior National Correspondent based in the network's New York bureau. Since rejoining the network in May 2017, he has helped lead the network's domestic and international breaking news coverage of the Las Vegas massacre, the historic hurricanes Harvey and Irma and the London Bridge attack. Marquardt spent most of the past decade as a foreign correspondent for ABC News based in Beirut, Jerusalem and Moscow. During that time, he was on the front lines of the wars and uprisings in the Middle East, he reported on the unfolding refugee and migrant crisis and covered the wave of terror attacks across Europe. Marquardt was the first American broadcast correspondent in Cairo as the Egyptian Revolution exploded, he made many trips into Syria to report on the war from both the regime and rebel sides, he was on the ground in Gaza in 2012 and 2014 during the wars with Israel and traveled across Ukraine as Russia's military moved in. Before his overseas career, Marquardt was an "embed" reporter with CNN during the 2008 presidential election. He traveled with and covered a number of candidates, including then-Senators Obama, Biden, and Clinton, as well as Governors Romney and Huckabee. Marquardt has won Emmy and Edward R. Murrow Awards, notably for an undercover investigation of underage sex trafficking in the Philippines. Marquardt got into journalism first as an NBC Page and then later as an anchor for Channel One News. He graduated from Georgetown University's School of Foreign Service after growing up Europe and the Middle East.
By Scott Bronstein and Gary Tuchman, CNN Special Investigations Unit Updated 8:04 PM ET, Fri May 31, 2013 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. All evidence pointed police to one conclusion: A priest had killed a beautiful 25-year-old schoolteacher. Searchers had found the lifeless body of former Miss South Texas, Irene Garza, face down in a canal in her hometown of McAllen. She'd disappeared on the day before Easter after going to Sacred Heart Catholic Church for confession. An autopsy determined Garza had been raped while in a coma, and then had died from suffocation. Near Garza's body investigators found items that belonged to the church, including a candelabra. One item, a metallic Kodak slide photo viewer, belonged to a 27-year-old priest who was assigned to the church: the Rev. John Feit. To say the scandal rocked McAllen is an understatement. Questioned by police, Feit failed lie detector tests. What was also suspicious was that just 24 days before the killing, Feit had been arrested for attacking another young woman at a church in a town about 10 miles from McAllen. Feit pleaded no contest to misdemeanor aggravated assault. A judge found him guilty and fined him $500 with no prison time. All this took place in 1960. See a timeline of the case Now, more than half a century later, Feit lives in a pleasant neighborhood in Phoenix, after leaving the priesthood in the late '60s. In a sworn statement to authorities and during an interview with CNN, Feit denied he killed Garza. Feit told police Garza left the rectory after he heard her confession and the last time he saw her, she was standing outside the church. But to this day, police officers and law enforcement agencies that have dealt with the case say they believe Feit killed her. For folks growing up in McAllen at the time, it was unthinkable that a Catholic priest would commit such a crime. That's the way Garza's cousins remember it. "We were accusing a priest that -- in those days priests were infallible, " said Lynda De La Vina, who was 9 years old at the time. Another cousin, Noemi Sigler, was only 10 when Garza was killed. "It was impossible for a priest to do such a deed. I mean, if you thought of it, that would be sacrilegious." But Feit was the likely suspect, said former Texas Ranger Lt. Rudy Jaramillo, who started investigating the murder in 2002 when he served with a Rangers cold case unit. The evidence, he said, "suggests and indicates that that's who it's pointing to." Authorities at the time protected Feit, said Sigler. "I don't know whether it was out of respect for the church or anger or fear, I have no idea," she said. Shortly after the killing, the church transferred Feit far away to a monastery. He would be moved to other locations over time, and about three years after the killing, the church transferred Feit to Our Lady of Assumption monastery in Ava, Missouri. Sheltering Feit "was about protecting the church and somehow believing that the church takes care of their own," said De La Vina. "It was the best that could have happened at that point. Because nothing else was being done." Sigler describes her view in more succinct terms: It was "a cover-up." An assistant to the bishop at the Brownsville, Texas, Catholic Church diocese that oversees McAllen told CNN that Garza's death happened so long ago that no one at the diocese has any direct knowledge about it. The assistant said the diocese would always cooperate in every way with the investigation. For De La Vina and Sigler, the killing opened their young eyes to a world that did not appear to offer equal justice under the law. Trying to make sense of what seemed like chaos, De La Vina became a "little detective," trying to figure out what really happened by eavesdropping on conversations and looking for clues. Her father was a local sheriff's deputy and she joined the search during the five days when the town was desperately looking for Garza. "I actually went out with my dad in one of the search parties ... I was so afraid I'd find her." "He put his whole heart and soul into trying to find her because he really liked the parents, the family," she recalled. One day Sigler says she realized her beloved cousin wasn't coming back. "Maybe that's why I started off on the journey to find out who killed Irene Garza," she said. During the next four decades, Sigler made it her mission to knock on doors, interview witnesses and catalog every piece of evidence in the case. The case got colder over the years and eventually faded from the headlines. But the cousins kept pushing until 2002, when the Rangers and Jaramillo reinvigorated the investigation. Hopes for solving the case were never higher. Two surprise witnesses had independently come forward -- each separately claiming that they heard Feit confess. One witness -- a priest named Joseph O'Brien -- worked with Feit at Sacred Heart, where Garza's family worshiped. "We knew he was dangerous, so we shipped him off to a monastery," O'Brien told Sigler during a recorded phone conversation obtained by CNN. "So he told you also, sir, that he had killed her?" asked Sigler. "Yes," O'Brien answered on the recording. Sigler could only respond, "Oh my God." When asked if he believed O'Brien was a good, credible witness, McAllen Police Chief Victor Rodriguez responded, "Absolutely." As O'Brien first shared his story with Rodriguez, the chief noticed, "the lifting of a ... heavy burden that he'd carried for a long time," Rodriguez said. The other witness to come forward was Dale Tacheny, who had served as a monk and Feit's spiritual counselor at the Missouri monastery where Feit had been sent. Tacheny told authorities it had taken him 40 years to come forward because the guilt had become too much to keep quiet. In bits and pieces, Tacheny told authorities -- and also CNN in an exclusive interview -- that Feit told him about a woman whose story sounded very similar to Garza's. According to Tacheny, Feit said he had heard confession from a young woman shortly before Easter. Feit offered to take the woman to the rectory, Tacheny said, where Feit sexually assaulted her, bound and gagged her, fondled her breasts, and put something over her head. "That's what he did," said Tacheny. The former monk said Feit told him he took Garza to a separate location, where he was living, and hid her there, bound, overnight. The next day Feit needed to return to the church for more confessions. Tacheny said Feit told him he took Garza, who was bound and wrapped in plastic and "put her in the bathtub ... and as he was leaving, she was saying, 'I can't breathe. I can't breathe.'" Tacheny said. "Then later on that day -- which was Easter Sunday -- he came back and she was dead in the bathtub." Tacheny said Feit told him he dumped the woman's body near the canal. He asked Feit why he was living at a monastery and not in prison. "'The church protected me, the people in the church, my superiors, protected me,'" Tacheny quoted Feit as saying. "I believe he killed her," said Tacheny. "I had no doubt about it because he said he did." Roadblock With all this seemingly overwhelming testimony from two independent witnesses, Jaramillo was ready to make an arrest. He said he had even written out the warrant. But first, he wanted a green light from the county district attorney. But that man, Rene Guerra, has thrown a roadblock in front of the case, said the cousins. Guerra did not bring the case before a grand jury for years, despite the blockbuster testimony from O'Brien and Tacheny. "They're not credible," Guerra said. Worried about winning a conviction, Guerra said he wants a slam-dunk conviction. Guerra said he's not protecting the church. He questioned O'Brien's state of mind. In his 70s at the time, O'Brien, Guerra said, was senile. "I didn't trust his mind," Guerra said. "It wasn't that I didn't trust the priest. As far as I know he was a good priest." Guerra also doubted O'Brien's credibility because he had changed his story. Years earlier O'Brien had lied to police. O'Brien said he had withheld information alleging that Feit committed the killing. Jaramillo didn't think O'Brien was senile. In fact, he said he thought O'Brien had a "remarkable memory" when he interviewed him in 2002, and agreed with McAllen Police Chief Rodriguez that O'Brien was "very credible." O'Brien told police he felt bad about lying years earlier. Guerra also discounted Tacheny's story. He said it wasn't believable because Jaramillo -- the ex-Texas Ranger -- fed Tacheny information that he didn't obtain from Feit. That's impossible, said George Saidler, who at the time was a San Antonio Police homicide detective. Saidler said Tacheny called him in April 2002 and told him the whole story. That phone call occurred months before Jaramillo says he ever heard of Tacheny. Saidler, now deputy chief of criminal investigations for Bexar County Sheriff's Department, said he believed Tacheny's story. "I was convinced," he said. Eventually, in 2004, a grand jury did hear the case. But in a shock to the Garza family, Feit wasn't called to testify. Neither were the new witnesses, Tacheny and O'Brien. However, jurors did receive transcripts of Tacheny and O'Brien's version of events. A year later, O'Brien, age 77, died. The grand jury voted not to indict Feit. The Garza family was crushed. 'I promised her' Now, years later, Jaramillo, Sigler and De la Vina have had time to assess their battle to have Feit charged. "I wish we'd won," Jaramillo said thoughtfully. "I made it my goal to try to solve this case," said Jaramillo. "I wanted justice for her." De La Vina isn't giving up. She said she still believes one day Feit will face murder charges. For Sigler, after it was clear the grand jury was not going to indict Feit, she acknowledged, "We started losing belief in the justice system." That led to a trip Sigler made to the cemetery where Garza is buried. After researching and pushing the case for nearly two decades, she was ready to call it quits. Standing at Garza's grave site and feeling her presence, it hurt, Sigler remembered, because, "I promised her I'd never leave her. I'd never leave her behind." Suddenly a beautiful white dove landed nearby and looked straight at her. Sigler was certain the bird was a sign from the beautiful, young schoolteacher whose life had been cut short. "So I told Irene, 'OK, Irene I got the message ... I'll keep on.'"
By Hannah Lang, Eli Watkins and Madison Park, CNN Updated 3:29 AM ET, Fri September 15, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Washington (CNN)Harvard Kennedy School has rescinded its invitation to Chelsea Manning to be a visiting fellow at the school this fall, according to a statement from its dean, Douglas W. Elmendorf. honored to be 1st disinvited trans woman visiting @harvard fellow  they chill marginalized voices under @cia pressure  #WeGotThis https://t.co/7ViF3GaSec good  #WeGotThis https://t.co/UGBAPmnaHM CNN's Rahwa Asmerom, Katishi Maake and Jennifer Rizzo contributed to this report. Washington (CNN)Harvard Kennedy School has rescinded its invitation to Chelsea Manning to be a visiting fellow at the school this fall, according to a statement from its dean, Douglas W. Elmendorf. honored to be 1st disinvited trans woman visiting @harvard fellow  they chill marginalized voices under @cia pressure  #WeGotThis https://t.co/7ViF3GaSec good  #WeGotThis https://t.co/UGBAPmnaHM CNN's Rahwa Asmerom, Katishi Maake and Jennifer Rizzo contributed to this report. Its Institute of Politics had announced on Wednesday that Manning would be one of approximately 10 visiting fellows, but the school withdrew the offer early Friday morning following controversy. Manning is still invited to spend a day at the Kennedy School and participate in a forum with students, but Elmendorf said in a statement that designating her as visiting fellow was "a mistake." He said the school hadn't intended to honor her or "endorse any of her words or deeds, as we do not honor or endorse any Fellow." "I see more clearly now that many people view a Visiting Fellow title as an honorific, so we should weigh that consideration when offering invitations," he stated. "I apologize to her and to the many concerned people from whom I have heard today for not recognizing upfront the full implications of our original invitation." On Thursday, CIA Director Mike Pompeo canceled an appearance at a Harvard forum after taking issue with Manning's inclusion in its upcoming class of visiting fellows. Pompeo, a graduate of Harvard Law School, said in a letter that appearing at the event after Harvard's announcement on Manning, who was found guilty of leaking classified information, would "betray" his conscience and the trust of the people of the CIA. "I believe it is shameful for Harvard to place its stamp of approval upon her treasonous actions," Pompeo wrote. Manning was released from prison in May after then-President Barack Obama commuted her 35-year sentence -- a decision met with anger from those who consider her a traitor for giving information to WikiLeaks, and praise from those who argued she was persecuted for her whistleblowing. In response to the rescinded offer, Manning tweeted that she was "honored to be 1st disinvited trans woman visiting @harvard fellow." Former CIA Deputy Director Michael Morell likewise had taken issue publicly with Harvard's decision. He resigned as a senior fellow at Harvard University after the school's announcement. Elmendorf's office confirmed to CNN that Morell had resigned his role. In a letter obtained by CBS News -- Morell is a contributor for the network -- Morell said he could not be part of an organization that "honors a convicted felon and leaker of classified information." In leaving his role with Harvard's Belfer Center for Science and International Affairs, Morell further explained in his letter that he felt he had an obligation to defend sensitive national security information and that the school's decision to appoint Manning as a fellow would "assist in her long-standing effort to legitimize the criminal path that she took to prominence." Efforts by CNN to reach Morell were unsuccessful. Responding to Morell's resignation, Manning tweeted "good" with the hashtag #WeGotThis. Morell, who worked at the CIA for decades, also said that he fully supports Manning's rights as a transgender woman and her right to serve in the military, as well as the right of Harvard's Institute of Politics to invite anyone they choose for the fellowship program. Pompeo wrote in his letter that his decision had "nothing to do" with Manning's gender identity. Former White House press secretary Sean Spicer was also announced as a visiting fellow for the year, along with Hillary Clinton's 2016 presidential campaign manager and current CNN political commentator Robby Mook and Kansas City Mayor Sly James Jr., Harvard said in a news release Wednesday.
Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Connect the World
Sarah LeTrent is the Digital Producer for CNN Original Series and Films. Previously, she was a writer/producer for CNN Digital's Features team.
Richard Quest is CNN's foremost international business correspondent and host of Quest Means Business, which airs Monday to Friday at 4pm ET / 9pm BST on CNN International. Full Bio Richard Quest is CNN's foremost international business correspondent and anchor of Quest Means Business, the definitive word on how we earn and spend our money. Based in New York, he is one of the most instantly recognizable members of the CNN team. He also presents Quest Express, a new business show broadcast weekdays at 12pm ET / 5pm BST from the floor of the New York Stock Exchange. Quest Express offers a quick-fire briefing on the latest market movements and business stories, building a bridge between the close of the European trading day, the opening of the markets in New York, and the start of the business day in Silicon Valley. Additionally, Quest serves as CNNMoney's editor-at-large and files a global daily newsletter - 'CNNMoney Presents: Quest Means Business' - timed to the open of the Asia markets. Quest Means Business, which airs weekdays at 4pm ET / 9pm BST on CNN International, destroys the myth that business is boring, bridging the gap between hard economics and entertaining television. CEOs and global finance ministers make a point of appearing on QMB. Guests of the show have included world leaders such as David Cameron and Petr Necas of the Czech Republic; the biggest names in banking such as Jamie Dimon of JP Morgan Chase and Robert Zoellick, the former President of the World Bank; European policy makers including IMF boss Christine Lagarde, former EC President Jose Manuel Barroso, and former IMF chief Dominique Strauss-Kahn; and some of the most influential names in corporate America including DreamWorks CEO Jeffrey Katzenberg and former Ford CEO Alan Mulally. Quest's dynamic and distinctive style has made him a unique figure in the field of business broadcasting. He has regularly reported from G20 meetings and attends the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland each year. Quest has covered every major stock market and financial crisis since Black Monday in 1987 and has reported from key financial centers globally including Wall Street, London, Sao Paolo, Tokyo and Hong Kong. In addition, Quest is the established airline and aviation correspondent at CNN. He has interviewed all of the major airline executives including former Delta CEO Richard Anderson, Qatar Airways CEO Akbar Al Baker, AirAsia CEO Tony Fernandes and Emirates CEO Tim Clark. He has covered a number of breaking aviation stories like the downing of Malaysia Airlines Flight MH17 in Ukraine, the Virgin Galactic SpaceShipTwo crash and the disappearance of Malaysia Airlines Flight MH370. Quest is the author of 'The Vanishing of Flight MH370: The True Story of the Hunt for the Missing Malaysian Plane,' which details his unique perspective on covering MH370 for CNN. He also presents the monthly CNN Business Traveller show, the definitive authority on making the most of doing business on the road - moving from A to B on company time. As a business travel specialist, Quest has become a voice of authority on subjects like the launch of the Airbus A380. The United Nations World Tourism Organization (UNWTO) awarded Quest the 2013 UNWTO Award for Lifetime Achievement in recognition of his work as a business journalist reporting on the tourism industry. On the political front, Quest covered the 2016 U.S. presidential election campaign with his own series, 'American Quest,' in which he travelled across the battleground state of Florida interviewing a diverse range of voters in the weeks leading up to the election. Quest is also the face of CNN's coverage of major UK events. Last year he led CNN's coverage of the 'Brexit' vote, and has continued to report on the impact the historic vote is making on markets, economies and businesses. In 2012 he guided an international audience through the Queen's Diamond Jubilee celebrations live from the banks of the River Thames and used his expert knowledge of the British Royal Family to front the channel's coverage of the 2011 marriage of Prince William and Kate Middleton, now the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge. His coverage of breaking news, which has spanned more than two decades, has seen him report on a range of stories from, the death of Yasser Arafat, the Lockerbie Pan Am 103 crash to the death of Michael Jackson. Quest is more than just business; there are few journalists who have had guests as varied, from His Holiness, The Dalai Lama to actress Joan Collins to founder of Playboy Magazine, Hugh Hefner. Prior to joining CNN, he worked at the BBC, where he was the North America business correspondent, based on Wall Street for 12 years. Quest is British, holds an LLB (Hons) degree in Law from Leeds University, and was called to the Bar.
By Holly Yan, Masoud Popalzai and Catherine E. Shoichet, CNN Updated 4:13 PM ET, Thu June 5, 2014 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Dressed in all white with a striped shawl across his shoulders, the gaunt American looks up at the Black Hawk chopper circling overhead. Armed Taliban men stand around him, one with a rocket-propelled grenade launcher ready. When the chopper lands, the American is led there by two men, one carrying a white flag. He is given a pat-down, loaded on to the helicopter and whisked away. A new video released by the Taliban showed the final moments of Army Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl's five years in captivity, just before he was handed over to the United States. As debate over the circumstances surrounding Bergdahl's release showed no signs of slowing Wednesday, the video revealed intriguing clues about Bergdahl, his Taliban captors and his American rescuers. The narration on the video says the transfer took place in Khost province, in eastern Afghanistan. "We had a number of tribal elders with us ... in order to build trust between us and the other side," a voice in the video says. "We told them that we had warned all our Mujahideen fighters in Khost province and especially in Batai area not to attack them." The 17-minute video also showed an unusual sight: Taliban members shaking hands with men from the Black Hawk. The Pentagon said Wednesday it has no reason to doubt the video's authenticity. "But we are reviewing it," Pentagon spokesman Rear Adm. John Kirby said. "Regardless, we know the transfer was peaceful and successful, and our focus remains on getting Sgt. Bergdahl the care he needs." Mike Baker, a former covert operations officer for the CIA, said there's a clear purpose behind the video. "The Taliban doesn't operate in a bubble. They don't live in a cave. They understand the importance of social media. They understand the importance of marketing and public relations," he told CNN's Brooke Baldwin. "This is a scripted propaganda piece for them. ... And so they're doing this, in a sense, to show their credibility, to show their strength as warriors to their supporters, and to try to use it as a recruiting tool." Bowe Bergdahl: Strong, well-rounded and easy to talk to, friends say Surrounded by Mujahideen At one point in the video, Taliban members start chanting, "Long live Mujahideen of Afghanistan, long live Mullah Omar, the leader of Taliban." Mujahideen refers to those who carry out jihad. The narrator's voice said armed fighters were stationed throughout the transfer area. "We waited in the area for around 10 minutes before the helicopters arrived, and there were 18 Mujahideen fighters with me in the area," the narrator said. Indeed, the video showed armed men perched high and low on nearby hillsides. "Our arrangement was that once the helicopters are on the ground, three people from the other side would get off the helicopter and three from our side, including the captive, would move toward the helicopter to hand him over." The video has few words in English, other than this message superimposed over Bergdahl: "Don'come back to afghanistan" Narrator in video: 'He was fine' In the video, the narrator also gives his opinion about an issue that's become a focal point since Bergdahl's release: the soldier's health. "They first asked us about the health condition of the captive and told us to tell them the truth if he was not well, but we saw him, that he was fine, and we told them that," the narrator says. Since announcing Bergdahl's release over the weekend, Obama administration officials have repeatedly said they fast-tracked the operation over concerns about his health and safety, which appeared to be in jeopardy. Recent intelligence, in addition to two proof-of-life videos of Bergdahl released in recent months, led to growing concern about his health and safety, a senior defense official said Wednesday. Chris Voss, the FBI's former lead international hostage negotiator, said that might have been exactly what Bergdahl's captors wanted. "You expect the hostage-takers to make it look like the hostage is in bad shape so that they can drive a better bargain, and clearly it looks to me that's what they did here," he told CNN's "The Lead with Jake Tapper" on Wednesday. Deserter or hero? National Security Adviser Susan Rice said Bergdahl served with honor and distinction. But there's a growing chorus of criticism from some who served with him, describing him as a deserter. "I believe that he totally deserted not only his fellow soldiers, but his leadership that wanted the best for him and for our country," said former Army Staff Sgt. Justin Gerleve, who was Bergdahl's squad leader. Some soldiers involved in operations to find Bergdahl have said at least six soldiers were killed searching for him. Asked about this point, Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel told reporters Wednesday that he did not know of specific circumstances or details of soldiers dying as a result of the efforts to find Bergdahl. Gerleve told "The Lead" that he believes Bergdahl is at least partly to blame for the soldiers' deaths. "I can't really say I blame Bergdahl to fullest extent, but if he wouldn't have deserted us, these soldiers very well could have been in a different place at a different time," he said. An Army fact-finding investigation conducted in the months after Bergdahl's 2009 disappearance concluded that he left his outpost deliberately and on his own free will, according to a U.S. military official briefed on the report. The official spoke to CNN on Tuesday on the condition of anonymity due to the sensitive nature of the information. There was no definitive finding Bergdahl deserted because that would require knowing his intent -- something Army officials couldn't do without talking to the soldier. On Wednesday, a U.S. official said that commanders referred to Bergdahl as a "good soldier" in that initial fact-finding report, and that fellow soldiers said he'd left the post on other occasions. The official, who has been briefed on the investigation, said the report said that Bergdahl had mailed his computer and other items home before his disappearance, but his motivation was unclear. Hagel said Wednesday that it's "unfair" to Bergdahl and his family to presume anything about his motivations for leaving the base. He reiterated that the Army will conduct a review of the case. Hagel spoke with Bergdahl's family via telephone Wednesday, a senior Defense official told reporters. The defense secretary reassured them that Bergdahl would continue getting support with regard to his medical care and reintegration, and that the department was focused on their son's health, the official said. Bergdahl will remain at a U.S. Army medical center in Germany until he completes treatment, a U.S. defense official there told CNN. After that, Bergdahl will return to the United States and go to a San Antonio military base, the official said. As the debate over Bergdahl showed no sign of slowing Wednesday, his hometown of Hailey, Idaho, canceled a "Bowe is Back" event planned to celebrate his return "in the interest of public safety." Organizers, the city said, expected a large number of supporters and protesters to increase attendance. "Hailey, a town of 8,000, does not have the infrastructure to support an event of the size this could become," the city said. Controversial swap Bergdahl's captors handed him over to the United States in exchange for the release of five prisoners held at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba. The Gitmo detainees swapped for Bergdahl: Who are they? Both Democrats and Republicans have criticized the deal, arguing that it puts American lives at risk by releasing terrorists and accusing Obama of breaking the law by not notifying Congress 30 days in advance. Administration officials have said they consulted the Justice Department and acted legally. But some Republican lawmakers have said they're not buying that argument, and want proof that Bergdahl's health was really in jeopardy. "This American is going home to his family," Sen. Marco Rubio told CNN's "The Situation Room" before heading into a classified Senate briefing on Bergdahl on Wednesday. "These five members of the Taliban are going back to the battlefield." Afterward, Rubio and several other Republicans told reporters that the briefing had done nothing to stem their skepticism. "I remain increasingly convinced that the President has now set a precedent that will encourage enemies of the United States to target American men and women in uniform," he said. Rep. Debbie Wasserman Schultz, chairwoman of the Democratic National Committee, said criticism from lawmakers who'd long been pushing for Obama to help bring Bergdahl home is "disingenuous." "We had intelligence, from everything that I understand ... that this was our last, best opportunity, that he was potentially on death's door. Looking at grainy video is not a way for us to determine that. But from everything I understand, this was our last best opportunity," she said. John Bellinger, a former State Department legal adviser in President George W. Bush's administration, told CNN that the prisoner swap deal was "defensible." "This is one of those tough national security situations that presidents face," he said, "where all the options are bad." Clinton wanted a tougher deal with Taliban for Bergdahl? Was Bergdahl swap legal? Depends on who you ask Bowe Bergdahl: A deserter or a hero?
By Tony Marco, CNN Updated 12:07 AM ET, Fri October 20, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)A federal judge on Thursday rejected Joe Arpaio's request to erase a criminal contempt conviction from his record, saying a presidential pardon of the former sheriff didn't change the facts of the case. CNN's Darran Simon and Tal Kopan contributed to this report. (CNN)A federal judge on Thursday rejected Joe Arpaio's request to erase a criminal contempt conviction from his record, saying a presidential pardon of the former sheriff didn't change the facts of the case. CNN's Darran Simon and Tal Kopan contributed to this report. Arpaio, the former top lawman in Maricopa County, Arizona, for more than two decades, was spared a jail sentence when he was pardoned by President Donald Trump in August after being convicted of criminal contempt. The 85-year-old was accused of violating a court order in a 2007 racial profiling case by continuing patrols targeting immigrants. The former sheriff claimed the court wasn't clear and he didn't intend to violate it. Soon after the President's pardon, Arpaio's attorneys filed a motion seeking to erase all record of the conviction, but U.S. District Court Judge Susan Bolton denied the request. RELATED: Ex-Sheriff Joe Arpaio's fate in criminal contempt trial rests with judge "The power to pardon is an executive prerogative of mercy, not of judicial recordkeeping," Bolton wrote in the document. "To vacate all rulings in this case would run afoul of this important distinction." "The pardon undoubtedly spared Defendant from any punishment that might otherwise have been imposed. It did not, however, 'revise the historical facts' of this case," she wrote. Bolton handed down a guilty verdict in the former sheriff's criminal contempt case in July. Arpaio, who lost a bid for his seventh term in 2016, faced up to six months in jail. Sentencing was set for October 5. Jack Wilenchik, one of Arpaio's attorneys, said they plan to appeal Bolton's order. "The sheriff views it as a form of resistance to the President's pardon, and I view it as a resistance to the law," Wilenchik told CNN late Thursday. Wilenchik explained there is legal precedence that says the judge has to vacate the rulings in the case because it was pardoned. "We think the law is very clear and think it will be interesting to see what the government decides since they have already agreed with us on this case," he said. The former sheriff was a vocal proponent of Trump's candidacy, and used his national platform to advocate for Trump's similarly aggressive stance on deportations and border security. The President's pardon drew an outcry from civil rights groups, which accused the former sheriff of violating the constitution in his crackdown on illegal immigration.
Christina Macfarlane is a sports correspondent and anchor for CNN International, based in the London bureau. Full Bio Christina Macfarlane is a sports correspondent and anchor for CNN International, based in the London bureau. Since joining CNN in 2010, Christina has covered numerous major live sports events and sports news stories, including the 2016 Olympics in Rio de Janeiro, the 2012 Olympics in London and Leicester City's momentous Premier League win. She also presents two monthly feature shows for the network: CNN's Alpine Edge and CNN World Rugby. Christina plays a key role in CNN's coverage of tennis and has often reported from Wimbledon and the French Open. She has interviewed winners such as Serena Williams, Novak Djokovic, Rafa Nadal and Andy Murray. She also reported from the 2015 Rugby World Cup and on football's European Championships in both 2012 and 2014. Before becoming a correspondent Christina was a Producer on CNN's Living Golf feature show. Christina started her career in production, working on the European and PGA Tour for European Tour Productions and Sky Sports as part of their live broadcast operation. She has a Master's Degree in Broadcast Journalism from City University. Christina has a lifelong passion for sport and is a qualified ski-instructor. Born in Surrey, she now resides in London.
By Eric Bradner, Barbara Starr and Ed Lavandera, CNN Updated 8:52 PM ET, Thu March 26, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Washington (CNN)House Speaker John Boehner said Army Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl is "innocent until proven guilty" after the U.S. military charged him with desertion and misbehavior before the enemy, but emphasized in an exclusive interview with CNN's Dana Bash that he was more concerned about the circumstances of his release. CNN's Ted Barrett and Alexandra Jaffe contributed to this report. Washington (CNN)House Speaker John Boehner said Army Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl is "innocent until proven guilty" after the U.S. military charged him with desertion and misbehavior before the enemy, but emphasized in an exclusive interview with CNN's Dana Bash that he was more concerned about the circumstances of his release. CNN's Ted Barrett and Alexandra Jaffe contributed to this report. Bergdahl's attorney also released a statement on Wednesday, outlining his defense of the soldier and containing a two-page letter from Bergdahl describing the torture he endured, which included months spent chained to a bed and further years spent chained on all fours or locked in a cage. Shortly after the charges were announced, Bergdahl's attorneys released a lengthy statement that includes a letter sent to Milley earlier this month outlining their defense of the soldier. "In light of the nearly five years of harsh captivity Sgt. Bergdahl endured, the purpose of his leaving his unit, and his behavior while a prisoner, it would be unduly harsh to impose on him the lifetime stigma of a court-martial conviction or an other than honorable discharge and to deny him veterans benefits," attorney Eugene R. Fidell writes in the letter. The statement includes a two-page accounting from Bergdahl of his time in captivity, in which he recounts months spent chained to a bed, then further years spent chained on all fours or locked in a cage. Read the statement and Bergdahl's letter Bergdahl said for years his body and health declined due to malnourishment, and sores on his wrists and ankles from the shackles grew infected. "My body started a steady decline in constant internal sickness that would last through the final year," he said. Bergdahl was frequently beaten, at times with copper wire or a thick rubber hose, and forced to watch Taliban videos, he said. He had no concept of time, and was repeatedly told he would be killed and would never again see his family. "I was kept in constant isolation during the entire five years, with little to no understanding of time, through periods of constant darkness, periods of constant light, and periods of completely random flickering of light and absolutely no understanding of anything that was happening beyond the door I was held behind," he wrote. Bergdahl tried a dozen times to escape, he wrote. In his interview with Bash, Boehner said "like any American, you're innocent until proven guilty." "And these charges are coming. There will be a trial," Boehner said in an interview taped Wednesday to air Sunday on CNN's "State of the Union." Boehner said the "more troubling part" of Bergdahl saga is the fact that the U.S. government traded five Taliban fighters for Bergdahl's release, and that recent reports indicate one has returned to the battlefield. He expressed concerns about other detainees held at the U.S. military prison at Guantanamo Bay, which President Barack Obama is working to close, "ending up back on the battlefield and threatening Americans here and abroad." Obama "violated the law" in failing to alert Congress before the prisoner swap occurred, Boehner added. "And I still believe that's the more troubling part of this," he said. "We've made clear in the past that we won't negotiate with terrorists, and but yet here we did." Military officials announced Wednesday afternoon they would charge Bergdahl with one count each of desertion and misbehavior before the enemy. Bergdahl left his post in Afghanistan before being captured and held captive for five years. For that, he faces charges that carry a maximum penalty of life in a military prison, and he could also have to forfeit pay and be stripped of his rank, Army Col. Daniel King said as he announced the charges. Bergdahl faces a military procedure similar to a grand jury that will whether charges are appropriate, King said. Then, he could face court martial proceedings. The decision comes nearly a year after Bergdahl returned to the United States as part of a prisoner exchange and since the Army began a formal investigation into his disappearance from his unit in eastern Afghanistan in June 2009. The Army concluded its investigation into the circumstances of Bergdahl's capture in December. Until now, it has been in the hands of Gen. Mark Milley, head of U.S. Army Forces Command, who made the decision to charge Bergdahl. Several U.S. military officials CNN has spoken with suggested privately that the process took longer than expected. READ: Bowe Bergdahl Fast Facts Ahead of Wednesday's announcement, officials said Milley only had a few choices. Though the sense had been that Bergdahl must be held accountable for his actions, there had been little appetite for a lengthy term in military confinement given the five years Bergdahl was held by the Taliban. Now 28, Bergdahl was taken by the Haqqani terrorist network. But the circumstances of Bergdahl's departure from his base and how willingly he left have not been clear. King said he couldn't offer those details on Wednesday, and that they're being treated as evidence for the upcoming proceedings against Bergdahl. Senate Armed Services Committee Chairman John McCain, R-Arizona, called the charges an "important step" on Wednesday. "This is an important step in the military justice process towards determining the accountability of Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl," he said in a statement. "I am confident that the Department of the Army will continue to ensure this process is conducted with the utmost integrity under the Uniform Code of Military Justice." READ: Officials: Detainee swapped for Bergdahl suspected of militant activities Sen. Lindsey Graham, R-South Carolina, meanwhile, lambasted the "unevenness" of Obama's swap of five Taliban prisoners for Bergdahl. "I wouldn't have done this trade for a Medal of Honor winner," he told CNN. "No military member should expect their country to turn over five Taliban commanders to get their release. Nobody should expect that. It's not the nature of his service that drives my thinking it's just the illogical nature of the swap." Some members of Bergdahl's platoon have criticized him, labeling Bergdahl a deserter. "I was pissed off then, and I am even more so now with everything going on," former Sgt. Matt Vierkant, a member of Bergdahl's platoon when he went missing on June 30, 2009, told CNN last year. "Bowe Bergdahl deserted during a time of war, and his fellow Americans lost their lives searching for him." Bergdahl was freed in May when President Barack Obama agreed to swap five Taliban prisoners who had been detained in Guantanamo Bay to secure Bergdahl's freedom, sending those detainees to Qatar. Obama announced Bergdahl's release to fanfare in the White House Rose Garden, flanked by the Army sergeant's parents, Bob and Jani Bergdahl. His hometown of Hailey, Idaho, had planned a parade to celebrate Bergdahl's homecoming but later canceled that celebration amid security concerns stemming from the unanswered questions surrounding his disappearance and the resulting controversy over his release. READ: Bowe Bergdahl returns home -- to a long road ahead After returning to the United States, Bergdahl had been on active duty at an administrative job at Fort Sam Houston in San Antonio, Texas. There, the Army assigned Bergdahl a "sponsor" to help him adjust to life in his new post. Upon returning, Bergdahl refused to meet with his parents -- and months later, Army officials had said he was communicating with them but still had not met them face to face. The five figures the United States exchanged to secure Bergdahl's release were Khair Ulla Said Wali Khairkhwa, Mullah Mohammad Fazl, Mullah Norullah Nori, Abdul Haq Wasiq and Mohammad Nabi Omari. They were mostly mid- to high-level officials in the Taliban regime and had been detained early in the war in Afghanistan because of their positions within the Taliban, not because of ties to al Qaeda. The detainee swap for Bergdahl has become increasingly controversial in recent weeks after a report published by the office of Director of National Intelligence James Clapper said one of the 17 intelligence agencies operating under its umbrella had judged that a prisoner released in the exchange had since contacted the Taliban.
Christina Ginn, CNN Updated 3:28 PM ET, Mon September 7, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)An American held captive by Houthi rebels in Yemen has now been identified as Scott Darden. (CNN)An American held captive by Houthi rebels in Yemen has now been identified as Scott Darden. A source close to the family with direct knowledge of the case identified Darden, 45, as one of the captives. The source tells CNN that Darden was taken hostage in March of this year by Houthi rebels, and so far they have not asked for a ransom. Darden was captured while working for the New-Orleans based company Transoceanic Development, according to the unnamed source. Darden was born and raised in Atlanta, Georgia, but has been living abroad for the last couple of years. The family is working directly with the State Department and with Darden's company. "We are aware of reports that several U.S. citizens are detained in Yemen. Due to privacy considerations, we do not have any further personal details or information to share. The protection of U.S. citizens overseas is one of the Department of State's highest priorities. We strive to assist U.S. citizens detained abroad whenever possible," the U.S. State Department said. Transoceanic Development issues a statement Monday, saying, "We have been working tirelessly since March with governments and other organizations globally to secure the release of Scott Darden, who was in Yemen coordinating the warehousing and delivery of humanitarian aid as part of his job in international logistics. We continue to call on the Houthis to immediately release Scott so that he can be reunited with his family."
Jessica Schneider is a justice correspondent based in Washington, D.C. Full Bio Jessica Schneider is a justice correspondent based in Washington, D.C. In addition to being an award-winning journalist, she is also an attorney. Schneider was one of the first on the ground to cover the Orlando Nightclub Shooting, and reported extensively on the Cincinnati Zoo's gorilla incident, and its potential legal implications. Prior to joining CNN, Schneider worked as a reporter at WCBS-TV in New York City where she covered legal issues and law enforcement. Schneider was one block from the Boston Marathon finish line in 2013, celebrating her brother's completion of the race, when the bombs went off. She reported from the scene all week, and went back to Boston for the one-year anniversary of the attack. Schneider's legal expertise was at the forefront during WCBS' continuing coverage of the Etan Patz murder trial in New York City; she live tweeted the courtroom proceedings where cameras weren't allowed, and walked viewers through the legal wranglings of the 17-day jury deliberation that ended in a mistrial. Schneider was honored with an Emmy Award for her Continuing Coverage of the Return Home New Jersey initiative by Governor Chris Christie. For 9 months, and over the course of 6 separate stories, Schneider interviewed anxious parents of disabled adults, questioned and confronted Governor Christie and his appointees, and provided detailed analysis of the program that would have forced hundreds of disabled people into group homes in New Jersey, removing them from the facilities around the country that they had lived in for decades. As a result of the media coverage, and a relentless push from parents, Governor Christie backed down in July 2015, canceling the Return Home New Jersey program. Schneider worked for two years as a litigation attorney at two New York City law firms, focusing on the defense of product liability, construction and catastrophic injury matters in New York and New Jersey. Schneider attended the University of Connecticut School of Law where she was an Articles Editor for the Connecticut Journal of International Law, was one of 40 law students chosen to work at the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission in Washington, D.C., and represented criminal defendants in Connecticut courts as part of the Criminal Clinic at UConn Law. Upon graduating with honors in 2010, Schneider took and passed the New York and New Jersey bar exams, and was admitted to practice law in both states as well as their federal courts. Schneider began her career as a video journalist at the Time Warner cable channel Capital News 9, now YNN/Time Warner Cable News, where she worked as Amsterdam, NY Bureau Chief and Political Reporter. Schneider attended law school while working as Weekend Morning Anchor and Reporter at WFSB-TV in Hartford, Connecticut. Schneider is originally from Manchester, Connecticut where she credits her high school news program, MHS TV News, with inspiring her and fueling her passion for journalism. Schneider graduated from Boston University in 2002 with degrees in Political Science and Broadcast Journalism, and was honored to be chosen to give the Commencement Address for the College of Communication. Follow Jessica on Twitter: @SchneiderCNN
Steven Jiang is CNN Beijing Bureau's senior producer. Full Bio An English-Chinese bilingual journalist, Steven has worked in Asia and the United States for almost two decades. Now based in China, Steven is CNN's senior TV producer at the network's Beijing bureau. His profile on a mother fighting for gay rights in China and another report on China's crackdown on dissent both received the merit awards at the 15th Human Rights Press Awards in Hong Kong in 2011. In addition to his regular reporting from around China, Steven has covered Japan's worst nuclear crisis in history and the Arab Spring unrest in the Middle East for which the CNN team received a prestigious Peabody Award. More recently, he managed the network's coverage on the missing Malaysian airliner from China and the sunken passenger ferry from South Korea. Before returning to CNN in 2010, Steven covered Asia - as a producer or a correspondent - for CBS News, NBC News, France24 and Singapore's Channel NewsAsia. From 1999 to 2005, he spent nearly six years producing for CNN in Atlanta and Beijing. Steven moved to the United States from China as a teenager. He graduated with honors from Northwestern University with majors in journalism and international studies.
By Aimee Lewis, CNN Updated 10:46 AM ET, Thu October 26, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)It was an incident which led to widespread condemnation. Questa non  una curva, questo non  calcio, questo non  sport. Fuori gli antisemiti dagli stadi. pic.twitter.com/Q1uJnDQ7Cl (CNN)It was an incident which led to widespread condemnation. Questa non  una curva, questo non  calcio, questo non  sport. Fuori gli antisemiti dagli stadi. pic.twitter.com/Q1uJnDQ7Cl On Sunday, during a leading football match in Europe, fans of Italian club Lazio posted stickers around Rome's Stadio Olimpico depicting Holocaust victim Anne Frank wearing the shirt of city rivals Roma alongside anti-Semitic slogans. The head of Rome's Jewish community, Ruth Dureghello, tweeted a picture of the stickers, writing: "This isn't the terraces, this isn't soccer, this isn't sport. Kick anti-Semitism out of the stadiums." Italian President Sergio Mattarella was widely reported to have called the case "alarming for our country," while Lazio players will wear an image of Frank on their shirts during the warm-up to Wednesday's Serie A match against Bologna. In a statement on the club website, Lazio president Claudio Lotito said the move showed the team's commitment to fighting "all forms of racism and anti-Semitism." According to Italian newspaper Gazzetta dello Sport, Lotito has also promised that the club would organize an annual trip for 200 young fans to Auschwitz, where more than one million people were murdered in a Nazi concentration camp. Italian police is investigating Sunday's incident, and using the stadium's surveillance cameras, has identified 15 people, two of which are minors. All are possibly facing charges of incitement to racial hatred. Passage of diary to be read out Frank was a German-born Jewish teenager who kept a diary of her time in hiding in Nazi-occupied Amsterdam before she was killed at the Bergen-Belsen concentration camp in 1945. "We are shocked by these anti-Jewish expressions, which are extremely painful to those who have experienced the consequences of the persecution of the Jews," said a statement published on the Anne Frank website. "Fighting football-related anti-Semitism is part of our educational activities. We are pleased to see that others, including Italian football clubs, have expressed their indignation about this action." In response to Sunday's incident in Rome, the Italian Football Federation (FIGC) has announced plans to hold a minute's silence before all Serie A, B and C matches this week while a passage from Frank's diary is read out over loudspeakers. The excerpt that will be read out says: "I see the world being slowly transformed into a wilderness; I hear the approaching thunder that, one day, will destroy us too. "I feel the suffering of millions. And yet, when I look up at the sky, I somehow feel that everything will change for the better, that this cruelty too shall end, that peace and tranquility will return once more." In a statement, the FIGC said their move was part of their commitment "for a civil society so that young people in particular are brought up with the correct values." Visit CNN.com/sport for more news and videos 'New low in Italian football' Hardcore Lazio fans, called "ultras," have a history of anti-Semitic behavior, while racism is still a problem in Italian football. In April, Ghana midfielder Sulley Muntari left the pitch during a top-flight Italian game after being booked for complaining of being abused by a section of fans. Academic Alberto Testa, who spent time with Lazio and Roma ultras for the book "Football, Fascism and Fandom: The UltraS of Italian Football," described Sunday's incident as a new low in the history of Italian football. He also doubted that Lazio's gesture would help eradicate racism and anti-Semitism in the country, questioning why it was only in September 2017 that Italy's lower house of parliament approved a bill aimed at curbing fascist propaganda. READ: Muntari would support player boycott READ: Anti-racism campaigner criticizes Italian authorities "It's a big disease, racism in Italian society," Testa told CNN Sport. "They are cultural problems and they are problems connected with how society is structured. It is a very complex issue and when I speak about this I say that the stadium in Italy -- and let's not forget that this infiltration of the right is a problem in Europe -- reflects what happens in society. "If politicians don't condemn racism, if the media continue to use the 'N-word' and treat this episode as banter then we will never resolve this problem. "Yes, Lazio has reacted very strongly. It's very good what they did. But we need to send a strong signal that this thing is not acceptable. They [the fans responsible] need to be banned for life from the stadium. "Anne Frank is not only a symbol of the tragedy of the holocaust but also a kid. This is a new low in the history of Italian football and racism." According to a report published in April, the number of anti-Semitic incidents in the US in the first three months of this year was 86% higher than the same period last year. However, while cases of violence and harassment against Jews ticked up significantly in the US, they were down worldwide, according to a report by the Kantor Center. READ: The small Swedish club attracting a global Kurdish following Cases of violence against Jews worldwide dipped 12% last year, from 410 incidents in 2015 to 361 in 2016, the report says.
Stephanie Elam is a correspondent for CNN based in Los Angeles. Elam made her return to the network in 2013 after spending a year with KNBC Los Angeles. Full Bio Stephanie Elam is a correspondent for CNN based in Los Angeles. Elam made her return to the network in 2013 after spending a year with KNBC Los Angeles. Elam has recently covered the shooting of unarmed teenager Michael Brown in Ferguson, MO, the Donald Sterling scandal of the Los Angeles Clippers owner's racist remarks, weather related emergencies including the EF5 tornado which killed 15 adults and 9 children while devastating the town of Moore, Oklahoma; as well as numerous fires in California, flooding in Arizona, and sub-zero temperatures in Minnesota. She was one of the first reporters on the scene after a shooting at Los International Airport stranded thousands of travelers and took the life of TSA agent Gerardo Hernandez, marking the first on-duty death since the security organization was created in 2001. Additionally, Elam was responsible for reporting on 19 firefighters killed in a wildfire in Prescott, Arizona, informing the world of the largest loss of first responders in a single event since September 11, 2001. Prior to rejoining CNN, Elam served as a weekend evening anchor and general assignment reporter for KNBC. During her tenure at KNBC, her reporting centered around emergency awareness, empowering Southern Californians with information to be earthquake ready, water safe and informed about money matters. She covered the release of John Smith, a man jailed 18 years for a crime he did not commit; the 2012 Golden Globes red carpet; and she anchored KNBC's breaking news coverage of the Seal Beach murders. Before KNBC, Elam was business news correspondent for CNN based in New York, where she also reported for HLN and CNN International. Elam covered a myriad of stories from the worst financial period in decades to the death of Michael Jackson during her time at CNN from 2003 to 2011. Elam's career began in New York as a copy editor for Dow Jones Newswires before joining Bridge News where she helped coordinate seamless 24-hour news coverage among the organizations newsrooms worldwide. While working for Bridge News, she made the transition to broadcast news when she began covering corporate earnings for the PBS program Nightly Business Report and for WebFN. As the only full-time reporter in New York for WebFN, she anchored Market on the Close, a one-hour WebFN program that tracked the stock market in the last hour of trading and First Business, a weekly syndicated business program Elam co-hosted Black Enterprise Report, a nationally syndicated program focused on business, career and financial education from 2005 to 2007. Elam earned a Bachelor of Arts degree in broadcast journalism from Howard University.
Don Riddell is an anchor and correspondent for World Sport. Full Bio Don Riddell is an award-winning anchor and correspondent for World Sport, working out of CNN's world headquarters in Atlanta. He is currently the host of World Sport on CNN International and one of the network's most versatile anchors, having also presented the long-running feature show Living Golf as well as news programs World News and CNN Today. In 2016 Riddell reported on the Hillsborough football disaster -- and the long campaign for truth and justice -- in the CNN documentary, World Sports Presents: They'll Never Walk Alone. This powerful film was recently recognized by the New York Festivals with a silver medal. Riddell also covered the 2016 Summer Olympics from Rio de Janeiro and the deadly Chapecoense plane crash in Colombia. He was in Brazil when the team returned to competition earlier this year. Since joining CNN in 2002, Riddell has filed stories from dozens of countries, speaking to many of the world's top sports names and profiling stories as diverse as match-fixing and the emergence of eSports. He has covered all four golf majors and the Ryder Cup, in addition to Wimbledon, the Rugby World Cup, the Tour de France, Champions League Finals and Spain's 2010 World Cup victory from Madrid. In 2013 Riddell fronted the CNN documentary World Sports Presents: Branded a Rebel, which examines the 30th anniversary of cricket's highly controversial "Rebel Tours", specifically the West Indies unauthorized tour of apartheid-era South Africa in 1983. Featuring powerful interviews with some of the cricketers - who were punished with lifetime bans - 'Branded a Rebel' won the Foreign Press Association's 'Sports Story of the Year' award in 2013 as well as a Golden Eagle from CINE. In addition to covering sports, Riddell has also covered many news stories including the 2010 Royal Wedding and the G20 summit in London. From the studio, he has covered the Haiti earthquake, the Mumbai terror attacks, the disputed Iranian election and the death of Michael Jackson. He has profiled a variety of personalities from astronauts to prime ministers, holocaust survivors and the world's tallest man. Named a finalist as 'Best Sports Anchor' at the New York Festivals in 2016, Riddell often writes for CNN.com and occasionally pens columns for publications around the world. He is an award-winning filmmaker and keen photographer, whose pictures are often seen alongside his reports on CNN.com. Prior to joining CNN, Riddell worked in British regional television; starting on Calendar News with Yorkshire Television (YTV) in Leeds, and the London News Network (LNN), where he worked as a presenter and reporter for the London Tonight program. In 1998, Riddell was invited to meet the Queen at Buckingham Palace, having been identified as one of the nation's young achievers by the Independent Television Commission. He has run both the London and New York Marathons. Riddell has a Bachelors degree with honours in Public Media/Communication and Cultural Studies from Leeds University.
By Ryan Browne Updated 5:42 PM ET, Thu September 28, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)The US military conducted airstrikes against ISIS fighters in Libya Tuesday, for a second time in less than a week and only the second time the US has struck targets in the North African country since Donald Trump became President. (CNN)The US military conducted airstrikes against ISIS fighters in Libya Tuesday, for a second time in less than a week and only the second time the US has struck targets in the North African country since Donald Trump became President. "US forces conducted two precision airstrikes in Libya against ISIS militants," US Africa Command, which oversees US troops in the region, said in a statement issued Thursday. Africa Command added that the strikes killed "several ISIS militants" and were carried out "in coordination with the Libyan Government of National Accord," the internationally recognized government based in Tripoli. The strike occurred approximately 100 miles southeast of Sirte, the one-time ISIS stronghold in Libya, according to Africa Command. Tuesday's strikes were carried out by unmanned aircraft and killed fewer than 10 ISIS fighters, two US defense officials told CNN. The operation follows a series of six precision airstrikes that were carried out against an ISIS desert camp on Friday. Those strikes killed 17 ISIS militants and destroyed three vehicles at the camp, located about 150 miles southeast of Sirte, Africa Command told CNN Sunday in a statement. The two missions being carried out in such close proximity to one another suggests US officials have become increasingly concerned that the terror group is regaining strength in the North African country. While the ISIS presence in Libya has been much reduced following a nearly five-month long US air campaign against the terror group in the final stretch of the Obama administration that ousted them from Sirte, small groups of ISIS fighters had begun to reconstitute themselves in remote desert areas, taking advantage of the lingering instability resulting from the Libyan civil war. "ISIS and al-Qaeda have taken advantage of ungoverned spaces in Libya to establish sanctuaries for plotting, inspiring and directing terror attacks; recruiting and facilitating the movement of foreign terrorist fighters; and raising and moving funds to support their operations," Africa Command said Thursday.
By Jareen Imam and Amanda Barnett, CNN Updated 11:18 AM ET, Wed March 2, 2016 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)NASA astronaut Scott Kelly is back on Earth. After 340 days in space, @StationCDRKelly is back on Earth from his #YearInSpace mission. https://t.co/KX5g7yYnYG https://t.co/dhCfP1M6tZ Undocking complete at 8:02pm ET! @StationCDRKelly is on his way home from a #YearInSpace pic.twitter.com/qaPqva0jsU Rise and shine! My last #sunrise from space then I gotta go! 1 of 5. #GoodMorning from @space_station! #YearInSpace pic.twitter.com/F1MFo5MwjQ #Countdown We're down to a wakeup. #Earth. I'm coming for you tomorrow! #GoodNight from @space_station! #YearInSpace pic.twitter.com/kLe2755XyG CNN's Joshua Berlinger and Ashley Strickland contributed to this report. (CNN)NASA astronaut Scott Kelly is back on Earth. After 340 days in space, @StationCDRKelly is back on Earth from his #YearInSpace mission. https://t.co/KX5g7yYnYG https://t.co/dhCfP1M6tZ Undocking complete at 8:02pm ET! @StationCDRKelly is on his way home from a #YearInSpace pic.twitter.com/qaPqva0jsU Rise and shine! My last #sunrise from space then I gotta go! 1 of 5. #GoodMorning from @space_station! #YearInSpace pic.twitter.com/F1MFo5MwjQ #Countdown We're down to a wakeup. #Earth. I'm coming for you tomorrow! #GoodNight from @space_station! #YearInSpace pic.twitter.com/kLe2755XyG CNN's Joshua Berlinger and Ashley Strickland contributed to this report. Kelly and Russian cosmonauts Mikhail Kornienko and Sergey Volkov landed late Tuesday night in the Kazakhstan desert, NASA and Russian mission control said. Kelly could be seen pumping his fist and giving a thumbs up after being hoisted from the Russian Soyuz spacecraft that brought the trio back. All three underwent field tests immediately after leaving the spacecraft. Kelly has completed a nearly yearlong mission on the International Space Station, the longest any U.S. astronaut has been in space. The prolific social media user posted a photo of the sunrise on Tuesday -- the last one he watched from space. Spending 340 days in space could affect a person's vision and bones, but Kelly said last week that physically, he feels pretty good. "I could go for another 100 days or 100 years," the astronaut said during his last briefing with reporters from orbit. But the long stay has also been lonely. "The hardest part is being isolated from people on the ground who are important to you," he said. The space veteran said he has witnessed some of the most amazing scenes of Earth during his mission, like spotting the northern lights, passing over the Bahamas and watching huge storms like Hurricane Patricia. The view from space He's also gained perspective on Earth's climate while he's been orbiting the planet. "I feel more like an environmentalist since I've been up here," he said. "There are parts of the Earth that are covered with pollution all the time. I saw weather that was unexpected. Storms bigger than we've seen in the past. This is a human effect. This is not a natural phenomenon." In a previous interview with CNN, Kelly said Earth's atmosphere "looks very, very fragile" from the space station. But there are opportunities to solve the Earth's environmental problems, Kelly said Thursday. "If we can dream it, we can make it so," he said. Once Kelly lands, he will be flown to Houston's Ellington Field and go through a battery of physical and scientific tests. Afterward, he's looking forward to jumping into his pool, he said. Kelly isn't bringing back any souvenirs -- this is his fourth mission in space, after all -- but he's looking forward to returning some personal items when he lands. One of his biggest hopes for the Year in Space mission's legacy is that it helps NASA on its quest to take astronauts farther away from Earth on longer space flights -- a necessity for traveling to Mars in the future. "The space station here is a magical place, and an incredible science facility. I hope more people have the opportunity to do this in the future," he said. 'Feel like I've lived my whole life up here' He told CNN's Dr. Sanjay Gupta last week that it feels like he's spent his whole life on the station and that leaving it is going to be tough. "I'll probably never see it again," Kelly told Gupta. "I've flown in space four times now, so it's going to be hard in that respect, but I certainly look forward to going back to Earth. I've been up here for a really long time and sometimes, when I think about it, I feel like I've lived my whole life up here." A year ago, before he launched, Kelly, 51, joked that he would be taller than his twin brother, former astronaut Mark Kelly (the husband of former Rep. Gabrielle Giffords), when he returns, because you get a bit taller in space. At least briefly. "You do grow when you're up there for a long time," Kelly said last year. "Unfortunately it doesn't last." But did he really get taller than his brother? Though he's no longer an astronaut, Mark Kelly volunteered to take part in NASA's "Twins Study" with his brother. NASA wants to see how the identical twins measure up after a year in two very different environments -- Scott in space and Mark on Earth. Staying in contact Scott Kelly also said he would spend a lot of time talking to people on Earth, messaging on social media -- and he did. He shared many pictures on Twitter taken from his perch about 200 miles above Earth. (By the way, you can see the space station fly over if you know when and where to look.) Kelly also promised to keep a personal journal of his experience on the space station and said that he might share it with us. "I plan to be completely honest about it," he said before launch, but -- "who knows, maybe there are some crazy thoughts I'll have at the end that I wouldn't want to share." Kelly also did experiments. Lots and lots of experiments. He and his one-year crewmate, Russian cosmonaut Mikhail Kornienko, conducted studies to help NASA better understand what happens to the human body in space: The eyes, brain, bones, muscles -- they all change in a weightless environment. NASA needs to know a lot more about these changes to the body before it can send people to Mars or on any other long spaceflights. Riding home with the Russians Kelly began his mission to the space station on March 27, 2015, riding a Russian rocket that launched from the Baikonur Cosmodrome in Kazakhstan. He is coming home much the same way. When his mission ends, Kelly will have spent 340 consecutive days on the space station and a total of 520 days in space counting his time from previous trips. Both are records for U.S. astronauts, but not for Russia. Between 1987 and 1995, four cosmonauts spent a year or more in space. Kornienko also is coming back Tuesday and cosmonaut Sergey Volkov is on the flight too -- though he did not spend a year on the space station. Kelly's mission won't end once he lands. NASA will spend years analyzing the tests he conducted on board.
Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. New Day
Jim Murphy is Vice President of Programming for CNN. He previously served as Vice President of Morning Programming for CNN and Senior Executive Producer of Early Start and New Day. Full Bio Jim Murphy is Vice President of Programming for CNN. He previously served as Vice President of Morning Programming for CNN and Senior Executive Producer of Early Start and New Day. He started in broadcast journalism as an intern at WPIX-TV in New York as a high school senior and has worked in television ever since. He produced flagship newscasts at both WCBS and WABC in New York. Moving to network news he served as the executive producer of CBS This Morning and the CBS Evening News and the Senior Executive Producer of Good Morning America. He is the recipient of multiple Emmy, Murrow and other journalism awards.
By David Fitzpatrick and Drew Griffin, CNN Investigations Updated 9:53 PM ET, Mon November 17, 2014 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. The boy's stories are heartbreaking: "My dad drinks and hits me ... my mom chose drugs over me ... my home on the reservation isn't a safe place for me to be," wrote Josh Little Bear. His request seems reasonable -- send a few dollars to help St. Joseph's Indian School to keep "kids like me safe ... so we don't have to live this way anymore." The story, begging for help, is part of massive national marketing campaign involving 30 million pieces of a mail a year. And it's a successful one, raising more than $50 million last year. But Josh Little Bear doesn't exist. It's not just a pseudonym to protect a child. The story is a fabrication, a compiling of events that may or may not have happened to paint a broad picture that Native American leaders say does not exist. Officials at St. Joseph's Indian School -- a 200-person boarding school in Chamberlain, South Dakota, that's affiliated with a Roman Catholic charity based in Wisconsin -- say they send out waves of mailings three or four times a year. The latest, a Christmas-oriented mailer, was sent in early November, according to the school's director of communications. The packets include calendars, personalized return address stickers, notepads, elaborate stickers and a so-called "Dreamcatcher," a Native American handicraft that by tradition gives its owners good dreams. The Christmas appeal introduced "Emily High Elk." A year ago when her family brought her to the school, the letter says, "(y)ou could see the hopelessness she felt in her dark brown eyes." Now, the letter goes on, "her big bright smile reveals how her life has changed." But again, "Emily High Elk," is more than a pseudonym. The girl whose life is described in the letter does not exist. According to its financial statements, St. Joseph's Indian School raised more than $51 million last year from millions of Americans who donated because of those mailings. CNN began receiving complaints about mailings like this more than two years ago. When asked about Josh Little Bear's letter, Kory Christianson, the director of development, wrote us that there was no such student. "The name 'Josh Little Bear' is fictitious," he wrote, "but unfortunately, his story is not." The letter, he added, "is a true story of the very real and challenging situations that far too many children face not only in the Native American community, but in families found in every sphere of society." He said it wasn't the "intention to disparage in any way the Native American community." But some Native Americans say there is deliberate disparagement and that it's a marketing technique. A half-hour drive away from St. Joseph's is the Crow Creek Lakota Sioux reservation in central South Dakota, where its vice chairman, Leonard Pease, scoffed at the fundraising letter. "That's how they get their money," he told CNN. "To me, they make the Indians look bad." Michael Roberts, president of the First Nations Development Institute that aims to strengthen and support Native communities, went further. He termed the fundraising letter and the admission that the child is nonexistent as "poverty porn." "They are raising money in the name of Indians, using the worst of poverty porn of all Indian country to raise money on all our social ills," said Roberts, whose Colorado-based group represents six Native American nonprofit organizations. It seems that the money being raised is being used for the right reasons, as far as CNN could see. We were given a tour of the school but were not allowed to film. The complex, on the banks of the Missouri River, looks like a nice place and the children seemed happy, well-fed and well-housed. We tried unsuccessfully to interview the leadership of St. Joseph's. The communications director, Jona Ohm, first invited us to meet the school president at the small museum operated by the school. The president, Mike Tyrell, acknowledged that the mailings "push the edge" of marketing and asking about them "is a legitimate question." But Ohm told us to stop. "You don't have permission to record in any way, shape or form," she said. According to its own financial statement for 2013, St. Joseph's has abundant assets. Cash on hand was listed at more than $122 million in June 2013, an increase of more than $18.5 million over the previous year.
By Tim Stanley Updated 6:55 AM ET, Wed September 20, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Timothy Stanley is a historian and columnist for Britain's Daily Telegraph. He is the author of "Citizen Hollywood: How the Collaboration Between LA and DC Revolutionized American Politics." The opinions expressed in this commentary are his. (CNN)The latest twist in the investigation into links between the Trump campaign and Russia is that Paul Manafort, former head of the campaign, was wiretapped under secret court orders before and after the election -- including while he was working with Trump. The revelation more or less stops there. Join us on Twitter and Facebook Timothy Stanley is a historian and columnist for Britain's Daily Telegraph. He is the author of "Citizen Hollywood: How the Collaboration Between LA and DC Revolutionized American Politics." The opinions expressed in this commentary are his. (CNN)The latest twist in the investigation into links between the Trump campaign and Russia is that Paul Manafort, former head of the campaign, was wiretapped under secret court orders before and after the election -- including while he was working with Trump. The revelation more or less stops there. Join us on Twitter and Facebook We don't know what investigators found, or if it involved Trump personally. According to CNN, two sources caution that the evidence is thus far "inconclusive." But Trump still has cause for concern. This President is walking a political tightrope. He needs to keep both moderate Republications and his base on his side. Otherwise, Democrats could assume the majority in 2018 and unleash the full fury of the left on the White House. There are two narratives in the Trump presidency that are distinct but inseparable. First, the fallout from the election campaign. The Democrats are looking for some way to invalidate the result, and it's undeniable that links existed between individuals on Trump's team and Russia. Donald Trump Jr. had a meeting with several Russian lawyers, at least one who is alleged to have connections to the Kremlin, and on the premise that political dirt on Hillary Clinton would be provided. Former national security adviser Mike Flynn had to resign from the administration because he failed to disclose contacts with a Russian ambassador. The other narrative is Trump's attempt to drag the US government in his own, unique direction. This has often put him at odds with his party. The President could be justified for being furious that earlier this year he spent political capital on reforming health care only for the effort to initially fail in Congress (though it may get a second chance this month). The congressional GOP leadership might be unhappy with the President's executive-level efforts on everything from banning transgendered personnel in the military to a selective ban on migration from some Muslim-dominated countries. And Trump's attempt to cut a deal with congressional Democrats on immigration complicates matters further. A compromise might actually be what a lot of congressional Republicans favor, but it may anger Trump's base if it doesn't include funding for the Mexican border wall -- a key election promise that put him in the White House. While critics say that Hillary Clinton doesn't understand why she lost the 2016 election, Trump's supporters -- including Ann Coulter -- now suspect he doesn't understand why he won it. Here's the thing: if Trump does alienate both moderate Republicans and his base, and fails to get substantial reform through in Congress as a consequence, there's a chance that the Democrats will do well in the 2018 midterm elections. If they do, that'll turn attention more squarely onto the ethics accusations. Why? Because the majority parties (with majority votes) have subpoena powers in the House and Senate -- and if the Democrats take control of one of them, they can really start to create havoc. A serious impeachment effort could be on the cards. This means that Trump cannot allow the 2018 midterms to be all about the alleged rot in his administration, because that would give the Democrats the gift of an electoral victory that hands them a mandate to hound him. Just as the Republicans did to Bill Clinton during his second term, when they impeached him in the wake of the Monica Lewinsky scandal. It must be tempting for Trump supporters to bet on the Russia furor just going away. It has yet to produce a smoking gun, and it smacks of an attempt to rewrite electoral history. Some Democrats agree that if they appear obsessed with the Russia story to the exclusion of concrete issues such as health care, they will alienate voters. But Trump cannot run the risk of ending up in a war of attrition with a hostile Congress, which is why maintaining good relations with congressional Republicans does matter, at the same time as keeping his base on his side. Trump might not be the most ideologically partisan president in history, but it's partisanship that will ultimately reduce oversight and fend off impeachment. In other words, the best way for Trump to flourish in office is -- unsurprisingly -- for the administration to get things done. Happily for Trump, the Republicans may be in the mood for passing a modified health-care plan and cutting taxes. But what really matters is building that wall.
By Wayne Drash, CNN Updated 9:31 PM ET, Wed October 7, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)The phone calls wouldn't stop. Getting hold of a caller list is gold in the scamming world. Originating from legitimate calling centers, such lists contain the names, addresses and phone numbers of thousands of Americans and can be purchased online in the black market. Scammers begin by congratulating their prey for winning a lottery or a Mercedes. Victims are then directed to pay "taxes" up front, typically $1,500 to $3,000 through Western Union or Moneygram. The winnings never surface. Sometimes scammers send checks for thousands of dollars to lure people in; the checks bounce, but by then the victims have paid their "taxes." Scammers hook the most vulnerable, often tricking them into sending cash again and again. They sense a lonely person, flatter them and convince them they're friends. Sometimes, victims get coerced into sending TVs and appliances to Jamaica. A rare few have flown to Jamaica and married their scammers. When victims try to back out, scammers use Google Earth to zoom in on their homes, describe the neighborhood and threaten to kill or rape family members. One elderly American has been duped of more than $1.5 million, authorities say. Another taped 99 $100 bills to the pages of Better Homes and Gardens and sent it to her scammer. Three years ago, a 70-year-old engineer sent hundreds of thousands to his scammers. At one point, he received a letter purportedly from the U.S. ambassador to Jamaica asking him to take part in a sting. The man flew to Jamaica, but authorities -- who'd gotten wind of the plan -- met the man at a bank before he wired $50,000 to his scammers' account. The scammers' had planned to kill him shortly after the transfer. Some of the more sophisticated scammers send mass mailings to tens of thousands of Americans, asking them to fill out a form and send it back if they want to participate in a sweepstakes. The mailings often appear legitimate. The scammers will look at the handwriting of respondents and focus on ones who appear to be elderly. CNN's Drew Griffin and David Fitzpatrick contributed to this story. (CNN)The phone calls wouldn't stop. Getting hold of a caller list is gold in the scamming world. Originating from legitimate calling centers, such lists contain the names, addresses and phone numbers of thousands of Americans and can be purchased online in the black market. Scammers begin by congratulating their prey for winning a lottery or a Mercedes. Victims are then directed to pay "taxes" up front, typically $1,500 to $3,000 through Western Union or Moneygram. The winnings never surface. Sometimes scammers send checks for thousands of dollars to lure people in; the checks bounce, but by then the victims have paid their "taxes." Scammers hook the most vulnerable, often tricking them into sending cash again and again. They sense a lonely person, flatter them and convince them they're friends. Sometimes, victims get coerced into sending TVs and appliances to Jamaica. A rare few have flown to Jamaica and married their scammers. When victims try to back out, scammers use Google Earth to zoom in on their homes, describe the neighborhood and threaten to kill or rape family members. One elderly American has been duped of more than $1.5 million, authorities say. Another taped 99 $100 bills to the pages of Better Homes and Gardens and sent it to her scammer. Three years ago, a 70-year-old engineer sent hundreds of thousands to his scammers. At one point, he received a letter purportedly from the U.S. ambassador to Jamaica asking him to take part in a sting. The man flew to Jamaica, but authorities -- who'd gotten wind of the plan -- met the man at a bank before he wired $50,000 to his scammers' account. The scammers' had planned to kill him shortly after the transfer. Some of the more sophisticated scammers send mass mailings to tens of thousands of Americans, asking them to fill out a form and send it back if they want to participate in a sweepstakes. The mailings often appear legitimate. The scammers will look at the handwriting of respondents and focus on ones who appear to be elderly. CNN's Drew Griffin and David Fitzpatrick contributed to this story. The man on the other end of the line made promises of a big payoff: millions of dollars in prize money. But first the IRS needed $1,500 in taxes, he insisted, then the jackpot would arrive at the family home, a camera crew ready to capture the excitement. The calls came a couple of times a day; other times, nearly 50. Mr. Albert, we need the money to be sent today ... Don't hang up the phone, Mr. Albert ... Mr. Albert, don't tell your wife about this ... Albert Poland Jr. had worked 45 years for the Burlington hosiery factory in Harriman, Tennessee, starting off as a mechanic before rising to become a quality-control manager. He and his wife, Virginia, were living a humble life in the Appalachian foothills near Knoxville, having raised a son and daughter in their 62 years of marriage. The family patriarch was known simply as Daddy. At age 81, his mind was faltering. He suffered from Alzheimer's and dementia. And the caller -- a man in Jamaica -- preyed on that vulnerability. Poland's lucidity fluctuated. In February, he went to the local police station and asked whether they could make the phone calls from the 876 area code stop. Another time, he went to the post office to send money to his caller. The teller stopped him, talked with him and handed him a brochure on Jamaican lottery scams. He thanked her. His family tried to intervene numerous times. On one of his good days, he told his wife simply, "I'm in too deep." On March 21, the caller asked for $1,500. Poland withdrew the maximum $400 from his ATM and sent it via Western Union. He was sure he was going to win more than $2 million. He hoped to pay off his son's mortgage and help his family for years to come. His son, Chris Poland, was livid when his mother told him his father was talking with the caller again. Chris, 53, had had the same conversation for months with his dad; his father had sent more than $5,000 to the caller. Chris spoke with his father like most any son would. "Daddy, you taught me the value of the dollar. Why are you giving money away?" As father and son talked by cell phone, the Jamaican called back on Poland's land line. Mr. Albert ... The next morning, a Sunday, was like a repeat record. More calls and another tense phone conversation between father and son. Virginia got dressed for church. Her husband decided to stay home. It was a beautiful spring morning, with temperatures hovering around 60 degrees and the trees a lush green. Poland strolled around his yard. A neighbor waved: "Looks like we're gonna have to start mowing soon." "Yeah, looks like it," Poland said. He walked to the basement of the family home. He carried with him a snub-nose .38 revolver. In his suicide note, Poland told his family not to spend much on his funeral and said he hoped that when more than $2 million arrived tomorrow, it would vindicate him. 'Truly heartbreaking' Albert Poland was in the grips of a Jamaican lottery scammer -- part of a cottage industry that targets nearly 300,000 Americans a year, most of them elderly, and has enticed them to send an estimated $300 million annually to the Caribbean island nation. AARP has run campaigns warning about the scams originating from the Jamaican 876 area code. The U.S. Postal Service has published pamphlets and distributed them across the country. The Senate Special Committee on Aging held hearings two years ago about the magnitude of the problem and urged U.S. and Jamaican authorities to do more. "The Jamaican lottery scam is a cruel, persistent and sophisticated scam that has victimized seniors throughout the nation," said Sen. Susan Collins of Maine, the committee's chairwoman. "It is truly heartbreaking that this scam has robbed seniors of hundreds of millions of dollars." It's such a huge problem in Jamaica that the scams have been dubbed the highest-level Tier 1 threat: a "clear and present danger" to national security, says Peter Bunting, Jamaica's national security minister. From children to the nation's most tech-savvy 20-somethings, from a former deputy mayor of Montego Bay to the most vicious gang members, lottery scams have left few segments of the island nation untouched. "It is extremely corrosive to the fabric of society," Bunting says. "We have seen where it has corrupted police officers. It has corrupted legitimate businesspersons who end up playing some role in laundering money." The Poland family first spoke to CNN in April. Investigators are looking into Albert Poland's case and hope to provide some solace to the family soon; for now, his scammer remains at large. From there, CNN followed the money, traveling to ground zero of the scams, Montego Bay, where we witnessed a police raid of a suspect's house. In Jamaica, more than 200 deaths a year have been tied to the scams. And in the United States, the scams have cost people their lives -- and their life savings. Trial marks U.S. first Edna Schmeets looks like she's straight out of "The Golden Girls" central casting: a grandma with curly gray hair and a 5-foot-2 frame. At 86, she's soft-spoken, yet opinionated. Just a month after Albert Poland took his life in Tennessee, Schmeets faced down her scammer in federal court in Bismarck, North Dakota. Sanjay Ashani Williams started off as a scammer around 2008, making calls to elderly Americans. He eventually graduated to buying and selling caller lists -- reams of information containing the names and numbers of tens of thousands of potential victims. Williams made more than $5 million on his operation, the government said. His case marked the first U.S. trial of what officials call a "lead list scammer." In addition to dealing in lists, Williams continued making calls himself, including to Schmeets. "He said I had won this $19 million from American Cash Awards and that I would have to, you know, pay taxes on this money before they would release it," Schmeets testified, according to trial transcripts. "And they kept calling about sending another check and another check and another check. I mean, it just kept on and on until I had both my life insurances gone, all my savings. Everything. "I just had lost everything." She sent checks for $65,000, $57,000 and $20,000 over the course of the next nine months. How much did she lose total? "Oh, my goodness," she testified. "When I figured it out, it was about $297,000." Assistant U.S. Attorney Clare Hochhalter probed, "Did you become suspicious after you kept sending money and you didn't get your prize?" "Yes, I did," Schmeets replied. But she said she was told not to tell anyone "about this until you get your winnings, your $19 million. Then, you can tell everybody." Why keep sending money? Because, Schmeets testified, she was told she would get "all your money back, plus the $19 million." Schmeets and her husband, Lawrence, had been married 62 years. They lived on a small cattle farm. Her husband worked in the railroad industry; she clerked at a grocery store to bring in extra cash. They raised five children: four boys and one girl. The family had endured tragedy years ago when one of their sons died at age 31. Her husband died in 2010. Phone calls congratulating her on winning a lottery began in fall 2011 and continued through June 2012. Her motivations for wanting the money were simple: "I was going to just give it to my children." Instead, all that she and her husband had worked for was gone. She glanced occasionally across the room at Williams. He never returned her gaze. Instead, she said, he rifled through a garbage bag containing hundreds of pages of court documents. He was dressed in an orange prison jumpsuit, with a bushy beard and braids piled on top of his head. She thought about how different he was than the person she had envisioned. "He seemed like such a nice guy on the phone," Schmeets would say later. Williams operated out of Montego Bay and established an intricate network of runners based in Charlotte, North Carolina, to pick up money and send it to him. His website, gamblerslead.com, was a gold mine for scammers seeking phone numbers for elderly Americans. Authorities studied more than 500,000 emails connected to the site, an FBI agent testified. Authorities discovered that Williams was buying lists at wholesale on the black market, where they can go for up to $5,000 and contain tens of thousands of names. He carved up the lists and sold names and numbers to callers for $5.50 apiece. Thirty-two people in the United States and Jamaica were indicted in the scheme. Eleven pleaded guilty to conspiracy to commit mail and wire fraud, seven are awaiting trial, and 14 are awaiting extradition. According to authorities, many pretended to be FBI agents, bank personnel and IRS workers to convince people that their lottery winnings were real. Seventy-two Americans, all older than 55, were identified as losing money in Williams' operation. William Porter, 94, was a fighter pilot in World War II in the Pacific theater. He lost $250,000. Charlotte Davis, 64, was also targeted. She testified that she was told by her scammer that if she didn't send the money, he'd rape her daughters and kill her son. A 72-year-old victim from Odessa, Texas, committed suicide. Prosecutor Hochhalter told CNN that it was too difficult legally to bring homicide charges in the case. "But we believe we have the factual evidence to suggest that this offense involved conduct that created a risk of serious bodily injury or death," Hochhalter said. "And that's evidenced by the fact that at least one person did commit suicide." Williams was combative at the defense table through much of the trial. He said his rights were violated when he was arrested on a trip in North Carolina, and he threw fits that annoyed even his own lawyer. He refused the judge's recommendation to wear nice clothes in court, instead opting for his prison outfit. He had the same reaction when the judge suggested he might want to consider a plea deal that would result in three to five years in prison. Instead, Williams placed his fate in the hands of a jury. His attorney, Charles Stock, tried to make the case that hotels, credit card companies, casinos and other companies buy and sell Americans' personal information all the time -- and that it's perfectly legal. This is true, the prosecution countered, but it becomes illegal when you knowingly use the information for a crime. Williams was convicted on an array of conspiracy, wire fraud and money laundering charges. He faces up to 40 years in prison. "That was a big relief," Schmeets said, "to know that he's going to prison." During the trial, an expert from Jamaica's equivalent of the FBI gave an assessment of just how endemic the scamming has become. Kevin Watson, a corporal with Jamaica's Major Organized Crime and Anti-Corruption Agency, told the court that many Jamaicans see scamming as "the only source of income for them." "In small pockets of communities," Watson said, "you will find many persons involved in this activity. You will also find children who grew up ... to believe that this is OK -- it's OK to get involved in lottery scamming." Deadly competition The turquoise water off the coast of Montego Bay serves as a majestic paradise for millions of tourists. But outside the walls of the resorts, the victims of lottery scams are counted not by sums of money lost but by an ever-growing tally of bodies. The expansive four-lane highway along Montego Bay's Resort Row gives way to winding, pothole-filled roads where corrugated-tin homes press up against the cracked pavement. Goats straddle the sides of roads barely wide enough for two cars. It is here in the ghettos that competition for calling lists has turned deadly. More than 200 Jamaicans a year are killed in connection with lottery scams -- a fifth of the killings in the island nation, which has the dubious distinction of being among the most violent countries per capita in the world. Scammers who sell names and numbers to callers expect a cut of their profits; if they find out they're being cheated, they'll hunt down and kill the caller or a member of his family. Other killings occur when rival gang members steal caller lists. "It's a cancer in the society," says Luis Moreno, the U.S ambassador to Jamaica. "Gangs escalate armed competition with each other over who is going to control these lists and who is going to get the best scammers, the best phone numbers, the best phone guys. Even children as young as 10, 12 years old are tied in as couriers." In June, a 14-year-old was dragged out of his home and machine-gunned by gang members connected to the scams. The same fate befell a 62-year-old grandmother in July. Two American women were wounded in August at a nightclub when a gang member opened fire on a rival who owed him money. The rival was killed. "These gangs are often indiscriminate," says Bunting, the national security minister. "When they come looking for their target, if they don't find him, they will shoot members of his family to essentially send a message." The average Jamaican makes about $300 a month. The top lottery scammers boast of bringing in $100,000 a week. They share videos of washing cars with champagne and show off by setting fire to thousands of dollars in cash. Scammers justify their actions by calling it reparations for slavery, authorities say. We're robbing the rich to pay the poor, scammers think. If someone is stupid enough to send us money, that's their fault. "You're not stealing from the rich to give to the poor," Moreno says. "In fact, you're victimizing the most vulnerable people of a society -- Jamaican as well as the U.S." Lottery scamming sprang up between 1998 and 1999 when legitimate American and Canadian call centers set up operations in Montego Bay. Young Jamaicans were trained on how to empathize with customers. No one could have known how those skills would result in today's flourishing scam business. Kenrick Stephenson, known simply as Bebe, is credited with being the country's first lottery scammer. His hub sprang out of Granville, one of Montego Bay's poorest and most dangerous neighborhoods. Bebe trained, recruited and cultivated young scammers. Mansions popped up, taking over land where squatters dwelled. Expensive cars cruised the streets. Scammers flashed their bling. At the gates of call centers, scammers lurked, offering money to anyone who would provide lead lists. But even the godfather of lottery scams wasn't immune to the spiraling violence. Bebe's life was snubbed out gangland-style at the gates of his mansion in the plush Ironshore neighborhood of Montego Bay in May 2014. Showing how intricately tied scammers are within Jamaican society, Bebe was a prominent gay activist and powerful figure within the ruling People's National Party. When he was killed, a party member said he would be "sadly missed." His casket was said to be made of gold. Top officials know that the stakes are great. If the violence moves closer to the resorts and scares off visitors, the nation's economy would crumble. Its multibillion-dollar tourism industry counts for about 90% of the economy. "We have to have a zero-tolerance approach," Bunting says. "We need to establish that this is as much a crime as drug trafficking, as much a crime as if you held up somebody with a gun. It is in some ways even more cruel because of the age and the vulnerability of the victims." A Jamaican raid The sign at the entrance to Rosemount Gardens, a middle- to upper-class neighborhood in Montego Bay, reads: "The law is active here. Take no chances." Today, the law is active. Wham. Wham. Wham. Two agents pound on the front door of a house. The sound echoes around the neighborhood. A dog barks from a nearby house. One of the agents has a 9 mm machine gun. The other is armed with a Glock handgun. More are standing back. They've gotten intelligence that a man inside has earned maybe hundreds of thousands of dollars from scamming. The house, once a one-room concrete shack, is undergoing extensive renovations, including a new wing and a front porch with intricate floor-to-ceiling grill work -- fancy burglar bars to keep intruders out. A mound of sand sits next to the porch. A stucco front wall remains unfinished. Inside, the suspect grabs a hammer and drives a nail into his laptop, piercing the hard drive. He runs to his bathroom and throws the laptop in a bucket of water in his shower. He begins eating pieces of notebook paper. The agent with the machine gun kicks open the door and rushes inside. Other agents follow, their Glocks drawn, and go through the house room-to-room. In seconds, they spot the suspect in a back bedroom. Wearing only gray briefs, he holds his hands in the air and falls down on his bed. "You get out of bed!" an agent screams. The suspect moans, a mortified look across his face. "Right now! Right now! Downnnnnnnn!" He lies on his stomach on the bedroom floor. An agent handcuffs him. That's when authorities realize he's chewing on something. "Spit it out! Spit out everything!" An agent pulls out a machete and stands over the suspect, the blade looming over his head. He coughs up pieces of paper with names and numbers. Authorities allowed CNN to film the raid. Kevin Watson, the Major Organized Crime and Anti-Corruption official who testified at the North Dakota trial, oversees the raid on this August day. Watson is a made-for-Hollywood cop, with slick-backed hair, a million-dollar smile and effusive pride in law enforcement. Watson stands in the bedroom, the handcuffed suspect next to him. Authorities have found a treasure trove: the laptop, the chewed-up paper, cell phones and a notebook with dozens of names and numbers. Watson holds up a flip phone and scrolls through the call log. Scammers prefer to use flip phones instead of smartphones to limit their digital footprint. Calls to America were made at 10:42 a.m., 10:43, 10:46, 10:47. Each call went to a different area code. "It's quite unlikely that you know someone from all these states," Watson says. He turns to the suspect. "How long have you been involved in lottery scamming?" Watson asks. "I don't want you to tell me that you're not involved, because we didn't come here by chance. If you understand how MOCA works, you understand that we came here because we know what you're up to. All right. So how long have you been involved in lottery scamming?" The suspect says he wishes not to speak. Under further questioning, he acknowledges that he defrauded people a "few years ago." "Like how many years?" Watson asks. "I don't want to respond," the suspect says. "You do understand that we can get all of that information, right? So it would be prudent for you to be honest with us," Watson replies. Silence. In the suspect's wallet is the name, address and Social Security number of a 69-year-old man in Wisconsin. The suspect admits he's never been to Wisconsin. Investigators log all items seized and bag them. They take away the suspect to be booked and jailed. He has been charged with "knowingly possessing identity information of other persons with intention to commit an offense," Watson says. Four years ago, Watson scrapped his IT job for the opportunity to conduct raids like these. At 37, the father of two young children has made targeting lottery scams one of his primary aims. When he spoke at an elementary school this year, a teacher pulled him aside and told him that 17 of the 35 students in her class wanted to be lottery scammers. He spoke with two boys, ages 7 and 9, who told him they hoped to become scammers so they could drive fancy cars and live in big houses. Watson's heart sank. "I was very broken by what I heard," he recalls. "What lottery scamming is doing is making it look like only thieves live in Jamaica." As he leaves the scene of the raid this day, he walks out the broken front door and gives a thumbs up. "We're successful with this one," he says. Plugging the leaks Watson and his Jamaican colleagues have begun making headway in the fight, although they admit it will be a long battle. Law enforcement personnel have met with priests and preachers, business leaders and teachers to talk about the need to stop the scams. Just this year, police have spoken to more than 10,000 children and teens at schools across Montego Bay. Their message: There's nothing glamorous about stealing from old people or getting executed. Jamaican authorities and U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement launched a joint task force in 2009, called JOLT, to focus on the scams. But there was little the Jamaican Operations Linked to Telemarketing task force could do, because the scammers were essentially untouchable. There was little political will to prosecute the scammers and few laws to hold them accountable. And so, they flourished. One prominent rapper glorified scamming in a song. People could walk down the streets of Montego Bay and hear scammers operating in the open, Watson says. That changed in 2013, when Jamaican lawmakers passed what has become known as the Lottery Scam Law, giving authorities the tools they need to conduct sweeping raids and keep suspects locked up. More than 500 arrests have been made since then. Western Union and Moneygram now closely monitor transactions, especially around Montego Bay. Scammers have begun shifting tactics, using money mules to carry cash directly to them. Sometimes, they talk their victims into sending appliances with cash hidden inside. Call centers have tightened their operations. Employees get searched before and after their shifts. Cell phones, pens, notepads, CDs, flash drives -- everything -- gets stored in lockers while they work. Their Internet access at work is strictly controlled. Workers also undergo lie detector tests once a quarter, get fingerprinted and are warned of the likelihood of jail time if caught working with lottery scams. Those measures have "completely locked down the leakage of information," says Yoni Epstein, who heads a trade group representing more than two dozen call centers in Jamaica. The centers provide tech support, customer relations and other services for companies like Xerox and Amazon. They employ 17,000 Jamaicans. Scammers no longer wait outside their gates. Still, caller lists are available online through black markets, authorities say. Leaks can come from disgruntled workers -- if not in Jamaica, then in other countries -- or from hackers or other criminal enterprises. History was made this year when a Jamaican was extradited to the United States for the first time on lottery scam charges. Damion Bryan Barrett, 29, pleaded guilty to wire fraud and was sentenced in June to 46 months in prison. "Before all this, I was just going through a very difficult time. Smoking, drinking, just living," Barrett told the judge in federal court in Fort Lauderdale. "I just want to go home to my son -- be a better person for him, so this won't happen to him." Moreno, the U.S. ambassador, says Barrett's extradition "sends the message that there's no way that you can really get away with this." Jamaica's minister of national security agrees. Bunting says Jamaican officials want more suspects extradited because no Jamaican wants to end up in a U.S. prison. When top drug traffickers from Jamaica were extradited to the United States, Bunting says, it cut down tremendously on his nation's drug trade. "If we could get maybe a few dozen scammers extradited," he says, "then it could have a similar chilling effect." Authorities pledge that more extraditions are on their way. The calls keep coming The day after Albert Poland killed himself in Tennessee, neighbors brought casserole dishes and reflected on the man who taught Sunday school for more than 45 years. The phone rang. Caller ID showed that it was from the 876 area code. Then it rang again. And again. And again. More than 40 calls from Jamaica. Poland wasn't even in the ground yet. Chris Poland could hardly contain his rage. The son decided to do something. He picked up his father's phone, placed it on speaker and hit the record button on his cell phone. He pretended to be his father. The man on the other end said he hoped to deliver millions today. He said he'd received the $400 from Saturday but needed another $1,500. "Where is your wife right now?" "She's at the store," Chris responded. "Ah, OK, OK, OK. What I need you to do now, Mr. Albert, is I need you to get your bank card and your identification card and go in the car right now. I'm not going to hang up. OK?" "But I don't have a car. She's in the car," Chris said. "Ah, and that's the car you'd have to use to go to the Western Union and your bank. Right?" Yes, Chris told him, adding that maybe he could catch a cab. "That would be more better, because we don't want your bank to close today and we need to deliver this money," the man said. "We want to deliver your $2.5 million to you before your bank closes, so you can put it in a safe place. OK?" "OK," Chris responded. "So go outside right now and get a cab. I'm not going to hang up ..." "OK," Chris said. "Where will I get the money, the $2.5 million?" "Remember that we took your address from you on Saturday. It's going to be delivered directly to your doorstep. OK?" Chris said he needs to hail a cab; the caller promised to call back in 10 minutes. The two hang up. More than three months after Poland's death, the calls have not ceased. Sometimes, Virginia Poland picks up the phone. She found her husband's suicide note next to his computer. "He was my best friend. He was my buddy. He was just good to me," she says softly, dabbing tears with a tissue. "When they took him, they took my life, too." Once, she told her husband's scammer that her husband killed himself. The man laughed. She told him to call the funeral home.
Dana Bash is CNN's chief political correspondent based in Washington, D.C. and serves as the network's lead reporter covering both the U.S. House of Representatives and the U.S. Senate. She was the primary reporter covering the 2016 Republican field of presidential candidates and also continues to regularly serve as a moderator for CNN's political town hall specials. Full Bio Dana Bash is CNN's chief political correspondent based in Washington, D.C. and serves as the network's lead reporter covering both the U.S. House of Representatives and the U.S. Senate. She was the primary reporter covering the 2016 Republican field of presidential candidates and also continues to regularly serve as a moderator for CNN's political town hall specials. Additionally, as the network's chief political correspondent, Bash played a key role in CNN's 2016 presidential primary debates, serving as a questioner in six of the network's seven primetime primary debates on both sides of the aisle. Bash also serves as a co-anchor on set in the CNN Election Center for all election night specials and is the primary fill-in anchor for Jake Tapper on CNN's premier political show, State of the Union. As part of her coverage of the 2016 presidential campaigns, Bash has conducted sit-down interviews with majority of the candidates including Donald Trump, Senators Ted Cruz, Marco Rubio, and Bernie Sanders, and Governors Jeb Bush and John Kasich. In addition, Bash secured several extensive interviews with the candidates' families and spouses including the first interview with Kasich's wife and daughters; Heidi Cruz, exploring her role in her husband's campaign; Governor Scott Walker's two sons before announcing his presidential bid; and Frank Fiorina, husband of the only woman that ran for the Republican nomination. Bash also continues to be instrumental to the network's Capitol Hill coverage. In 2015, she broke news on live television that House Majority Leader Kevin McCarthy would not be running for Speaker of the House and also conducted Speaker John Boehner's final interview on his last day in office. Bash also served as the lead correspondent covering former Secretary of State Hillary Clinton's 11-hour testimony before the House Select Committee on Benghazi. In 2014, Bash played a key role in the network's midterm Election Night in America coverage providing reports from the war rooms of the RNC, the DNC and CNN's Election Center in Washington. Bash was essential in explaining many of the congressional breaking news stories of 2013 from the fiscal cliff to the government shutdown. Bash secured several key interviews throughout the past year, including a television-exclusive with Sen. Rob Portman (R-Ohio) to talk about his gay marriage reversal, her groundbreaking interview with former Rep. Gabrielle Giffords (R-Ariz.) and her husband Mark Kelly in Arizona, and the first interviews with Sen. Rand Paul (R-Ky.) and Sen. Ted Cruz (R-Texas) after each member's Senate filibuster. In 2012, Bash was part of the duo to win the Joan S. Barone Award for excellence in congressional reporting on a STOCK Act loophole that could have allowed family members of lawmakers to profit from insider information on trades. She earned the prestigious Everett McKinley Dirksen for Distinguished Reporting of Congress Award from the National Press Foundation an unprecedented three times, most recently for her 2012 reporting on a STOCK Act loophole. Her reporting resulted in Congress passing legislation to close the loophole in August. Bash was a key player in the network's America's Choice 2012 election coverage, reporting from the field and inside voting centers across the country on primary and caucus nights. She was also pivotal to CNN's Emmy award-winning election night coverage, breaking down the key congressional races. As a member of the Peabody Award-winning team for the network's America Votes 2008 coverage, Bash covered the candidates on the trail and was the network's primary reporter on Republican presidential nominee Sen. John McCain's campaign. During the course of the long primary campaign, Bash also interviewed the major Republican contenders and broke a number of stories, including Gov. Mitt Romney's decision to suspend his campaign. Prior to covering Congress and the 2008 campaign, Bash reported as CNN's White House correspondent from the nation's capital and from various locations around the world during President George W. Bush's administration. Bash has reported on major stories including Hurricane Katrina, the CIA leak investigation, and the capture of Saddam Hussein. She was instrumental in CNN's 2006 mid-term election coverage and the 2004 presidential campaign. Before her on-air position with the White House unit, Bash was the Capitol Hill producer for CNN, where she had primary editorial and newsgathering responsibility for the network's coverage of the U.S. Senate. She covered every major story on Capitol Hill, including the Republican dominance in the 2002 elections, the war on terrorism, campaign finance reform, the Florida recount and the impeachment of former President Bill Clinton. Frequently cited on-air by anchors and reporters, she also provided live reporting during the evacuation of the Capitol in the days after the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks. In 2002, she broke the story of the government's secret intercepts of Al Qaeda translations on Sept. 10, 2001, for which she received her first Everett McKinley Dirksen for Distinguished Reporting of Congress Award from the National Press Foundation. In 2000, she covered the presidential primaries, including those in Iowa and New Hampshire, traveling extensively with former Vice President Al Gore, Sen. Bill Bradley and other presidential candidates. She also helped coordinate coverage for both the Republican and Democratic vice presidential selections. Previously, Bash was an editor in CNN's Washington bureau, where she helped plan and coordinate the network's coverage of Capitol Hill, the State Department and key issues such as Medicare and Social Security. Bash also served as a producer on several of the network's public affairs shows, including Late Edition with Frank Sesno, Evans & Novak and Inside Politics Weekend with Wolf Blitzer, producing long-form live interviews with heads of state, lawmakers and other newsmakers. Bash graduated cum laude with her bachelor's degree in political communications from The George Washington University. Follow Dana on Twitter @DanaBashCNN
By Sandra Gonzalez, CNN Updated 3:39 PM ET, Tue August 29, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)"I have a lot of work to do and every time I step on to a set, I just want it to be a learning experience and to get better." (CNN)"I have a lot of work to do and every time I step on to a set, I just want it to be a learning experience and to get better." Logan Browning isn't a household name yet  unless your house is awesome, cool, and has watched Netflix's "Dear White People." But she has all the makings to be one in the future. The 28-year-old delivers a knock-out performance as embattled university radio host Samantha White on the series, which explores race and identity on a fictional college campus. Browning's character and "Dear White People" as a whole speak to a generation of TV viewers that expect more from their entertainment -- because it's no longer (nor was it ever, really) good enough to have a person of color play backup to a white protagonist and call it representation. As Hollywood continues to answer the call for more inclusive stories, the industry should have newcomer Browning on speed dial. CNN wants to hear from you. When was the first time you saw a woman on television you identified with? And see more from As Told By Her.
By Julian Zelizer Updated 5:07 PM ET, Wed February 11, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Julian Zelizer is a professor of history and public affairs at Princeton University and a New America fellow. He is the author of the new book "The Fierce Urgency of Now: Lyndon Johnson, Congress and the Battle for the Great Society." The opinions expressed in this commentary are solely those of the author. (CNN)President Barack Obama has sent a letter to Congress requesting a resolution that will grant him authority to use military force against ISIS. In an effort to placate opponents of military intervention in both parties, the administration has hedged the request by including language that restricts "enduring offensive ground forces" and limits any intervention to three years. He sent a letter with the request promising Congress that he would not authorize "long-term, large scale ground combat operations" as occurred in Iraq or Afghanistan. With that language, he then does ask for authorization to use ground troops. Julian Zelizer is a professor of history and public affairs at Princeton University and a New America fellow. He is the author of the new book "The Fierce Urgency of Now: Lyndon Johnson, Congress and the Battle for the Great Society." The opinions expressed in this commentary are solely those of the author. (CNN)President Barack Obama has sent a letter to Congress requesting a resolution that will grant him authority to use military force against ISIS. In an effort to placate opponents of military intervention in both parties, the administration has hedged the request by including language that restricts "enduring offensive ground forces" and limits any intervention to three years. He sent a letter with the request promising Congress that he would not authorize "long-term, large scale ground combat operations" as occurred in Iraq or Afghanistan. With that language, he then does ask for authorization to use ground troops. There is no reason not to take Obama at his word with what would be the first authorization for the use of force since 2002 when President George W. Bush requested this to conduct strikes against Iraq. Obama has usually been hesitant to use large-scale force unless it is absolutely necessary to protect the nation's interest, and he has shown a clear preference for other methods of combatting terrorism -- from the use of targeted drone air wars to diplomatic initiatives. Obama, who came into office railing against Bush's use of wars in Afghanistan and Iraq, both of which he has drawn down, is not eager to jump into another major conflict. Yet the history of these kinds of resolutions should give Congress pause. For a start, lawmakers will have to be extraordinarily vigilant in how they word the resolution and make very clear the kind of limits that they want to impose, and to live by. The reality is that even when presidents have promised to use limited force, the nature of foreign conflict has a logic of its own. Pressure can escalate to support intervention. Within the United States, the dynamics of politics can drive both parties toward a more hawkish stand, relying on the most liberal interpretation of the war powers that had formally been granted. "What does it mean," asked Sen. Dick Durbin, D-Illinois, about the term "enduring offensive ground operations? How long, how big is 'enduring'? 'Offensive', what's 'offensive' when it comes to the Department of Defense?" We have seen this dynamic repeatedly in recent American history. Most famously, we saw Lyndon Johnson approach Congress in August 1964 to request a resolution authorizing the use of force in response to alleged communist attacks against U.S. Navy ships in the Gulf of Tonkin. Back then, Johnson sent word to members, through Sen. William Fulbright of Arkansas, that he only wanted power to deal with this specific incident. Fulbright told fellow senators that if Johnson wanted to do anything bigger he would return to Capitol Hill to request their support. That's not how the war unfolded. Just as Harry Truman had seen with the conflict in Korea, Johnson kept steadily escalating the military presence in a conflict that would consume his presidency. And while there were a number of legislators who stood up against the war, warning that it was a mistake and threatening to use budgetary power to stop the President, the conflict proved extraordinarily difficult to control. Indeed, far more legislators gave their support to the operation once it had started. Proponents of the war in both parties did a good job of isolating opponents of the war as dangerous, unpatriotic radicals who were not willing to support the fight against communism. The strength of the Vietcong and the North Vietnamese army, meanwhile, constantly created pressure to intensify the conflict. The same dynamics were at work even when presidents did exercise restraint. In 1991, President George H.W. Bush asked for support to employ force to remove Saddam Hussein's Iraqi forces from Kuwait. In that case, in the short term, the elder Bush lived up to his word and ended the mission once it was complete. The problem was that the dynamics of the region created ongoing pressure for military intervention. Once the United States had formally announced that Hussein was a threat, it was difficult to ignore the continued provocations, and when Hussein continued to violate U.N. resolutions, there was ongoing pressure to employ force. The continued presence of troops in the region after Operation Desert Storm, meanwhile, triggered intense animosity that helped fuel the creation and spread of al Qaeda. After 9/11, President George W. Bush sought war power to combat the forces that had been responsible for the horrendous attacks. Initially, this was the focus. But that quickly escalated. First Congress passed a resolution in 2001 granting Bush sweeping wartime powers, a resolution that Obama's current request would leave in place even if many critics have argued that it has been used far too liberally. In 2002, Bush built on this to seek a resolution using force against Iraq. Similarly congressional-approved counterterrorism surveillance programs would be used in the same fashion. While it's not always the case, wars can often get bigger and bigger -- so-called mission creep. If Congress is not extraordinarily careful with how it crafts the resolution, initial authority can quickly become the basis for ongoing, large-scale and prolonged intervention -- far beyond what legislators originally intended. All this means that when the president sends such a request to Congress, legislators in both parties should take seriously their responsibility to ensure that the language is as tight as possible and that their intentions are clear. They should also use this moment to revisit the 2001 authorization. And once they have done all this? That's when the toughest part begins. Because that is when Congress will have to live by its initial word and push back against any efforts to expand the mission in ways that go beyond the scope of the authorization. That will be much easier said than done. Read CNNOpinion's new Flipboard magazine. Follow us on Twitter @CNNOpinion. Join us on Facebook.com/CNNOpinion.
Jim Bittermann is CNN's Senior International Correspondent based in Paris. Since joining CNN in 1996, he has covered the death of Princess Diana in 1997, NATO air strikes on Kosovo in 1998, the earthquake in Turkey in 1999 and the World Cup soccer championships, among other stories. Full Bio Jim Bittermann is CNN's Senior International Correspondent based in Paris. Since joining CNN in 1996, he has covered the death of Princess Diana in 1997, NATO air strikes on Kosovo in 1998, the earthquake in Turkey in 1999 and the World Cup soccer championships, among other stories. Bittermann joined CNN from ABC News, where he was a Paris news correspondent from 1990-1996. During his years with ABC, he covered a wide range of international events, including the dissolution of the Soviet Union, the Gulf War and the Middle East peace process and U.S. deployment in Somalia. His long-form projects at ABC included Betrayed in Blood, a report on the French AIDS-tainted blood scandal for PrimeTime Live and two half-hour special reports for Nightline with Ted Koppel, A Perfect Messiah and The Fashion Conspiracy. From 1978-1990, Bittermann was a European correspondent for NBC News. Based in Rome from 1978-1979, he covered two Papal transitions and the travels of Pope John Paul II. From 1980-1990, he was based in Paris. While there, he reported on many of the decade's major international stories in Eastern Europe, Northern and Western Africa, the Middle East, the Philippines, Japan and the Soviet Union. He received a national news Emmy Award for his coverage of the 1988 Sudan famine. Prior to NBC, Bittermann was a Toronto-based correspondent and producer for the Canadian Broadcasting Corp.'s newsmagazine. He also worked as a reporter for WKYC-TV in Cleveland, Ohio, from 1973-1975 after working one year for WQED-TV, a public television station in Pittsburgh. In 1971-1972, Bittermann traveled the national presidential campaign staffs of Sen. Birch Bayh of Indiana and Sen. Edmund Muskie of Maine. He began his career in broadcast journalism in 1970 at WTMJ-TV in Milwaukee, after one year as a newspaper reporter with the Waukegan News-Sun in Waukegan, Ill. His many honors include a CableACE Award for CNN's coverage of the civil war in Zaire. He has been a panel moderator at the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland, and a member of the jury for the French film competition Les Lumieres de Paris. Since 1998, Bittermann has been assistant adjunct professor of communication at the American University of Paris, teaching courses in broadcast news and documentary film, among other subjects. Bittermann earned a bachelor's degree from Southern Illinois University, which in 1989 named him the Southern Illinois University's Journalism Alumnus of the Year. In 2000 he received the university's Alumni Achievement Award.
What will the weather be like tomorrow where you are? Check your weather forecast or track the latest major storm. Floods triggered by torrential rain wash away a building and a truck in the autonomous region of Tibet pic.twitter.com/kUy7BMBAzJ
The latest on the Supreme Court.
By Thom Patterson, CNN Updated 8:28 AM ET, Mon March 14, 2016 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)There he was, the leader of the free world, President Lyndon Baines Johnson, aboard Air Force One standing in front of reporters, naked as a jaybird. #Historian Jeff Underwood talks about LBJ's Oath of Office on board SAM 26000. http://t.co/54yWsQ0fF9 (CNN)There he was, the leader of the free world, President Lyndon Baines Johnson, aboard Air Force One standing in front of reporters, naked as a jaybird. #Historian Jeff Underwood talks about LBJ's Oath of Office on board SAM 26000. http://t.co/54yWsQ0fF9 To be fair, it was a hot, sunny day. Johnson, who wasn't a shy man, had just finished delivering a stump speech during his 1964 presidential election campaign. He'd invited White House reporter Frank Cormier and two colleagues to an impromptu news conference in the presidential quarters, according to Cormier's 1977 book, "LBJ: The Way He Was." It's not every day that the president of the United States takes off his shirt and pants while answering your questions about the economy. As Cormier described it, Johnson "shucked off his underwear." Then, as if nothing unusual were going on, the President continued talking to the reporters while "standing buck naked and waving his towel for emphasis." Related story: First Air Force One wastes away in desert No big deal. Just another day on Air Force One. The plane that was carrying Johnson and the reporters that day was special. "A person could justify that it's the most important historical airplane in the world," Air Force historian Jeff Underwood said in 2013. The Air Force gave it the code name Special Air Mission (SAM) 26000. Why so historic? In a nutshell, a lot of history has taken place aboard that airplane. A president was sworn in aboard it Less than a year before his memorable interview, Johnson had become president aboard the very same airplane. It was November 22, 1963 -- a date millions of Americans remember well -- when Johnson was sworn in just hours after President John F. Kennedy was assassinated in Dallas. He was sworn in by U.S. District Judge Sarah T. Hughes, the only woman ever to swear in a U.S. commander in chief. It flew JFK's body from Dallas to Washington With a newly sworn-in President Johnson aboard, Kennedy's widow, Jacqueline, accompanied the former President's body, which was in a casket that had been placed in the rear of the aircraft. A portion of the plane's wall had to be cut away to make room. A few days after SAM 26000 landed in Washington, the aircraft performed a high-speed flyover at Kennedy's funeral at Arlington National Cemetery. It flew Nixon on his historic mission to China In 1972, the first meeting between leaders of China and the United States opened the door to diplomatic relations between the two nations, eventually giving Washington geopolitical leverage during arms treaty negotiations with the Soviet Union. It flew three former presidents simultaneously to Egypt In 1981, SAM 26000 flew former Presidents Nixon, Jimmy Carter and Gerald Ford to the funeral of Egyptian President Anwar Sadat. They felt "somewhat ill at ease," Carter wrote years later. And they certainly had their reasons -- especially Carter and Ford. Just five years earlier, Carter, a Democrat, had delivered a stinging election defeat to the GOP's Ford. Tension also ran high among staffers aboard the flight. They endured long waits to use the lavatories and got upset about who received bigger cuts of steak at dinner, according to author Ronald Kessler. Then Nixon "surprisingly eased the tension" with "courtesy, eloquence and charm," Carter revealed in a memoir. Aboard SAM 26000, the two former enemies developed a camaraderie and then a friendship, wrote historian Douglas Brinkley. Royal visit and presidential deaths The plane also flew Britain's Queen Elizabeth II around the United States during her visit in 1983. It carried LBJ's body after his death in 1973, and after Nixon's death in 1994, it ferried his casket home to California. Where you can see it Folks who are used to seeing the president fly on giant 747s might be surprised about the relatively small SAM 26000. It seats only about 40 passengers. A military version of a Boeing 707, it's a narrow-body, single-aisle, four-engine jetliner. The plane is now on display at the National Museum of the United States Air Force near Dayton, Ohio, and you can walk down the aisle and look through plexiglass to see the office where the commander in chief took phone calls. You can also see the area where White House staffers worked during long flights. And, yes, you can see the tiny sleeping quarters where LBJ, um, waved "his towel for emphasis" on that hot day in 1964.
Devon M. Sayers is a Field Producer based at the network's global headquarters in Atlanta, Georgia. Full Bio Devon M. Sayers is a Field Producer based at the network's global headquarters in Atlanta, Georgia. Prior to working at CNN, Devon worked for KOAT in Albuquerque, NM and WMFD in Mansfield, OH.
Cyril Vanier is an anchor for CNN International based at the network's global headquarters in Atlanta. He anchors Europe morning editions of 'CNN Newsroom' Friday through Sunday. Full Bio Cyril Vanier is an anchor for CNN International based at the network's global headquarters in Atlanta. He anchors Europe morning editions of 'CNN Newsroom' Friday through Sunday. Vanier comes to CNNI from France 24, where he previously served as executive producer, anchor and international correspondent. During his 10 years at France 24, he reported on major international stories from the terror attacks in Europe to conflicts in the Middle East. Vanier also wrote and presented France 24's flagship shows -- The News, The F24 Interview and The Debate, where he moderated an hour-long live debate on international issues with four guests. Vanier has covered a number of major international breaking news events. He anchored live coverage of the terror attacks in Paris in November 2015, as well as terror attacks across West Africa in Mali, Ivory Coast and Burkina Faso. He also covered the Charlie Hebdo killings in January 2015, the surprise resignation of FIFA president Sepp Blatter and the terror attacks at Tunisia's Bardo museum and Sousse beach. Other key events that Vanier reported on include the U.S. presidential campaigns and elections in 2008 and 2012, 2012 French presidential election, Arab uprisings in 2011, the War in Afghanistan and war crimes trial of Radovan Karadzic at The Hague. Vanier's coverage of the Libyan uprising was nominated for several awards including the Albert Londres award, Bayeux War Correspondents Award and the FIGRA award in 2011. Prior to joining France 24 in 2006, Vanier wrote and voiced stories for Reuters weekly TV show Africa Journal and briefly worked as a producer for CNN's Paris-based correspondent Jim Bittermann. Vanier received a M.A. in Journalism and Political Science from the Institute of Political Science in Paris and a B.A. with honors in Law and Business from University of Warwick in England. He has dual nationality (France, St. Kitts and Nevis), and speaks fluent French and conversational Spanish.
I'm the Senior Homepage Editor for Weekends. I direct programming decisions for the weekends and coordinate breaking news and other coverage across all platforms. I also write about space and science for CNN Digital.
Madison Park is a journalist in San Francisco. She was a previously a digital news producer in Hong Kong and a health writer/producer in Atlanta for CNN. Full Bio Madison Park is based in San Francisco. Previously, she reported and wrote from CNN's Hong Kong bureau, covering Asia Pacific and the Korean peninsula. She first joined CNN in 2008 to cover health and medicine. As an award-winning journalist, she has covered HIV/AIDS, epidemics and North Korea human rights. She went to Northwestern University and UC Berkeley.
Thom is a CNN senior producer for in-depth digital projects, who also reports on aviation. Follow him on Twitter @thompatterson. Full Bio Thom Patterson is an Atlanta-based CNN senior producer for in-depth digital projects, who writes and reports about aviation. Since 1999, he's reported, written and produced hundreds of original stories for CNN Digital. He has conducted one-on-one interviews for CNN with John McCain, Chuck Hagel, Andrew Cuomo and at the White House with presidential aide Rahm Emanuel. He's also had the privilege of interviewing Buzz Aldrin, Chuck Yeager and Capt. Chesley "Sully" Sullenberger. An aviation enthusiast and student pilot, Patterson has flown through a hurricane aboard an Air Force Reserve C-130 Hurricane Hunter. He also has flown aboard WW-II era bombers including the B-25 Mitchell, B-17 Flying Fortress and a B-29 Superfortress. He has enjoyed a few rolls and loops as an AT-6 backseater with the AeroShell Aerobatic Team. He briefly piloted the GZ-20A Goodyear Blimp, "Spirit of Innovation." He covered the first Boeing 787 Dreamliner to return to service after worldwide grounding. He has reported for CNN from the 2016 Farnborough International Airshow, the EAA AirVenture celebration in Oshkosh, Wisconsin, and the FAA's TRACON and control tower facilities in the Atlanta, Georgia, area. In 2005, he covered the Kennedy Space Center during NASA's first shuttle launch after the Columbia disaster. Patterson covered Coast Guard/NTSB hearings investigating the deadly sinking of the world's most famous square-rigger tall ship, the Bounty. He also has reported from the 2004 Republican National Convention, and from Austin, where he covered the 2008 Texas Democratic presidential primary. For six years Patterson was based at CNN's Washington Bureau, where he produced hundreds of hours of live TV newscasts and TV news packages and conducted interviews at Capitol Hill and the White House. Patterson holds a B.A. in journalism from Indiana University.
Kyung Lah is a Senior National Correspondent for CNN based in Los Angeles. Full Bio Kyung Lah is a Senior National Correspondent for CNN based in Los Angeles. Lah returned to CNN US from CNN International in 2012. She has broken and covered a number of stories in both of her roles with the network. Lah traveled to Malaysia and Australia to cover missing flight MH370, to Malaysia and Ukraine for the crash of flight MH17, to Japan to cover the historic ambassadorship of Caroline Kennedy on the 50th anniversary of her father's assassination. She also traveled to the demilitarized zone of South Korea and covered the fears in Asia as the Democratic People's Republic of Korea escalated tensions with the US. Lah exclusively interviewed serial killer Joseph Paul Franklin shortly before he was executed on death row as well as a number of alleged sexual harassment victims of former US congressman Bob Filner. Lah has also reported on the Newtown massacre, the LAX shooting rampage, the Asiana plane crash, the historic Colorado flood and mudslides, and the Yarnell Hill fire that killed 19 firefighters. Before rejoining CNN US, Lah served as the Tokyo correspondent for CNN. In March 2011, Lah was in Tokyo as the 9.0 earthquake struck Japan. She remained in Japan covering the 15,000 killed in the tsunami and the world's worst nuclear disaster in 25 years at the Fukushima nuclear power plant triple meltdown. She was the first US broadcast journalist to be taken inside the meltdown at the one year anniversary of the disaster. Lah has reported extensively throughout East Asia, reporting stories of conflict and human struggle from China, Korea, Hong Kong, the Philippines, Malaysia, and Pakistan. Lah has interviewed numerous Japanese prime ministers as well as leaders from China and Pakistan. In May 2008 when a huge earthquake shook China's Sichuan Province, Lah flew to the epicenter. She reported breaking news, the visits of UN Secretary General Ban Ki-moon and China Premier Wen Jiabao, as well as remarkable stories of struggle and survival. Lah previously served as a national correspondent for CNN Newsource based out of Washington, D.C. Lah reported on live breaking news events from the nation's capital for approximately 800 CNN Newsource partner stations. Some of the stories she covered included the 'Jena 6' racial demonstrations and the Virginia Tech and Amish school shootings. Lah joined CNN Newsource from KNBC-Los Angeles, where she served as a morning news reporter for Today in L.A. and as a midday anchor. Prior to that, Lah was a reporter in Chicago at the CBS affiliate, WBBM. Lah also worked as a general assignment and long-form investigative reporter at ABC affiliate KGTV in San Diego, where she won a regional Emmy for specialty reporting. Her first reporting position was at CBS affiliate, WWMT in Kalamazoo, Mich. Lah graduated with honors from the University of Illinois with a bachelor's degree in journalism. Lah was born in Seoul, South Korea and raised in Chicago.
By Sara Ganim, CNN Updated 9:18 AM ET, Tue November 3, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Nolan Burch's parents didn't know what West Virginia University knew -- that the fraternity their son was pledging had a history of bad behavior and was about to lose its charter. Email your story ideas and tips to CNNtips@cnn.com. (CNN)Nolan Burch's parents didn't know what West Virginia University knew -- that the fraternity their son was pledging had a history of bad behavior and was about to lose its charter. Email your story ideas and tips to CNNtips@cnn.com. Tucker Hipps' parents didn't know what Clemson University knew -- that there were an unprecedented number of fraternity violations happening in the weeks their son pledged. And Marquise Braham's parents didn't know what they say Penn State University allegedly knew -- that there were concerns about their son's well-being in the days leading up to his suicide. All three sets of parents now believe they were kept in the dark by institutions they trusted to care for their sons. The Burch, Hipps and Braham families share a common sadness -- their sons are dead, lost to what they believe was hazing-related behavior. They're three of the more than two dozen students who have died because of hazing at U.S. colleges and universities since 2008. And, CNN has learned, through record requests and other sources, that in five hazing-related deaths in as many years, institutions knew there was trouble before the deadly incidents happened. 'Occurrences of concern' Nowhere on West Virginia University's website did it say that Kappa Sigma fraternity had a history of, as the school now puts it, "occurrences of concern" -- specifically referring to the fraternity "behaving inappropriately and hosting an unsanctioned event." The fraternity was also warned about overcrowding in its off-campus residence. Burch, a WVU freshman, died following a fraternity hazing event in November 2014. His blood alcohol content was measured at 0.493, more than six times the legal limit to drive. His death led to the suspension of all Greek activities at WVU and criminal charges against two Kappa Sigma brothers. Two days before the event, where police say Burch and others were blindfolded and forced to drink liquor, the national office of Kappa Sigma notified WVU that it was pulling the charter of the local fraternity chapter. According to a statement given to CNN, the national office directed the local chapter to stop holding functions. But that directive was ignored, according to the fraternity's national office. "They'd been in so much trouble they (the national office) put cameras in the fraternity house," Burch's mother, Kim Burch, told CNN. "The frat actually installed cameras." Kim and T.J. Burch say their 18-year-old son was not aware of the fraternity's troubles when he decided to pledge. No one told him, and no one told his parents either. "We had no idea, unfortunately, until Nolan passed, that there had been so many problems," Kim Burch said. "It's sad. It's really sad. If we had known this was going on, we would have never let him join this fraternity." 'Unprecedented conduct issues' That same semester, Tucker Hipps' family had no idea that Clemson University was having a serious problem with fraternities. The university was considering a moratorium on all fraternity events, but decided just three days before Hipps died to hold off. It would later come out that Sigma Phi Epsilon violated five rules while Hipps was pledging, including violations related to hazing, harm to person, alcohol and organizational conduct. The university did not answer when asked by CNN if officials were aware of those five SigEp violations prior to Hipps' death. Hipps, 19, died after he fell, jumped or was pushed off a bridge during a predawn run that was against the fraternity's hazing policy. There's an open criminal investigation and the family is suing the university and three fraternity members, who all have denied knowing how he died. His parents say it was not for lack of trying that they did not know about the fraternity's problems. Hipps' father, in particular, was opposed to his son joining a fraternity at Clemson. "His dad was totally against it in the beginning," his mother said earlier this year. Cindy Hipps said she'd done her due diligence, even attending a Greek orientation meeting, which she said put her mind at ease. "After that class I felt better about it," she said. "They said kids in frats have better time management skills, set study times, did it as a group activity. Those kids had higher grade point averages. All the things a mother wants to hear, I heard. I convinced his dad to let him do it. Never once did I ever feel like my child would be harmed in any way." When she checked out Clemson's Greek life website, she saw only positive information, such as links to the average GPAs of each fraternity and sorority. There were two references to hazing policy, but nothing that explained which fraternities or sororities had been cited for violating those rules. But at that time, Clemson officials were concerned about "unprecedented conduct issues over the course of first 3 weeks of school," at several of the school's fraternities, according to internal documents obtained by CNN. After Hipps' death, Clemson added a list of suspended fraternities to its website. If Hipps' already-apprehensive parents had known what was going on at Clemson, they say, they would have pulled their son out of Greek life immediately. Dangers are not myths West Virginia University, Clemson and Penn State are not the only universities that brag about philanthropy, brotherhood and connections for life on their Greek life websites. Most schools list only the positives. Clemson's says "Greek organizations do hold social events, but most of these do not include alcohol." Penn State's goes as far as to say: "For many parents, the fraternity and sorority community reminds them of images of the movie Animal House. There are many myths about the fraternity and sorority community, but the reality is that men and women in fraternities and sororities are committed to their academics, volunteer their time in the community, develop and strengthen their leadership skills, and form a campus network with other fraternity and sorority members." That kind of language outrages Doug Fierberg, an attorney for the Braham family, who recently sued Penn State on the family's behalf and who has handled dozens of university misconduct cases in his career. "The dangers of fraternities are not myths. They are reality," Fierberg said. "The failure by universities to tell the truth about the risks facing students in fraternities specifically related to hazing misuse and abuse of alcohol and other misconduct is the new battleground." "It needs to be changed nationally, because parents and students are entitled to timely and accurate information about the risks they face. And universities have no basis, morally or legally, to withhold that information from the university community," he said. Some universities don't post a hazing policy on their Greek sites. For example, at West Virginia University, it's posted separately on the campus police site. (West Virginia University told CNN it is considering a number of changes, including "better and more timely communication.") Others have listed it in online FAQs, several clicks away from the positives. There are very few universities that list fraternity infractions on their websites, and even when they do, it's often difficult to determine what the infractions really mean. For example, after the 2008 alcohol poisoning death of Brett Griffin, 18, at the University of Delaware, Fierberg sued on behalf of the family and forced Delaware to change its Greek life site to list violations. But the list is vague, just listing things like "multiple violations" or "social policy violations" or "hazing/alcohol" without details of the incidents. "You're looking at best practices," Fierberg said, referring to the University of Delaware site. "What's 'multiple violations'? Were people hurt? Was a student hospitalized? What does it take to get suspended?" Northern Illinois University adopted a policy of putting sanctions on its website after the 2012 death of David Bogenberger, a 19-year-old pledge who was forced to drink alcohol and died. (Twenty-two brothers from the Phi Kappa Alpha fraternity were criminally charged and sentenced to two years of court supervision, plus community service.) Three months after his death, NIU made the change, but the list isn't on the Greek life website -- and it's so hard to find, CNN had to ask the university to point out where it is. (It's on a separate page, one for the Office of Community Standards & Student Conduct.) The relationship between universities and fraternities can be confusing, since many of them reside off-campus and are chartered by national organizations. But Fierberg said universities violate their duties to students and parents when they create websites about Greek life and only include feel-good information, instead of an accurate and complete picture. And national fraternities are no better. The only major fraternity that lists its violations is Sigma Alpha Epsilon, according to Fierberg, and that's because he sued SAE after the 2008 death of a fraternity pledge at California Polytechnic State University and forced it to list prior violations online. Carson Starkey, 18, died of alcohol poisoning following an event where pledges were forced to drink alcohol, vomit, and drink some more. The SAE chapter at Cal Poly had a prior drug violation before the death, according to Cal Poly. "(Universities) won't give you the full information because it will confirm that what you believe is right," Fierberg said. "Of course you have a zero tolerance policy. (Hazing is) illegal. ... But why wouldn't you tell parents it's still going on?" Fierberg said he suspects that the universities don't even write their own language for these Greek life information sites, since many of them look the same. In fact, a Google search of "myth" and "Greek life" and "hazing" and ".edu" shows nearly identical definitions of hazing on the websites of dozens of schools. Mental health emergencies Marquise Braham jumped off the roof of a Marriott in Nassau County, New York, in March of 2014, the same year that Hipps and Burch died. A source close to the case says there was evidence of alcohol-fueled physical and sexual hazing prior to Braham's suicide. Fierberg is representing Braham's family in its lawsuit against Penn State. Fierberg claims the university was aware there were "serious concerns" about the "well-being and psychological health" of Braham, 18, in the days leading up to his suicide. Phi Sigma Kappa told CNN it hasn't seen the lawsuit and will not comment. The police chief in Logan Township, Pennsylvania, where the satellite campus he attended is located, told local reporters that Braham had discussed hazing at his fraternity with an aunt and with several friends. The case is under investigation by the state attorney general, but no charges have been filed. The fraternity was suspended. Penn State said it couldn't comment on Braham's death, because of his family's pending lawsuit, but admitted there are times when the university reaches out to parents to notify them of harmful situations. "Emergency in this context includes mental health emergencies as well," university spokeswoman Lisa Powers said in an email. "In general, and in accordance with privacy laws and practices, when we have a student emergency we balance the critical nature/seriousness of the situation with the student's privacy rights as we make the decision to contact parents, or not." Many universities say they alert parents of health risks, such as when a student contracts a contagious disease, but there is no such pattern of reporting when it comes to other potential threats, like hazing. In addition to Hipps and Burch, there is the 2010 death of Samuel Mason, 20, who was allegedly made to drink a bottle of liquor in an hour while pledging Tau Kappa Epsilon at Radford University in Virginia. Radford University says that chapter of TKE had been found in violation of university policy earlier that year for serving alcohol to minors at a fraternity social event. His family sued and settled with the national fraternity and several of the local chapter's members. And the death of Armando Villa, a 19-year-old at California State University-Northridge, pledging Pi Kappa Phi, who died during a hazing-related 18-mile August hike where, his family lawsuit alleges, he and other pledges weren't given enough water. His fraternity had been cited for not completing required education programs and for holding unregistered events, and had just been reinstated after a suspension when the hike took place. A spokesman for the family says his mother, Betty Serrato, didn't know about the suspension and says that if she had, she would have tried to talk her son out of pledging that fraternity. Neither Radford or CSUN has sanctions posted on its website, although CSUN told CNN it is considering putting them online. "It's sad. It's really sad," Kim Burch said. "If we had known this was going on, we would have never let him join this fraternity. I never in my life thought I was sending a 17-year-old kid off to end up two months later gone. It's repulsive. He would have been better off joining the Marines and going to war."
By Tom Cohen, CNN Updated 5:05 PM ET, Tue June 3, 2014 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Listening to the White House, it sounds like an adventure movie -- the secret swapping of detained terror suspects for an ailing American soldier captured in Afghanistan. To Congress, it sounds like the same old same old -- the White House ignoring an obligation to let legislators know about the deal ahead of time. In the aftermath of Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl's weekend release in exchange for five Taliban figures held at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, some in Congress allege President Barack Obama broke the law by failing to inform them about the move 30 days in advance -- as called for under the National Defense Authorization Act. "The law says they are to give us 30 days' notice. If the President thought that was unconstitutional or an invalid law, than he shouldn't have signed the bill," said Georgia's Saxby Chambliss, the top Republican on the Senate Intelligence Committee. "He knew very well that he was required by law to give us 30 days' notice and he didn't do it." Obama told reporters in Poland on Tuesday that the circumstances required an immediate decision within his authority as commander in chief. "We saw an opportunity" "We have consulted with Congress for quite some time about the possibility we may have to execute a prisoner exchange," Obama said of past talks involving Bergdahl. "We saw an opportunity and we were concerned about his health and had cooperation from the Qataris and we seized that. It was truncated to make sure we didn't miss that opportunity." The issue touches on flashpoints old and new between the administration and its critics, especially conservative Republicans seeking to depict Obama as a weak leader driven by political concerns for his legacy. Foremost is whether the Obama administration actually broke the law by not telling Congress beforehand about the weekend exchange in which Bergdahl got handed over to U.S. military commandos near the Afghanistan-Pakistan border while the five alleged senior terrorism figures were flown to Qatar. Under the National Defense Authorization Act signed into law by Obama late last year, the administration gained some added flexibility in transferring detainees from Guantanamo Bay, but was required to notify Congress 30 days in advance. However, legislators had no power to block such a transfer. Writing about the law last year, Benjamin Wittes of the Brookings Institution said it put the administration "in a position to move detainees out of Guantanamo as long as it is willing to be politically accountable for the problems they create and as long as they don't bring them to the United States." "It was lawful," White House says That is exactly what happened, National Security Council spokeswoman Caitlin Hayden argued Tuesday in a statement. "Given the credible reports regarding the risk of grave harm to Sergeant Bergdahl and the rapidly unfolding events surrounding his recovery, it was lawful for the administration to proceed with the transfer notwithstanding the notice requirement" in the NDAA, Hayden said in a statement. CNN legal analyst Jeffrey Toobin disagreed, saying Obama "clearly broke the law" even if he can provide a legal justification for what he did. The bottom line, to Toobin, was that the law calls for 30 days' notice and Obama didn't do it. Under the law, Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel can authorize such a transfer if he "determines that actions have or will be taken that substantially mitigate the risk that the individual will engage in activity that threatens the United States or U.S. persons or interests," or if the transfer "is in the national security interest of the United States," Hayden said. In Poland, Obama noted Tuesday that Qatar provided assurances it would monitor the activities of the five Guantanamo detainees, described as senior terrorist figures. Under the terms of the exchange, the five released Taliban figures can't leave Qatar for a year. "We will be keeping eyes on them," Obama said, noting the possibility existed the freed detainees would continue with terrorist activities but adding "I wouldn't be doing it if I thought that it was contrary to American national security." Even more, he contended, the move adhered to a bedrock U.S. value of protecting its own. "Regardless of the circumstances, whatever those circumstances may turn out to be, we still get an American soldier back if he's held in captivity. Period. Full stop," Obama said. "We don't condition that, and that's what every mom and dad who sees a son or daughter sent over to a war theater should expect from not just their commander in chief but the United States of America." On the 30-day notification period for Congress, Hayden said the Obama administration determined that such a wait could scuttle the swap and perhaps cost Bergdahl his life. Conflicting responsibilities She provided a legal explanation, saying the Constitution requires Obama as President and commander in chief to protect the lives of Americans abroad and protect U.S. soldiers, responsibilities that in this case conflicted with the 30-day notification period for Congress. "We believe it is fair to conclude that Congress did not intend that the administration would be barred from taking the action it did in these circumstances," she wrote. Hayden also noted that in signing the NDAA, Obama said the law "in certain circumstances would violate constitutional separation of powers principles." "The executive branch must have the flexibility, among other things, to act swiftly in conducting negotiations with foreign countries regarding the circumstances of detainee transfers," Hayden quoted from Obama's signing statement. Toobin said the signing statement amounts to the President's opinion "of what the law should mean," rather than a legal ruling. "This is an example of a signing statement where the President is taking power for himself that the law didn't give him," Toobin said. "That may be constitutional, but it is still a violation of what the law says." To Congress, the exchange irritated an already raw nerve over the never-ending power struggle between the White House and legislators, who accuse every administration of trying to run roughshod over congressional authority. Even an Obama ally like Democratic Sen. Dianne Feinstein of California told CNN that as the chair of the Senate Intelligence Committee, she should have received some advance notice of the swap involving Guantanamo detainees. On Tuesday, Feinstein told reporters that the White House deputy national security adviser, Tony Blinken, called her to apologize for the lack of advance notice. However, it was unclear from Feinstein's comments if Blinken referred to a courtesy call or the 30-day notification under the law. Meanwhile, both Feinstein and House Speaker John Boehner said the White House encountered opposition from top Democrats and Republicans on congressional intelligence committees when it previously discussed the possibility of exchanging Bergdahl for Guantanamo detainees as far back as 2011. "Given the past briefings and concerns we had addressed -- and these were from both committees and the leadership of both committees; the concerns were bipartisan -- and I strongly believe that we should have been consulted, that the law should have been followed and I very much regret that that was not the case," Feinstein said. Boehner, an Ohio Republican, also argued that the past discussions meant legislators expected the Obama administration to brief them again before any exchange took place, adding: "The only reason it did not is because the administration knew it faced serious and sober bipartisan concern and opposition." However, another veteran Democrat said the administration took all the proper steps under the circumstances. "We received a detailed classified notification from the Secretary of Defense that satisfies the many substantive certification requirements of the National Defense Authorization Act," said a statement by Sen. Carl Levin of Michigan, who chairs the Senate Armed Services Committee. Noting that Obama "put Congress on notice" last December that he intended to act quickly in such cases, "members of Congress should not be surprised that he acted as he did in the circumstances that existed." GOP attack strategy Republicans piled on as part of their strategy to tarnish both the Obama and Democratic brands ahead of November's congressional elections and the 2016 presidential vote. Some GOP committee chairmen in the House already plan for hearings on the legality of the swap, a move backed by Boehner. Chambliss, who is retiring when his current term expires at the end of the year, challenged the administration's explanation that Berhdahl's ill health necessitated moving swiftly to complete the weekend exchange. "There is no indication of that other than what this President said and I don't believe a thing this President says now," he said. Veteran GOP Sen. John McCain of Arizona took broader aim on Tuesday, telling Fox News that the Bergdahl swap was part of what he called a misguided policy to get all American troops out of Afghanistan by the end of 2016 -- a timetable Obama announced last week. "The president may be ending the war in Afghanistan, but the Taliban and al Qaeda are not ending the war in Afghanistan," said McCain, a constant critic of any effort by Obama to limit U.S. military presence abroad. Obama, who defeated McCain in the 2008 presidential election, "is carrying out a foreign policy of unreliability and weakness" that will cost the nation "for years to come," said the senator, himself a former prisoner of war. Toobin said he expected the controversy to remain in the political arena, noting that the courts rarely if ever get involved in power squabble between the executive and legislative branches. "This just shows that members of Congress, even Democrats, are very jealous of institutional power," he said, "and that Congress doesn't want to be treated like a doormat, even by a President of the same party." Obama defends prisoner exchange for Bergdahl Fellow soldiers call Bowe Bergdahl a deserter, not a hero
By Thom Patterson, CNN Updated 4:40 PM ET, Tue April 19, 2016 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)The crash of a huge C-130J cargo plane that killed 14 people in Afghanistan in October is being blamed on the misuse of a night-vision goggles case, according to a U.S. Air Force investigation report. CNN's Barbara Starr and Theodore Schieifer contributed to this report. (CNN)The crash of a huge C-130J cargo plane that killed 14 people in Afghanistan in October is being blamed on the misuse of a night-vision goggles case, according to a U.S. Air Force investigation report. CNN's Barbara Starr and Theodore Schieifer contributed to this report. The flight crashed 28 seconds after takeoff from Jalalabad Airport near the Afghan-Pakistani border on October 2 as it was heading to Bagram Airfield. Initially, the Taliban said Islamist fighters had downed the four-engine plane, but U.S. military officials immediately shed doubt on those claims. The dead included the pilot, co-pilot, two loadmasters, two security team members and five contractors as passengers. Three Afghan guards on the ground were also killed when the plane hit a guard tower, said the report, which was released Friday. The report revealed details of the unusual circumstances behind the crash, which it said was caused by a seemingly harmless item: a small, hard-shell, night-vision goggles case. While the plane was on the ground loading and offloading cargo, the pilot placed the goggles case in front of the cockpit yoke, which is used to steer the plane during flight. The pilot put the case there to prop up part of the plane's tail -- the elevators -- to help the loading team deal with some tall cargo. The goggles case was never removed from the cockpit yoke. During the first seconds of takeoff, the plane's nose started to pitch up too far, so the pilot tried to adjust by moving the yoke forward. But the goggles case blocked the yoke. Read the U.S. Air Force crash investigation report (PDF) The pilot "misidentified the ensuing flight control problem," the report said, "resulting in improper recovery techniques" by both the pilot and the co-pilot. The plane's nose pitched upward too fast, leading to a stall and a crash, the report said. The aircraft exploded upon impact, it said, and everyone on board died instantly. "The blocking of the flight controls during loading operations is a non-standard procedure," the report said, "as such, there is no regulatory guidance to prohibit the act, or to address the proper placement and removal of the object blocking the controls." The report said it was the responsibility of the pilot and co-pilot to remember to remove the goggles case, even though it wasn't on their checklist before takeoff. The Air Force said the C-130J Hercules cost $48.5 million per aircraft. The Pentagon identified the airmen killed in the crash as Capt. Jonathan J. Golden, 33, of Camarillo, California; Capt. Jordan B. Pierson, 28, of Abilene, Texas; Staff Sgt. Ryan D. Hammond, 26, of Moundsville, West Virginia; Senior Airman Quinn L. Johnson-Harris, 21, of Milwaukee; Senior Airman Nathan C. Sartain, 29, of Pensacola, Florida; and Airman 1st Class Kcey E. Ruiz, 21, of McDonough, Georgia. Golden, Pierson, Hammond and Johnson-Harris were assigned to the 39th Airlift Squadron, Dyess Air Force Base, Texas. Sartain and Ruiz were assigned to the 66th Security Forces Squadron, Hanscom Air Force Base, Massachusetts.
By Carol Costello, Anchor Updated 11:34 AM ET, Tue September 19, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Carol Costello is the host of "Across America With Carol Costello" on HLN. The views expressed in this commentary are hers. (CNN) "Why did you have to shoot?" Join us on Twitter and Facebook Carol Costello is the host of "Across America With Carol Costello" on HLN. The views expressed in this commentary are hers. (CNN) "Why did you have to shoot?" Join us on Twitter and Facebook The pain in Bill Schultz's voice was palpable as he stood beside his attorney, barely 24 hours after a Georgia Tech police officer shot and killed his child. "That's the only question that matters now," Schultz said. The facts -- as we know them -- are tragic. Scout Schultz was a troubled student, who according to the family's attorney, may have been suffering a mental breakdown. Police say Schultz advanced toward them and threatened them with a knife. Scout Schultz, according to a profile on the website of the Georgia Tech Pride Alliance, identified as nonbinary and intersex and preferred the pronouns "they" and "them." Police, guns drawn, asked the student to "drop it." Schultz shouted, "Shoot me." When, according to police, Schultz "continued to advance on the officers with the knife," one officer fired his service revolver. It is unclear whether Schultz intended to prompt the killing -- investigators say three suicide notes were found in the student's dorm room -- but we do know Schultz had battled mental health issues like many who ultimately decide to force the hand of a cop and end their lives. But set aside the Schultz case, and it is clear that there is a serious pattern of confrontations between emotionally troubled people and the police. Nationwide, the number of what some call "suicides by cop" is statistically troubling. The Tampa Bay Times compiled the number of officer-involved shootings in Florida between 2009 and 2014. It found that 246 police shootings involved someone with an apparent mental instability. According to its data, the newspaper tagged 85 of the shootings as "suicide by cop." A few months back I talked with Sheriff Mike Chitwood of Volusia County, Florida. "In my little small pocket of the world, we've had three police shootings since January," he told me. "All three shootings involved a mentally ill person not on their medication or not getting the proper care and firearms." Chitwood, who was interviewed beforehand and did not comment on what happened at Georgia Tech, surprised me when he took it a step further -- violent offenders suffering from mental illness, he said, are "our biggest threat in law enforcement today." The numbers bear that out and are much too high, Chitwood said. "We should not be called to the home of a mentally ill person by their mom and (the) mom says ... he's naked in the living room, wielding a machete and he wants you guys to kill him, please come help me. And 22 seconds after we arrive, we give him his wish." Yes, he added, in many cases such shootings are justified by law but "sometimes lawful is awful." There are solutions. One is to use strategies such as "time, distance and cover," which Chitwood said is the proper way to deal with a mentally ill person wielding a deadly weapon. "We spend an awful lot of time training with our firearms -- and rightfully so -- (but) we spend a minimal amount of time using the thing we use every single day in our careers. And that's our mouths. And our brains." Back at Georgia Tech, violent protests broke out Monday night following a vigil held for Schultz, prompting Schultz's family to urge students not to respond to violence with further violence. Meanwhile, the school is recommending that students "take advantage of all the resources on campus, for mental, emotional and physical well-being." A lot of attention has rightly been brought to the shootings of African-Americans by police, most recently by the protests in St. Louis over the acquittal of a former police officer who shot and killed a black motorist. As we learn more about what happened to Scout Schultz, I hope greater attention can also be paid to the shootings of mentally ill Americans as well.
Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Wolf
Nima Elbagir is a Senior International Correspondent based in CNN's London bureau. Full Bio Elbagir joined CNN in February 2011 as a reporter based at network's Johannesburg bureau, before later moving to Nairobi. Africa has been the focus of her reporting for CNN and she has been at forefront of nearly every major news story from the continent in the past three years. At immense personal risk she reported on the Ebola outbreak which has ravaged West Africa, going inside Liberia's quarantine zones and exploring the devastation the disease has wrought across both urban and rural communities. Elbagir was also the first international journalist to report from Chibok, the northern Nigerian village from which over 250 schoolgirls were kidnapped by the terrorist group Boko Haram. Here she was able to interview two young girls who had managed to escape, and who described the ordeal of the capture and the fear they now felt. Elbagir filed several exclusive reports on the story of Yehya Ibrahim, a Sundanese woman sentenced to death for committing apostasy -- interviewing Ibrahim's estranged family and her terrified husband. Her work on this story brought the attention of the world to Ibrahim's plight, helping to generate the political pressure which eventually led the Sudanese government to grant her a reprieve. She also led CNN's coverage on the spiraling violence which engulfed the Central African Republic, traveling with the French troops as they worked to broker peace between entrenched Muslim and Christian fighters. She was also reported from Somalia at the height of the Horn of Africa famine; she was granted an exclusive phone interview whilst in Tripoli with Safia Gadhafi, the former Libyan leader's wife; following the revolution in Egypt, Elbagir interviewed the Justice Minister Mohamed Abdelaziz al-Juindy, who called for former Egyptian President Hosni Mubarak to face the death penalty; she reported from South Sudan as the new African country celebrated independence.. Prior to this, during her time freelancing for CNN, the stories she covered during this time included the escalating violence against women in the Congo; Nigeria's 50th anniversary of independence; the South Sudanese Referendum; and CNN's coverage of the Hajj. Before joining CNN, Sudanese-born Elbagir worked in various capacities for the UK's Channel 4 for a number of years from 2005: She freelanced from Kabul for Channel 4 News; reported for the "Unreported World" documentary strand; and both reported and presented for Channel 4 News and More4 News. During this period, Elbagir's exclusives included getting the first interview with the Aegis security company whistleblower on the Iraq "Trophy Videos" (2005); interviewing Jacob Zuma in the run-up to his rape trial (2006); being the only Western journalist reporting from Mogadishu during the U.S. bombing of Somalia (2007); and broadcasting the first televised evidence of Iranian weaponry smuggled to the Taliban (2009). Elbagir began her journalism career as a stringer with Reuters in 2002 reporting from Sudan, and one of the first to provide footage from inside Darfur; while also filing material for the Economist, the FT and Radio France International. She stayed on with Reuters as a London-based Graduate Trainee through to 2005.
Atika Shubert is a CNN Senior International Correspondent based in Berlin. Full Bio Atika Shubert is a CNN Senior International Correspondent based in Berlin. Prior to Berlin, she was based in London, Jerusalem, Tokyo and Jakarta for CNN. During her time in Europe Shubert has played a key role in reporting on terror attacks across the continent, including the Paris Attacks in November 2015 and the shooting in Munich in July 2016. She reported extensively on the aftermath of German Chancellor Merkel's immigration policy and the refugee crisis - from rescue boats off Greece to refugee shelters in Germany. Shubert also covered the presidential election in Austria in December 2016, in which van der Bellen defeated the far-right candidate Norbert Hofer. Whilst in London, Shubert was CNN's lead reporter on the WikiLeaks scandal, the largest leak of classified U.S. government documents in U.S. history. She also reported on the 2011 riots that shook England, and the British phone-hacking scandal that embroiled media mogul Rupert Murdoch. In Jerusalem, Shubert reported extensively on the Israeli-Palestinian conflict. Her reports included coverage of Israeli and Palestinian peace negotiations, Palestinian militant rocket attacks into Israeli towns as well as fighting between Palestinian factions Hamas and Fatah within Gaza. From Tokyo, she covered the controversial deployment of the country's Self Defense Forces to Iraq as well as North Korea's testing of nuclear weapons. During the 2004 Indian ocean tsunami that killed more than 200 thousand people, Shubert was one of the first correspondents to report live from Aceh, Indonesia, the area closest to the epicentre. Her reports from the devastated region helped earn CNN the prestigious Alfred I. Dupont-Columbia Award in 2005. Shubert started her career with CNN as a producer in Jakarta, Indonesia where she covered the fall of Indonesia's President Suharto in 1998, East Timor's transition to independence in 1999 and the 2002 Bali bombings. She graduated with a bachelor's degree in Economics from Tufts University in Boston and speaks Bahasa Indonesia.
Catherine Shoichet covers immigration for CNN Digital.
By Catherine E. Shoichet, CNN Updated 11:22 PM ET, Wed August 31, 2016 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)As word of Donald Trump's surprise trip south of the border spread, many Mexicans took to social media with a common refrain: "Is this a joke?" Un adelanto de lo que veremos maana #TrumpEnMexico @EPN @realDonaldTrump pic.twitter.com/BzxCE2Gzaw Venga seor presidente, hgale la bromita en migracin de que no entra a Mxico y ser hroe nacional  #TrumpEnMexico #SrTrumpConTodoRespeto, lo invitamos a que nos visite para recordar la historia y no la repita. #TrumpAlMuseoMyT pic.twitter.com/RN9lMX8zMu #TrumpsMexicoTripSayings The Mexican people love me so much they all honor me with paper statues. pic.twitter.com/GCAB2oEtUy Sr. @realDonaldTrump aunque lo hayan invitado, sepa que no es bienvenido. Los mexicanos tenemos dignidad y repudiamos su discurso de odio. CNN's Rafael Romo, Rosa Flores, Alejandra Oraa, Christina Zdanowicz and Mallory Simon contributed to this report. (CNN)As word of Donald Trump's surprise trip south of the border spread, many Mexicans took to social media with a common refrain: "Is this a joke?" Un adelanto de lo que veremos maana #TrumpEnMexico @EPN @realDonaldTrump pic.twitter.com/BzxCE2Gzaw Venga seor presidente, hgale la bromita en migracin de que no entra a Mxico y ser hroe nacional  #TrumpEnMexico #SrTrumpConTodoRespeto, lo invitamos a que nos visite para recordar la historia y no la repita. #TrumpAlMuseoMyT pic.twitter.com/RN9lMX8zMu #TrumpsMexicoTripSayings The Mexican people love me so much they all honor me with paper statues. pic.twitter.com/GCAB2oEtUy Sr. @realDonaldTrump aunque lo hayan invitado, sepa que no es bienvenido. Los mexicanos tenemos dignidad y repudiamos su discurso de odio. CNN's Rafael Romo, Rosa Flores, Alejandra Oraa, Christina Zdanowicz and Mallory Simon contributed to this report. But it wasn't long before they started coming up with jokes themselves about the controversial visit. Many also poked fun at Mexican President Enrique Pea Nieto, who has agreed to meet with Trump and whose popularity has been tanking. "An advanced look of what we'll see tomorrow," one person tweeted Tuesday night, posting an image of the lead characters from the 1990s cartoon "Beavis and Butt-head." Mexican actress Ana Brenda tweeted an idea, encouraging Pea Nieto to block Trump at the border. "You will be a national hero," she wrote. Mexico City's Museum of Memory and Tolerance, which includes exhibits on the Holocaust and the US Civil Rights Movement, offered Trump free admission. "We invite you to visit us to remember history and not repeat it," the museum said on Twitter. It's no surprise that Trump, who launched his presidential bid with a speech referring to Mexicans who illegally cross the US border as murderers and rapists, isn't popular in Mexico. Here's a look at ways some in the neighboring country have responded to the US presidential candidate and his proposals: Pounding piatas Trump has already been in Mexico for months -- as a piata. Just a few days after the billionaire businessman announced his campaign, an artist in Reynosa, Mexico, started making piatas of a man in a suit with wispy orange hair. It wasn't long before similar models were for sale across the country. The idea quickly caught on in the United States as well, with stores in Texas and California selling out of the popular items. And tweets mocking Trump's Mexico visit Wednesday picked up on the trend, imagining what the presidential hopeful might say when he sees the piatas. Making a mask factory great again Owners of a Halloween mask factory in Jiutepec, Mexico, told CNN's Rafael Romo earlier this year that they were busier than ever, thanks to Trump. Trump's fame in the United States -- and infamy in Mexico -- drove demand for an unflattering Trump mask, which picked up last fall when it became clear that the Republican presidential candidate was a serious contender. "We weren't making this mask with hair at first," co-owner Ricardo Esponda told CNN, "but some of our customers asked for it. It's got to have hair." Families fear impact But for some Mexicans, Trump's proposals are no laughing matter. Several families told CNN's Rosa Flores last month they were terrified by Trump's proposal to cut off money transfers from the US to Mexico. "It's not right," Martha Mendoza said as she cooked tortillas at her home in the town of Francisco Villa. Town leader Jaime Leon said he was worried about the future of his small village. "Francisco Villa, without money transfers (from the US), will drown," he said. "It will downward spiral." Ex-Presidents slam wall proposal While Pea Nieto seems to have extended an olive branch, several former Mexican leaders have made it clear they'll never see eye to eye with Trump. Former President Vicente Fox didn't mince words when a reporter asked earlier this year about Trump's proposal to make Mexico pay for a wall at the border. "I'm not going to pay for that f***ing wall. He should pay for it," Fox told Fusion's Jorge Ramos in a interview. Since then, Fox, who led Mexico from 2000-2006, has continued to slam the Republican candidate. "Trump is using Mexico, is using President Pea to push his sinking poll numbers," Fox told CNN ahead of Trump's trip. And former first lady Margarita Zavala joined the fray on Wednesday, sending a tweet to Trump. "Even though they have invited you, know that you are not welcome," she wrote. "Mexicans have dignity and we repudiate your discourse of hate."
Becky Anderson is the anchor of "Connect the World with Becky Anderson." Tune into the show Sunday to Thursday at 4:00 pm BST / 8:00 pm GST. Full Bio Becky Anderson is one of CNN International's highest profile anchors. She hosts "Connect the World with Becky Anderson," which airs weekdays at 4:00 pm BST. Anderson is based in CNN's Abu Dhabi bureau, allowing her a distinctive regional perspective on some of today's most important news stories, including the deepening humanitarian crisis in Syria, continuing unrest in the wake of the Arab Spring and the ongoing Israeli-Palestinian peace process. Anderson is a skilled interviewer, adept at close questioning and has interviewed many of the world's leading politicians, decision-makers & thought-leaders. She has conducted one-on-one interviews with top world leaders, including, Desmond Tutu, Kofi Annan, Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu, Afghan President Hamid Karzai, South African President Jacob Zuma and UN Secretary General Ban Ki-Moon. She is equally at home with celebrities, quizzing the world's A-listers, including Lupita Nyong'o, Oprah Winfrey, Juliette Binoche, Andrew Lloyd-Weber, Beyonc, George Clooney, Lady Gaga, Tom Hanks, Javier Bardem and Brad Pitt. In July of 2014 Connect the World left its Abu Dhabi base for a two week-long journey around the Middle East at an extraordinary time of upheaval. Anderson and the team visited Cairo, Jerusalem, Istanbul and Beirut, bringing a range of interviews, reports and packages to CNN International viewers around the globe. As the crisis in Gaza deepened, Becky's exclusive interview with Shimon Peres, in his final weeks as President of Israel, made headlines worldwide. Elsewhere, she sat down with Lebanon's Prime Minister, Tammam Salam; Qatari Foreign Minister, Khali Al-Attiyah; and Turkey's Prime Minister, Recep Tayyip Erdogan. Anderson has reported from Greece on the anti-austerity riots, Tunisia during the Arab Spring uprisings and Rome on the abdication of Pope Benedict and the installation of his successor Pope Francis. She was also the official CNN Olympic Games Correspondent in 2012 and broadcast live from London's Buckingham Palace on the birth of Prince George. She also played a lead role in CNN's extensive coverage of both the 7/7 attacks in London and the network's coverage of the war in Iraq. Latterly Anderson has also focused on covering issues affecting women and young people around the world. She has interviewed senior Saudi officials on the countries women's rights record while, as part of 'Connect the World', she discussed with a panel of experts if the Arab Spring had brought about new opportunities for women and young people. In 2013 she also hosted a live chat with NASA astronaut Karen Nyberg who was based on the International Space Station, asking her questions crowd-sourced from social media. Anderson has extensive business journalism experience including posts with the UK's ITN, CNBC Europe and Bloomberg. She began her career in journalism as a print reporter with various business publications in Arizona, after gaining a Master of Mass Communication from the Walter Cronkite School of Journalism at Arizona State University in 1992 and in 2012 was inducted into their hall of fame. She gained her BA (Hons) in Economics at Sussex University in the UK.
Ryan Browne is a CNN reporter based in Washington, D.C. covering the Department of Defense from the Pentagon. Full Bio Ryan Browne is a CNN reporter based in Washington covering the Department of Defense from the Pentagon. Since joining in 2015, Browne has reported for CNN from several countries around the world including Afghanistan, Iraq, Israel, Bahrain, the United Kingdom, India, Japan and also aboard the USS George H.W. Bush. He has covered numerous defense and national security topics including NATO, the recent conflicts in Syria, the 2017 U.S. raid in Yemen and the investigations into ties between Russia and former U.S. National Security Adviser Lt. Gen. Michael Flynn. Prior to joining the network, Browne was deployed with the NATO Training Mission in Afghanistan as an advisor to the Afghan National Army. He has previously worked overseas in Japan as well as with the Center for the Study of the President and Congress as their Director of International Security Studies. Browne has a Master of Business Administration from Columbia University and a Bachelor of Arts degree in Government from Harvard University, where he also played on the varsity football team.
By Paul Callan Updated 12:49 PM ET, Tue September 26, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Paul Callan is a CNN legal analyst, a former New York homicide prosecutor and currently is counsel at the New York law firm of Edelman & Edelman PC, focusing on wrongful conviction and civil rights cases. Follow him on Twitter @paulcallan. The opinions expressed in this commentary are his own. (CNN)The painful debate about the causes and cures for racial injustice in America flares periodically to capture the nation's attention. It did again over the weekend when many NFL players locked arms or knelt in protest during the playing of the National Anthem at football games across the country. Join us on Twitter and Facebook Paul Callan is a CNN legal analyst, a former New York homicide prosecutor and currently is counsel at the New York law firm of Edelman & Edelman PC, focusing on wrongful conviction and civil rights cases. Follow him on Twitter @paulcallan. The opinions expressed in this commentary are his own. (CNN)The painful debate about the causes and cures for racial injustice in America flares periodically to capture the nation's attention. It did again over the weekend when many NFL players locked arms or knelt in protest during the playing of the National Anthem at football games across the country. Join us on Twitter and Facebook The protests were triggered by President Donald Trump's comments at an Alabama rally on Friday and subsequent tweets challenging the patriotism of athletes who kneel during the playing of the anthem. He suggested that these "son of a *****" athletes had dishonored the flag and deserve to be fired by their NFL employers. On Monday the President defended his attacks, even after team owners issued their own angry responses to his temper tantrum. This conflict has stirred impassioned debate around the nation about larger questions: the right to protest peacefully in a manner that many Americans, nonetheless, perceive as a form of disrespect for the flag or our troops, and the concern held by many that our President was focused on a few protesting football players instead of on the North Korean crisis, health care or Puerto Rico's recovery in the aftermath of Hurricane Maria. One often-heard, but inaccurate, refrain among the talking heads was that the athletes had a "legal right" to peacefully protest in football stadiums across the country because the US Constitution guarantees freedom of speech. "It's a free country" this line of thinking goes, and American soldiers have fought and lost their lives to preserve this sacred right. The fact is, these athletes do not have the "right" to protest at football games unless their employers consent to the conduct. Their private employers have a legal right under the US Constitution to fire or suspend players who engage in acts of protest on the field during the playing of the National Anthem and the display of Old Glory. Imagine what would happen if some of the TV anchors or commentators decided to "take a knee" during their shows in an act of protest. My bet is that in most places they would be fired or suspended -- as would protesting bank tellers, store clerks, security guards, restaurant workers or anyone else with a job to do. As an attorney, I would likely be held in contempt of court if I interrupted my presentation to a judge to protest racial injustice in America by kneeling. Yes, America is a "free country," whose citizens enjoy greater liberty and "freedom of speech" than any place on Earth, but even here there are limitations to these rights. The courts have repeatedly affirmed restrictions on time and place in the legitimate exercise of our Constitutional rights. Try shouting your opposition to the Trump administration during a Broadway show and see what happens. You'll have to ask a friend how the show ended. You can explain your inaccurate concept of free speech as the usher throws you out of the theater. The First Amendment of the US Constitution outlines both the extent and limitation of our most important rights. It states: "Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the government for a redress of grievances." Notice the words "Congress shall make no law..." The Founding Fathers made no mention of restricting the right of the National Football League or any other private employer to "prohibit" or "abridge" the freedom of speech. Colin Kaepernick should please take notice of the wording the next time he claims that his right to protest was violated when no team would sign him after he became a free agent. He had no "on the field" free speech rights under the Constitution. Perhaps he should consider registering to vote if he really wants to change public policy. The First Amendment restricts only the government from abridging "the freedom of speech." Private employers can do as they please. Thus, kneeling during the National Anthem can never be legally prohibited by the government, but can always be prohibited by private employers. NFL owners have so far made no attempt to create a league-wide rule on the matter of these protests. Much will undoubtedly depend on how the controversy affects ticket sales and whether the President continues to stir the pot with early morning tweets. A Reuters poll conducted last year when Kaepernick's protest methodology was a hot topic suggested that 72% of Americans viewed Colin Kaepernick's protest actions as "unpatriotic," despite his stated rationale. The same poll, however, concluded that only 40% of minorities disagreed with the Kaepernick's form of protest, suggesting a big racial divide on the issue -- and potentially among sports fans as well. Whichever side of the issue is a winner for sports fans, they should be clear about one thing. America may be a "free country" but the Constitution takes no position on the actions of professional athletes staging protests on the field. The matter of cheering them, booing them or firing them has been left entirely in the hands of the fans and team owners. Unlike our current President, the Founding Fathers, apparently, had more important matters on their minds.
By Jason Hanna, Devon Sayers and Madison Park, CNN Updated 9:35 AM ET, Wed November 23, 2016 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Just one day after he is alleged to have killed a San Antonio police officer, and hours before he was arrested, Otis Tyrone McKane got married. CNN's Emanuella Grinberg and Jamiel Lynch contributed to this report. (CNN)Just one day after he is alleged to have killed a San Antonio police officer, and hours before he was arrested, Otis Tyrone McKane got married. CNN's Emanuella Grinberg and Jamiel Lynch contributed to this report. Documents obtained by CNN show that McKane was married Monday, a day after San Antonio police Detective Benjamin Marconi was shot dead. McKane, 31, was arrested just hours after his marriage on suspicion of killing Marconi. Police say they believe Marconi was killed specifically because he was a law enforcement officer. The name of the person McKane married was redacted in the documents CNN received. A marriage license was issued at the Bexar County Clerk's Office at 9:57 a.m. CT Monday, the documents show. A judge then performed the ceremony, said Priscilla Hernandez of the Bexar County Clerk's Office. Around that time, San Antonio police were publicizing surveillance video, recorded Sunday, of the man they believed shot Marconi, but did not release a name. The video showed a man seen inside police headquarters four hours before the shooting and a car leaving the scene, CNN affiliate KPRC reported. Marconi, 50, was shot at close range Sunday before noon as he wrote a traffic ticket outside of police headquarters. Police arrested McKane late Monday afternoon. A SWAT team stopped him as he was riding with a woman and a 2-year-old child on Interstate 10, San Antonio Police Chief William McManus said. McKane already has offered an apology to the dead officer's family. As he was being escorted out of the police department after his arrest, reporters asked him why he had been upset. "Society not allowing me to see my son," McKane replied. "I lashed out at somebody who didn't deserve it." "I've been through several custody battles and I was upset at the situation I was in." When asked if he had anything to say to Marconi's family, he replied: "I'm sorry," as he was escorted away. The shooting Police say Marconi had pulled over a driver on the south side of the police station on Sunday and returned to his patrol car to write a ticket. That's when a man pulled up behind him. The man walked up to the patrol car driver's side window and shot the officer in the head, McManus said. The man then reached through the open window and shot him a second time, he said. After the shooting, the man returned to his vehicle and drove away. Officers found McKane by using videos and information turned up by the investigation, the chief said. They kept him under surveillance for several hours, police said. It wasn't immediately clear if that surveillance covered McKane's visit to the courthouse for the wedding. "Based on the actions of this individual prior to the shooting, we have a fairly good video documentation of what he was doing," McManus said. "I am still convinced that he was targeting blue -- targeting a San Antonio Police Department officer, no matter who it was. It was any officer he came across." "This case, although we've made an arrest, is far from over," McManus said. "We continue to investigate and until we have every shred of evidence that we believe exists, we'll then turn it over to the District Attorney for prosecution." McKane has a criminal history. In 2012 he pleaded no contest to an assault charge, according to a court database. Several police officers targeted over weekend The police shooting in San Antonio was one of four incidents in which law enforcement officers were shot Sunday. Marconi was the only fatality that day, but his death marked the 60th fatal shooting of an officer in the line of duty this year, according to the National Law Enforcement Officers Memorial Fund. Well-wishers formed a makeshift memorial with flowers, balloons and cards in honor of Marconi in front of San Antonio police headquarters. His family released a statement thanking the community for their support and prayers. "He was well-respected," McManus said of the 20-year police veteran. "He was a great guy, a great investigator. He was just a solid guy and I can't describe the loss to the police department and the community."
A self-described "news junkie" since the age of 11, Doug Criss has been at CNN since 2010. Before that he worked as the copy desk chief for the Atlanta Journal-Constitution. He's also had reporting and editing stints at newspapers in Texas, Illinois, South Carolina and his home state of Arkansas.
By Michael D'Antonio Updated 9:20 AM ET, Wed October 4, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Michael D'Antonio is the author of the book "Never Enough: Donald Trump and the Pursuit of Success" (St. Martin's Press). The opinions expressed in this commentary are his. (CNN)Finally lumbering into a devastated Puerto Rico aboard Air Force One, almost two weeks after Hurricane Maria made landfall, President Trump came face-to-face with the kind of reality he can't deflect with anger and derision. A world waited to see if in a crisis, an unscripted Trump would rise to the occasion. He did not. Join us on Twitter and Facebook Michael D'Antonio is the author of the book "Never Enough: Donald Trump and the Pursuit of Success" (St. Martin's Press). The opinions expressed in this commentary are his. (CNN)Finally lumbering into a devastated Puerto Rico aboard Air Force One, almost two weeks after Hurricane Maria made landfall, President Trump came face-to-face with the kind of reality he can't deflect with anger and derision. A world waited to see if in a crisis, an unscripted Trump would rise to the occasion. He did not. Join us on Twitter and Facebook Upon arriving, Trump sat with a group of government officials and began praising his own administration. Like Snow White's evil stepmother who demanded the mirror remind her that she is "the fairest of them all," he then asked Rep. Jenniffer Gonzlez-Coln to join in the fawning and flattering. "I watched the other day," said the TV-addicted President, "and she was saying such nice things about all of the people who have worked so hard. Jenniffer, do you think you can say a little bit of what you said about us today?" He quickly added, "It's not about me," but of course it was. As everyone knows, the only way to deal with the President is with praise, indulgence and political pats on the head. Thus it was that Gonzlez-Coln and all those who spoke to the President gave him the verbal thumbs-up even as the 3.5 million people of Puerto Rico entered their third week of suffering as many still lacked electricity, secure supplies of food and reliable clean water. Indeed, the only real complaint came from Trump himself, who said, "I hate to tell you Puerto Rico, but you've thrown our budget a little out of whack." A narcissist's tour de force, Trump's arrival meeting was likely the first time any president visited a part of the country ravaged by natural disaster and complained about the cost of the emergency response. Something inside him realized he had gone too far. "That's fine," he quickly added, "We've saved a lot of lives." Lifesaving is what the federal government is supposed to do when disaster strikes, and when hurricanes recently ravaged Texas and Florida he wasted no time getting to the scene and never complained about the cost. In the case of Puerto Rico, he wasted time on bashing football players protesting racial inequities and took his eye off the island as he enjoyed a long weekend at a golf resort. As the Washington Post reported, for four days "Trump and his top aides effectively went dark themselves." Trump was so slow to react to the tragedy in Puerto Rico that the mayor of San Juan cried out in frustration. Naturally, the President took personal offense. "The Mayor of San Juan, who was very complimentary only a few days ago, has now been told by the Democrats that you must be nasty to Trump," the President said in a tweet from his golf club in Bedminster, New Jersey. He also said, "Such poor leadership ability by the Mayor of San Juan, and others in Puerto Rico, who are not able to get their workers to help. They want everything to be done for them when it should be a community effort." The bizarre comments were just another example of the psycho-political dynamic that makes dealing with this President so difficult. In his world, problems are caused by bad people, especially his personal enemies, and if you don't want him to blame you for causing problems then you had better make it clear that you agree with him. As Trump established himself in Washington, his minions were challenged to live in his distortion field. At the start, Sean Spicer showed how it was done as he affirmed the President's wildly inaccurate claims about the enormous crowds at his inauguration. In February, adviser Sebastian Gorka said reports of White House chaos were inaccurate, even as stories of disarray poured out of 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue. By June, everyone seemed to have figured out how to make Trump happy. During a bizarre Cabinet meeting, he was praised like a god. Chief of staff Reince Priebus was typical as he said, "We thank you for the opportunity and blessing to serve your agenda." Though able as toadies, Spicer, Gorka and Priebus would soon be gone from the White House because they, nevertheless, failed as mirrors for the Trump image. This is another problem when it comes to a chief executive with a brittle ego. Though he demands loyalty from others, he is stinting in his own commitments, and woe to the man or woman who makes him look bad. Take, for example, the administration's other recent debacle, which culminated with Health & Human Services Secretary Tom Price resigning after spending $1 million on private and military jet travel. Trump demanded he go, not because he abused the taxpayers, but because the scandal made him, Donald Trump, look bad. "Look, I think he's a very fine person," Trump said of Price before adding, "I certainly don't like the optics." Denying the reality everyone else can see, Trump said Price was a "fine man," and not an arrogant bureaucrat, because to say otherwise would suggest that he had made a mistake when selecting him in the first place. Trump is so allergic to even the hint of a mistake, miscalculation or inadequacy that he's rather confess that he was bothered by the way Price made him look than by what he actually did. The President's preference for his own reality is not new. Throughout his life, he has used his money, power and temper to construct his own reality. His massive business bankruptcies were not failures but brilliant bits of management. He said he was New York's biggest builder when he wasn't. And, as Adweek pointed out, he declared that his reality TV show "The Celebrity Apprentice" was Number 1, even when it was 41st. His reality shows, pasted together from days of video-taped interactions, were no more real than the conspiracy Trump once claimed was responsible for the idea that asbestos was a human health hazard. However, it was the ideal expression of the mind of Donald Trump. Everyone on the program competed for his attention, and praised his acumen. On television, as in his offices, there was no percentage in piercing the fantasy. The problem for Trump is that some realities cannot be explained away by complaints about "fake news" or by his usual methods of blaming and shaming others. In Puerto Rico, he was confronted with the immutable fact of a devastating hurricane. He failed in his initial response, made things worse by lashing out at the locals and mishandled a visit that should have been all about compassion but was instead, all about him. Sadly, the country is also struggling to recover from another massive tragedy in Las Vegas where a gunman killed 59 people and injured hundreds more at a music festival. This crisis was so acute that the President was able to appear on TV, speak the comforting words written for him and not make things worse. When the President arrives in Las Vegas this week on yet another mission that calls for presidential grace, in response to trauma, he will have one more opportunity to show he is more than self-centered, ego-driven and insecure. It's another chance to occupy the same reality that brings such pain to the rest of us. His record leaves great doubt as to whether he's up to it.
By Holly Yan, CNN Updated 3:25 PM ET, Mon October 23, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl spent five years held captive by the Taliban. And depending on the outcome of his sentencing hearing, he could spend the rest of his life behind bars. CNN's Kellie Keesee, Devon Sayers, Martin Savidge, Zachary Cohen and Matt Wotus contributed to this report. (CNN)Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl spent five years held captive by the Taliban. And depending on the outcome of his sentencing hearing, he could spend the rest of his life behind bars. CNN's Kellie Keesee, Devon Sayers, Martin Savidge, Zachary Cohen and Matt Wotus contributed to this report. Bergdahl, 31, pleaded guilty last week to misbehavior before the enemy and desertion. His sentencing hearing was scheduled for Monday, but was postponed until Wednesday due to an attorney's family emergency. Bergdahl deserted from his outpost in Afghanistan in June 2009. Hours later, he was captured by the Taliban. He was eventually released in a controversial prisoner swap in exchange for five Guantanamo Bay detainees. During a hearing last week, Bergdahl told the judge, Army Col. Jeffery R. Nance, that he was trying to reach the base from where he was dispatched. Bergdahl said he wanted to report "a critical problem in my chain of command," but did not specify what that problem was. "I left my observation post on my own," Bergdahl told the judge last week. "I understand leaving was against the law." The judge said Bergdahl faces up to life in prison. Taliban capture and torture During his five years in Taliban captivity, Bergdahl made "somewhere between a dozen and 15 escape attempts," he told the judge last week. Bergdahl previously described the torture he endured, which included months chained to a bed and years either locked in a cage or chained on all fours. After five years, the Taliban released Bergdahl in a prisoner swap for five detainees at Guantanamo Bay. At the time, President Barack Obama cited a "sacred rule" in attempting to rescue American service members -- no matter the circumstances surrounding their capture. "We still get an American soldier back if he's held in captivity. Period. Full stop. We don't condition that," Obama said at the time. Since then, Bergdahl has been called both a traitor and a hero. Celebrated at first, Bergdahl's release raises more questions In 2015, an Army Sanity Board evaluation said Bergdahl had schizotypal personality disorder. That information was included in the hundreds of pages of documents that Bergdahl's defense team released on a website called The Bergdahl Docket. Former comrade: 'He's still a coward' Retired Army Spc. Cody Full, a member of Bergdahl's platoon in Afghanistan, called Bergdahl a "coward." He said the military has an open-door policy for service members to voice concerns about chains of command, so Bergdahl had no reason to desert. "He was a coward nine years ago when he deserted, and I think he showed he's still a coward," Full said. "He refuses to take responsibility for his actions." Who is Bowe Bergdahl? Those actions, Full said, jeopardized the safety of other service members. "He literally put thousands and thousands of people's lives at risk just so he could go and want to complain for whatever transgressions he thought happened or didn't happen," Full said. The prosecution has said it intends to call two soldiers and a Navy SEAL who they say were wounded during the search for Bergdahl. But the Army general who led the investigation into Bergdahl's actions in Afghanistan testified that jail time for him would be "inappropriate." Maj. Gen. Kenneth Dahl said he did not find any evidence to corroborate reporting that Bergdahl was sympathetic to the Taliban." And Terrence Russell, who debriefed Bergdahl while working for the Department of Defense's Joint Personnel Recovery Agency, said the sergeant suffered "horrific" conditions while in Taliban captivity. "An army of one, he had to fight the enemy alone for four years 11 months," Russell testified in 2015. "You cannot overestimate how difficult that is." On Sunday, Eugene Fidell, Bergdahl's civilian defense attorney, would not share with CNN whom the defense plans to call as a witness during the sentencing phase of the trial. Trump: Bergdahl 'should be shot' During the 2016 presidential campaign, Donald Trump said Bergdahl "should be shot" for walking off his post. "In the good old days, he would have been executed," Trump said. After Trump took office, Bergdahl's lawyers argued the judge should dismiss the charges because of Trump's comments, claiming Trump violated Bergdahl's due-process rights and saying it would not be possible for Bergdahl to get a fair trial. Bowe Bergdahl: I wanted to be Jason Bourne But a military judge ruled against dismissing charges. Bergdahl later chose to be tried by a military judge rather than a jury. In an exclusive interview obtained by ABC last year, Bergdahl said he didn't think he would be able to get a fair trial after Trump's comments that he should be shot. "We may as well go back to kangaroo courts and lynch mobs. They got what they wanted," Bergdahl said. "People who are to the point of saying, 'Yeah, just shoot him' -- you can never convince those people to change their minds."
Clare Sebastian is a correspondent for CNN International based in New York. She covers business and financial stories for CNNI's news and business shows. Full Bio Clare Sebastian is a correspondent for CNN International based in New York. She covers business and financial stories for CNNI's news and business shows including Quest Means Business and CNNMoney with Maggie Lake. Most recently she reported on the Wells Fargo fake account scandal, the Volkswagen emissions scandal and completed an investigation into Donald Trump's legacy in Atlantic City. She has also reported extensively from Moscow, covering the Olympic doping scandal and the Russian view on the 2016 U.S. presidential election campaign. Sebastian was previously a senior producer for Quest Means Business. She produced shows on location from Buckingham Palace to Berlin to the New York Stock Exchange, and developed much of the show's original content. She has also produced breaking news coverage for CNN during the Arab spring and the Greek debt crisis. Before joining CNN in 2008, Sebastian worked as a producer and reporter at Russia Today (RT) in Moscow. She graduated from Cambridge University in 2006 with a Bachelor of Art's degree in Modern Languages. Sebastian is fluent in Russian.
By Dana Bash, CNN Updated 7:27 AM ET, Fri October 6, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Washington (CNN)H.R. McMaster, President Donald Trump's national security adviser, invited a small group of Democratic senators to the White House Wednesday to discuss the President's plans on the Iran deal, and lawmakers left with the impression that he was not sold on the idea that decertifying is the right way to go, according to two sources familiar with the meeting. Stockpiles & centrifuges: The deal has curbed Iran's nuclear program, reducing its stockpiles of enriched uranium by 97 percent and cutting the number of its centrifuges by two-thirds. Uranium enrichment: It still allows Iran to continue enrichment -- enough for civil use to power parts of the country, but not enough to build a nuclear bomb. Inspections: Iran is required to provide inspectors from the UN's nuclear watchdog access to monitor its declared nuclear facilities. Compliance: Every 90 days, the US President must certify to Congress that Iran is keeping up its end of the deal. If the President does not certify the agreement, Congress has a statutory 60-day period to decide whether to reimpose sanctions. Sanctions: If Iran doesn't comply, US, European Union, and UN nuclear-related sanctions on the Iranian economy would be reinstated. A number of non-nuclear-related sanctions currently remain in place. Sources: White House, State Department, Congress, CNN Washington (CNN)H.R. McMaster, President Donald Trump's national security adviser, invited a small group of Democratic senators to the White House Wednesday to discuss the President's plans on the Iran deal, and lawmakers left with the impression that he was not sold on the idea that decertifying is the right way to go, according to two sources familiar with the meeting. Stockpiles & centrifuges: The deal has curbed Iran's nuclear program, reducing its stockpiles of enriched uranium by 97 percent and cutting the number of its centrifuges by two-thirds. Uranium enrichment: It still allows Iran to continue enrichment -- enough for civil use to power parts of the country, but not enough to build a nuclear bomb. Inspections: Iran is required to provide inspectors from the UN's nuclear watchdog access to monitor its declared nuclear facilities. Compliance: Every 90 days, the US President must certify to Congress that Iran is keeping up its end of the deal. If the President does not certify the agreement, Congress has a statutory 60-day period to decide whether to reimpose sanctions. Sanctions: If Iran doesn't comply, US, European Union, and UN nuclear-related sanctions on the Iranian economy would be reinstated. A number of non-nuclear-related sanctions currently remain in place. Sources: White House, State Department, Congress, CNN The sources said the meeting was clearly intended for McMaster to get ideas from key Senate Democrats on how to avoid decertifying the Iran deal, which many in both parties think would destabilize relations with allies and make it harder to confront foes well beyond Iran. These sources say McMaster never explicitly said he disagrees with the President, nor that he wants Trump to certify that the Iran deal is in America's national interest. But the sources say McMaster repeatedly responded to Democratic senators' entreaties not to decertify Iran and instead look for bipartisan alternatives by saying that he is not the one they have to convince, suggesting they were preaching to the choir. An administration source told CNN that the senators got the wrong impression from the meeting, and insisted that McMaster is not only behind the President's Iran strategy -- he worked with the whole team to craft it. McMaster wants to make it a better deal to address the major flaws that both Republicans and Democrats agree have to be addressed, the source said. Michael Anton, a spokesman for the National Security Council, told CNN that McMaster "fully agrees" with Trump that the Iran deal is "seriously flawed." "He continues to work tirelessly through the interagency process to present the President with options to address those flaws. He is also helping the administration work with legislators to develop a common US government approach to deny the Iranian regime all paths to a nuclear weapon," he said. Trump plans to "decertify" the Iran nuclear deal next week, declaring the Obama-era pact not in US interests and launching a congressional review period on the accord, according to two senior US officials. Any ease from McMaster in decertifying the Iran deal puts him on the same side as other top members of the Trump national security team. Just this week, Sen. Angus King, a Maine independent, asked Defense Secretary James Mattis whether he thinks it is in America's national security interest to stay in the Iran deal. "Yes, senator, I do," Mattis responded. The bottom line impression that several senators got from McMaster was that the President simply does not feel comfortable putting his name on a piece of paper saying it is in America's national interest to be part of the deal, and that it was a heavy lift getting the President to certify twice this year that Iran is complying with the deal. The senators brought into the meeting are highly engaged on the Iran issue, or are more moderate Democrats who tend to be more likely to work with the President, the sources said. At one point during the meeting, Democratic North Dakota Sen. Heidi Heitkamp spoke up seemingly in Trump's defense, the sources said, expressing an understanding of the point of view that it's hard for the President to put his name on documents related to an Iran deal that he doesn't believe in. This story has been updated.
Jason Kwok is an Associate Creative Director for CNN Digital, based in Hong Kong. Full Bio Working as part of a global Design team, Jason provides creative solutions including interactives, infographics and other digital elements for CNN. He is an amateur photographer and enjoys taking urban Hong Kong city scenes.
By Scott Jennings Updated 9:38 AM ET, Sat September 30, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Scott Jennings is a CNN contributor and former special assistant to President George W. Bush. He is a partner at RunSwitch Public Relations in Louisville, Kentucky. The opinions expressed in this commentary are solely those of the author. (CNN)We've got enough data and anecdotes now to make an early call on whether President Donald Trump's fight over NFL players kneeling during the National Anthem was a political winner for him. With a small and probably irrelevant caveat, it was. Join us on Twitter and Facebook Scott Jennings is a CNN contributor and former special assistant to President George W. Bush. He is a partner at RunSwitch Public Relations in Louisville, Kentucky. The opinions expressed in this commentary are solely those of the author. (CNN)We've got enough data and anecdotes now to make an early call on whether President Donald Trump's fight over NFL players kneeling during the National Anthem was a political winner for him. With a small and probably irrelevant caveat, it was. Join us on Twitter and Facebook Two national surveys with rigorous methodologies show Americans are opposed to kneeling during the National Anthem: -- A Fox News poll found 55% of Americans saying kneeling is inappropriate. -- The most recent CNN/SSRS poll of adults found 49% saying the players are doing the wrong thing, versus 43% who say they are doing the right thing. Almost one-quarter of American adults said they planned to personally boycott NFL games, broadcasts and products because of the protests. Inside the CNN poll, Trump got what he wanted: More Republicans (87%) and Independents (48%) sided with him than not. Heck, even 21% of Democrats are with him on the NFL issue. Even 24% of people who disapprove of the job he's doing overall see this issue his way. (A bevy of other surveys of varying methodologies have also found clear majorities agreeing with Trump). Anecdotally, anger over the protests continues to bubble. DirecTV, the satellite television provider with the Sunday Ticket NFL package, is offering refunds to fans offended by the protests. According to The Wall Street Journal: "A substantial number of cancellations risks further damage as the league tries to rebound in ratings. Viewership fell last year and continues to do so this year." The caveat on all of this is that the surveys also show people largely disagreeing with Trump's call for kneeling players to be fired. But for Trump, that's irrelevant. He wasn't laying out an official policy pronouncement as much as he was channeling the gut-level feelings of the average voter eating breakfast at the Hardee's in Dayton. And don't forget -- a sizable portion of the American electorate would oppose any Donald Trump suggestion, whether he's talking football or fried potatoes. Calling for the players to be fired reminds me of Trump's calls to "lock her up" during the 2016 presidential campaign. I'm sure some people thought he might actually jail Hillary Clinton should he win the election, but most folks saw the chant for what it was: hyperbole designed simply to channel public sentiment. Reading the Washington Post piece this week about Darrell Hammond, the former "Saturday Night Live" cast member who did the best Trump impression before being unceremoniously dumped in favor of Alec Baldwin, the talented comedian summed up Trump's political instincts succinctly: "genius empath." In the case of the NFL protests, Trump absorbed and channeled the feelings of most Americans, a vast majority of likely voters, and nearly all of his supporters. By taking the extra step of calling for players to be fired, he stoked even hotter outrage from all the people he intends to inflame, a strategy of his that works time and again. He wants his most liberal enemies in politics and media to take the bait on these cultural war asides, and they usually (and stupidly) oblige. These battles illustrate why the Democratic Party has "lost favor among voters in rural and small-town America," as legendary journalist Dan Balz reported last year. People don't take kindly to not standing for the National Anthem in all the places Trump and the Republicans need to win in 2018 and 2020. Trump couldn't care less if people in urban areas, where Republicans have no hope of competing anyway, are upset with his strident, colorfully communicated views. Like a political magician with an endless bag of predictable-yet-entertaining tricks, Trump turned Democrats into the urban elite, anti-working man party in 2016. In 2017, he has turned them into the anti-American flag party. If Democrats don't stop taking the bait on these things, for his next trick, Trump might just make them disappear in 2018 and 2020.
By Scott Zamost, Drew Griffin and Curt Devine, CNN Updated 5:11 PM ET, Tue September 15, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Miami (CNN)Inside a plane at Miami International Airport, baggage handlers are going on a shopping spree with passengers' bags. Email your story ideas and tips to CNNtips@cnn.com. CNN's Yasmin Khorram and Harmeet Kaur contributed to this report. Miami (CNN)Inside a plane at Miami International Airport, baggage handlers are going on a shopping spree with passengers' bags. Email your story ideas and tips to CNNtips@cnn.com. CNN's Yasmin Khorram and Harmeet Kaur contributed to this report. What they don't know is that they are being recorded on a hidden camera. The Miami-Dade Police Department set up the camera as part of an ongoing police investigation into luggage thefts by the very airport workers who are supposed to get bags safely onto planes. "It's a problem we all face," said police Lt. Pete Estis. "We will continue to be proactive until we can see that the claims of pilfering through luggage will actually decrease." Miami Aviation Director Emilio T. Gonzlez said the insider theft cases "are indeed the exception among the thousands of decent, hardworking employees at MIA, and they have been prosecuted to the fullest extent of the law for their crimes." And these insider thefts just don't happen in Miami. A CNN analysis of passenger property loss claims filed with the TSA from 2010 to 2014 shows 30,621 claims of missing valuables, mostly packed in checked luggage. The rest occurred at security checkpoints. Total property loss claimed: $2.5 million. John F. Kennedy International Airport in New York topped the list of airports with the most claims of thefts from luggage, followed by Los Angeles International, Orlando International and Miami International, according to the data. The problem has been so serious at JFK that in 2013, El Al Airlines set up a hidden camera in a baggage hold. The camera showed baggage handlers stealing items on flights bound for Israel, including a $5,000 Seiko watch, iPhones, an iPad, cameras, gold rings and cash. Six of those arrested pleaded guilty to possession of stolen property or petty larceny and the seventh suspect's case was sealed, according to the Queens District Attorney's Office. The high-profile case, though, didn't stop the thefts. Two more baggage handlers at JFK were arrested in 2014 after authorities said they stole two designer handbags from a suitcase, and then tried to sell them on eBay. Then, in December, seven more JFK baggage handlers were charged with stealing valuables from checked luggage. The items were stolen from suitcases of passengers traveling to or from Hawaii, Japan, Johannesburg, London, Bangkok, Dubai, Milan and various U.S. cities. In Miami, which aggressively goes after luggage thieves, police have arrested 31 baggage handlers and ramp workers since 2012, including six so far this year. Police set up a hidden camera inside the belly of a plane last year and caught baggage handlers rifling through luggage and stealing various items. Another hidden camera caught a baggage handler rummaging through bags in a secure luggage room inside the airport while a security guard looked the other way. "Insider threat is very scary for us in law enforcement, and certainly someone taking somebody's cell phone, iPad, computer -- what's next?" Estis said. A CNN investigation earlier this year found that Miami and Orlando are the only two major airports in the country that require employees to be screened through metal detectors. Miami even checks employees when they leave work to go into the main terminal. But that apparently hasn't stopped the luggage thieves. "As far as being able to get the property off the airfield, that's a great question," Estis said. "We have theories." In Los Angeles, police last year executed search warrants on 25 locations after getting complaints about thefts in two terminals. Among the valuables found were computers, watches, jewelry and cameras and designer bags. Sixteen airport workers were fired. "We cut theft in those two terminals by 60% because of doing that aggressive investigative work," said Patrick Gannon, police chief of Los Angeles International Airport. Luggage theft could definitely lead to more serious problems, he said. "I absolutely think that if we don't pay attention to the small things that happen around here, that it could lead to much larger things. So there is, I believe, a connection between baggage theft and terrorism," Gannon said. Even the TSA has had problem employees. Since 2002, the agency has fired 513 officers for theft. It employs about 50,000 officers today, and last year screened more than 443 million checked bags and nearly 1.7 billion carry-ons. DA: Guns smuggled on planes by Delta employee 'egregious' security breach Luggage theft isn't confined to airport workers. Outsiders have been caught on surveillance cameras stealing luggage from carousels. CNN contacted airports around the country and found while the total thefts from carousels are relatively low, it continues to be a problem. For example, Seattle reported 214 luggage thefts from carousels and other airport locations last year, 200 in Las Vegas, 36 in Atlanta, 35 in Phoenix, 15 at Ronald Reagan Washington National, 14 at Dulles International and 10 at Chicago's O'Hare Airport. Odd TSA finds
Cynthia Hudson is senior vice president and general manager of CNN en Espaol and Hispanic strategy for CNN/U.S. Full Bio Cynthia Hudson is senior vice president and general manager of CNN en Espaol and Hispanic strategy for CNN/U.S. Hudson oversees all aspects of CNN's Spanish-language media businesses, including newsgathering, editorial content, programming, production, operations and personnel, of the CNN en Espaol 24/7 television news network, CNN en Espaol RADIO and CnnEspaol.com Since her arrival, Hudson re-launched CNN en Espaol's multi-platform business with expanded feeds for Latin America, Mexico and the United States, as well as revamping the network's programming and branding. She changed the channel from a news wheel to a program-based information network and added a studio in Miami, as well as expanding production in key bureaus in Mexico, Argentina, Washington, D.C. and Los Angeles. Hudson launched CNNEspaol.com and expanded the radio business to include over 150 new affiliates in the U.S. and another 100 markets in Latin America and Europe. Hudson added new talent and hit shows such as Cala, Caf CNN, Conclusiones and CNN Dinero, and launched originally produced documentaries, investigative series and live programming. In addition to an extensive bilingual staff at CNN headquarters in Atlanta, CNN en Espaol' s operations include a newsgathering Spanish-speaking personnel based at the CNN bureaus in Washington, New York, Los Angeles, Miami, Buenos Aires and Jerusalem, and a worldwide network of nearly 50 Spanish-speaking contributing journalists. Under Hudson, CNN en Espaol has won two Emmys, three GLAAD Awards, two Promax-BDA awards, as well as an honorable mention at the Shortly Awards for Best Multi-Platform Campaign for Social Coverage of 2014 Venezuelan Crisis. Before joining CNN en Espaol, Hudson served as chief creative officer and executive vice president for SBS and managing director of Mega TV. There she was responsible for SBS' expansion, directly overseeing flagship TV station Mega TV, as well as the company's internet site lamusica.com and other new media development. In addition, Hudson supervised the strategic expansion of SBS content across multiple media platforms and development of branded entertainment synergies among all SBS properties. Mega TV saw tremendous growth under her watch and garnered the network 27 EMMY awards in just four years since its launch. From 1997 to 2005, Hudson served as senior vice president and editorial director of Cosmopolitan Television (a Hearst Entertainment and Syndication Group division), heading up the creation and development of the Cosmopolitan TV Networks, including Canal Cosmopolitan Iberia and Canal Cosmopolitan Latin America as well as the foundation for Cosmo TV Canada. There she led the research, development and creation of Cosmo TV, overseeing design of original programs, on-air packaging, promotions and program acquisitions, as well as the creation and production of original formats and the overall business strategy for the networks. Hudson also wrote and created the original drama, Miami Sands, Promark's internationally successful English-language American telenovela. Prior to Cosmopolitan TV, Hudson was senior vice president of programming and creative services for United International Holding's joint venture channel service, United Family Communications (UFC), now MGM Networks Latin America. While at UFC she created Casa Club TV, the first pan-regional Home channel for Latin America (today MGM). Hudson was the vice president of programming and production for the Telemundo Network from 1992-94. During her tenure, the network's programming line-up was redesigned, achieving its highest ratings to date and developing its first in-house telenovela production unit with successes such as "Tres Destinos," a prime-time scripted drama series that debuted in 1994. From 1984 to 1992, Hudson held various production and executive positions with the Univision Network, including Executive Producer of the first daytime U.S. Hispanic magazine show, "TV Mujer" ("TV Woman"), which garnered Univision its first Emmy Award for ongoing series production. Hudson started her professional career as a news producer and reporter at Univision affiliate WLTV 23, where she held various positions from reporting to production and management. Hudson has won 8 regional Emmy Awards, been named as one of People en Espaol's most powerful women, as well as one of the most powerful Hispanics in Poder, Hispanic Target and other influential publications. Born in Los Angeles, she holds a Masters in Communications from the University of Miami, and is fluent in English and Spanish.
Kristie Lu Stout is an award-winning anchor and correspondent for CNN International. Full Bio Kristie Lu Stout is an award-winning anchor and correspondent for CNN based in Hong Kong and host of the daily, live CNN flagship program 'News Stream'. For CNN Digital and TV, she has conducted a number of in-depth interviews with some of the world's most innovative thinkers including serial entrepreneur Elon Musk, Vogue editor Anna Wintour, and portrait photographer Annie Leibovitz. Lu Stout has been awarded Best Current Affairs Presenter and Best News Presenter at the Asian Television Awards, while her program 'News Stream' has been awarded Best News Program. She has also been recognized by the Royal Television Society for her work as part of an award-winning team that covered Super Typhoon Haiyan in the Philippines. Based in China for almost two decades, Lu Stout keeps a particular focus on how developments in China are dramatically changing the world for all of us. From anchoring CNN's groundbreaking 'Eye on China' series in 2004, to CNN's 'Countdown Beijing' ahead of the 2008 Olympics, Lu Stout has remained committed to reporting on the country. She was also instrumental in launching 'On China,' CNN's first-ever regular series focused on the country -- a first by any international TV news network. On News Stream, Lu Stout digs deep into world affairs with expert analysis and commentary. She also identifies and reports on emerging tech trends -- bringing what's next into focus for her global audience. With over 450,000 fans and followers on social media, Lu Stout believes in continually engaging with her viewers and makes social media an integral part of her reporting. She also believes in contributing to the debate with viewers off-camera with regular speaking and moderating appearances around the world, and is well known for her style in stimulating frank and lively question-and-answer sessions. Kristie Lu Stout started her career in journalism in San Francisco at Wired magazine's online division. She has written on technology for various media publications including the South China Morning Post, where she founded and wrote the "Beijing Byte" column. Before her career in journalism, she was an early employee at Beijing-based Internet company Sohu.com and worked for Reuters' new media team in China. Lu Stout is American of Chinese and European descent. She holds a bachelor's and a master's degree from Stanford University, and studied advanced Mandarin Chinese at Beijing's Tsinghua University. Follow her at: @klustout facebook.com/KristieLuStout gplus.to/klustout
Christopher Lett is a Field Producer based in Atlanta. He comes to CNN from AmeriCorps VISTA. Full Bio Christopher Lett is a Field Producer based in Atlanta. He comes to CNN from AmeriCorps VISTA where he volunteered as a Community Service Coordinator. When he is not breaking news from far flung locations you can find him in the studio painting or deep sea fishing.
By Doug Criss, CNN Updated 4:01 AM ET, Thu September 21, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Be prepared. Your Secret Santa will probably disappoint you this year, cause your Secret Santa isn't Bill Gates. (CNN)Be prepared. Your Secret Santa will probably disappoint you this year, cause your Secret Santa isn't Bill Gates. A Reddit user named Aerrix says the world's richest man -- worth a cool $75 billion, in case you've forgotten -- sent her gifts last week through Reddit's Secret Santa Gift exchange. The gifts were awesome, and she was a little bit excited about it. We know this because about half of the words in a post she wrote about it were in all caps. Aerrix wrote of getting a mysterious box -- a "freakin' HUGE BOX," she called it -- of opening it and seeing a picture of Gates in a Santa hat on top, of calling her husband and blurting out the news -- "BILL GATES IS MY FREAKIN SANTA!!!!!!!" -- and of course, going through and unwrapping these gifts of pure joy. She loved them, because Gates, the Microsoft founder and philanthropist, did his homework. You see, Aerrix loves stuff like video games and the Legend of Zelda. It says so on her Reddit Gifts profile page, which Gates obviously read, because he loaded her up with all kinds of goodies like: the matching Zelda mittens for her and her dog ... and the Minecraft edition Xbox One (with three wireless controllers) ... and the Harry Potter slippers ... and the Cajun cookbooks (because she's from southern Louisiana and hasn't forgotten her roots) ... and a Legend of Zelda master sword (it's made out of paper) ... and the photoshopped picture of Aerrix, her husband and Gates in a cute as pie Zelda frame. But Gates wasn't done, she wrote. He also made a donation in her name to code.org, which helps students learn about computer science. "Which is AWESOME because it's something near and dear to my heart as my husband is a programmer and my brother has a degree in computer science!" she wrote. This Secret Santa stuff is nothing new for Gates though. He's has been doing this since at least 2013. And he's not the only celebrity doing the Santa thing. Other celebs like Alyssa Milano and Snoop Dogg have also taken part in Reddit's Secret Santa exchange. So it makes you wonder for next year ... is Warren Buffett on Reddit?
Kristen Holmes is a national correspondent for CNN Newsource, CNN's network of more than 1,000 affiliates. She is based in CNN's Washington, D.C. bureau. Full Bio Kristen Holmes is a national correspondent for CNN Newsource, CNN's network of more than 1,000 affiliates. She is based in CNN's Washington, D.C. bureau. Holmes first joined CNN as an intern for Piers Morgan Live after graduating from Columbia's Graduate School of Journalism. After her internship, she became an editorial producer for The Lead with Jake Tapper, a CNN producer in the White House and a CNN producer embedded with the 2016 Trump campaign. While in Washington, D.C., she also worked as a producer on several projects with Katie Couric at Yahoo and with News Channel 8. Holmes graduated with a Bachelors of Science from Northwestern University and spent two years as an elementary school teacher in Chicago through Teach for America.
By Eliott C. McLaughlin and Devon M. Sayers, CNN Updated 8:42 PM ET, Tue August 9, 2016 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)A North Carolina man who said he was "on the neighborhood watch" fatally shot a 20-year-old from inside his garage before telling a 911 dispatcher he was protecting his family from "hoodlums," according to Raleigh police. (CNN)A North Carolina man who said he was "on the neighborhood watch" fatally shot a 20-year-old from inside his garage before telling a 911 dispatcher he was protecting his family from "hoodlums," according to Raleigh police. Chad Copley, 39, was charged with the death of Kouren-Rodney Bernard Thomas, who police said was outside Copley's home when he was shot just before 1 a.m. Sunday. Copley is being held without bond at Wake County Detention Center, police said. Thomas is African-American. Copley is white. Police said Copley used a shotgun, but they haven't disclosed the type of shotgun or the ammo used. The News & Observer in Raleigh reported Monday that there was glass in Copley's yard and driveway from the blast traveling through one of the home's windows. There were also blood stains and bloody gauze a few feet from the street, the newspaper reported. Wearing a red prison jumpsuit, Copley entered a courtroom Monday and winked at his family in the gallery. A judge assigned the Capital Defenders Office to defend Copley. The office told CNN that Raymond Tarlton would represent Copley. Tarlton's office issued a brief statement saying it was in the preliminary stages of its investigation and cautioning against a rush to judgment. "We have seen too many wrongful convictions for anyone or any organization to jump to conclusions on the basis of someone being charged," the statement said. Trayvon Martin redux? Though there appears to be no evidence of a physical altercation between Copley and Thomas, the case bears similarities to the shooting death of Trayvon Martin, in which neighborhood watch volunteer George Zimmerman killed the unarmed teen in Sanford, Florida, in 2012. A jury found Zimmerman, who claimed he had shot Martin in self-defense, not guilty in the teen's death. Much like the Martin case, Sunday's shooting can be partially pieced together through 911 calls. It begins when a man calls police from Copley's two-story single-family home to report "a bunch of hoodlums out here racing." "I am locked and loaded," he tells the dispatcher. "I'm going outside to secure my neighborhood. You need to send PD as quickly as possible." The dispatcher asks, "I'm sorry. You're going out to do what to the neighborhood, sir?" "I'm going to secure my neighborhood. I'm on the neighborhood watch. I'm going to have the neighbors with me. There's hoodlums out here racing up and down the street. It's 1 o'clock in the morning. There's several dozen of them. They have firearms, and we're going to secure our neighborhood. If I were you, I'd send PD as quickly as possible." Asked if he can provide a house number or intersection, he says "Negative, ma'am. It's on Singleleaf, Raleigh, North Carolina. PD know where this is at." 'I fired a warning shot' Another man calls 911 shortly thereafter to report a shooting. "Someone shot him out of his house," the caller tells the dispatcher. Asked his name, the caller hangs up. A woman then calls from Copley's home and says she's upstairs with her children before giving the phone to a man who acknowledges someone was shot and that he fired his weapon, but he seems unsure whether his shot hit anyone. "We have a lot of people outside our house yelling and shouting profanities. I yelled at them, 'Please leave the premises.' They were showing a firearm, so I fired a warning shot and we got somebody that they got hit." "OK, so somebody was shot?" the dispatcher asks. "Well, I don't know if they're shot or not, ma'am. I fired my warning shot like I'm supposed to by law. They do have firearms, and I'm trying to protect myself and my family," the man replies. The dispatcher asks who is outside his house, and the man says he doesn't know but there's a party at a nearby home. The back-and-forth is interrupted by some sort of commotion before the man again orders the dispatcher to send police. "There are frigging black males outside my frigging house with firearms. Please send PD," he says. 'I'm trying to secure my premises' Another witness then calls to say someone had been shot in the arm in front of Copley's home. Again, commotion muddles the audio. The witness says the 20-year-old victim was shot in the arm, is unconscious and lying in the road. He doesn't know who fired the shot, he says. Other witnesses claim the gunshot came from inside the home, the person tells 911. A dispatcher then calls Copley's home to gather more details, and the man who made the initial call tells the dispatcher, "Ma'am, I don't know these f***ing people. I'm trying to secure my premises. Please send PD immediately." The dispatcher says police are on the way. The man responds that the dispatcher is "killing time," and she argues that she isn't wasting time and that someone else is dispatching police. The call appears to end abruptly. Thomas was pronounced dead at WakeMed Hospital in Raleigh, police said. 'He loves pink' Jalen Lewis, who hosted a party at his home, two doors down from Copley's, on the night of the shooting, said the victim was one of roughly 50 guests at the party, according to CNN affiliate WTVD. He didn't know Thomas personally, he said, and he didn't see anyone armed or causing problems outside his home that night. Lewis told WTVD he has never interacted with Copley in the seven years he's lived in the Raleigh neighborhood. "The man's body was right in front of the mailbox," Lewis told the station, pointing to Copley's mailbox. "I don't know how (Thomas) was a threat from the garage." Thomas' mother, Munyir Simone Butler Thomas, has set up a GoFundme page to cover her son's funeral costs. On the page, she said Thomas was out celebrating a move to a new apartment on the night he was killed. "Koury was my baby and I love him. He loves pink and all I want to do is send him off well. He was fun, lovable, caring, just a good guy, and very overprotective of me his mother and other loved ones in general," she wrote. "I ask that you reach down in your heart and help me create a celebration of life for Koury." Raleigh police don't know if Thomas or anyone accompanying him was armed, said spokeswoman Laura Hourigan. Police records show authorities were not called to the block -- for the party or otherwise -- before the first call in which the man told the dispatcher he was going to "secure the neighborhood." As for whether Copley was acting in a neighborhood watch capacity, Hourigan said there were many such groups in the community, but she is "unsure if that one is a registered group or not."
By Haley Draznin and Catherine E. Shoichet, CNN Updated 7:53 AM ET, Tue January 7, 2014 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. A young man huddles under a thick gray blanket, pressed against a steam grate as he braces himself against the biting cold. While on assignment over the weekend, an Associated Press photographer took his photo to show the effects of unusually cold weather sweeping across the country. The man, who only gave his first name -- Nick -- was a face in a crowd of homeless people huddling to stay warm on a Washington street, just blocks from the U.S. Capitol. But all that changed when the photograph appeared in USA Today Sunday. Hundreds of miles away in an upstate New York town, the man was much more than a face in a crowd. Nicholas Simmons was missing. And a mother who saw the photo in the newspaper realized she'd found her son. A disappearance on New Year's Day In Rochester, New York, the man's face appeared in local news reports last week as police and frantic family members searched for him. Police in the town of Greece, New York, said Simmons, 20, disappeared New Year's Day from his home, driving away in a red Buick with only with what he was wearing: plaid pajama pants, a gray T-shirt and sneakers. He left his wallet and cell phone behind. Family members and authorities had been looking for him for days without any luck. There were few leads without a phone or credit cards to track him. "We couldn't do a lot of things we normally would do in a missing person's case," said Capt. Patrick Phelan of the Greece Police Department. But the photo became the answer to the Simmons family's prayers. The family learned about the photo through a public Facebook page they'd set up, according to an article published in the Rochester Democrat & Chronicle. Simmons' sister, Hannah Simmons, sent a message on Twitter to USA Today reporter Natalie DiBlasio, who wrote the story. "Please contact me," the tweet read. "You wrote an article for USA today that features a picture of my missing brother." Family members also reached out to AP photographer Jacquelyn Martin, who captured the image. Communication between Simmons' family, DiBlasio, Martin, and the Greece Police Department helped the Washington Metropolitan Police track down Simmons. Now he's reunited with his family, police said. Washington Metro Police Officer Araz Alali said he's considered a "missing person returned." On the Facebook page, his mother Michelle Simmons said she was stunned. "We are going to get him home safe, and this is by far the greatest example of God's love and divine intervention I have ever experienced," she wrote, according to the Democrat & Chronicle. "I am beyond able to put into words how I am feeling." Questions remain It's unclear why Simmons left home and what brought him to the streets of Washington. According to police, Simmons is fine physically but distraught. He was taken to George Washington University Hospital for evaluation, Phelan said. The hospital declined to comment, citing privacy restrictions. Phelan said police were told there was a "discussion" between Simmons and his parents that may have made him leave home. "There was no indication or precursors to believe he would do something like this," Phelan said. The police official described Simmons as a normal 20-year-old living at home with his parents and working part-time jobs at local fast food chains. Just a day after her brother was found, Hannah Simmons sent Martin a message of appreciation on Twitter Monday. "You have saved our family," she wrote. "Thank you so much." Photographers take portraits for people who wouldn't have them otherwise
By Julian Zelizer, CNN Contributor Updated 10:53 AM ET, Mon January 12, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Julian Zelizer is a professor of history and public affairs at Princeton University and a New America fellow. He is the author of the new book, "The Fierce Urgency of Now: Lyndon Johnson, Congress and the Battle for the Great Society." The opinions expressed in this commentary are solely those of the author. (CNN)Even in their greatest moments of triumph, American presidents can make decisions that in the long run will devastate their legacies. Julian Zelizer is a professor of history and public affairs at Princeton University and a New America fellow. He is the author of the new book, "The Fierce Urgency of Now: Lyndon Johnson, Congress and the Battle for the Great Society." The opinions expressed in this commentary are solely those of the author. (CNN)Even in their greatest moments of triumph, American presidents can make decisions that in the long run will devastate their legacies. We have seen this in recent times, such as with President George W. Bush's decision to invade Iraq. But the classic example was Lyndon Johnson's experience with Vietnam. Fifty years ago, when the 89th Congress convened in January 1965 following Johnson's landslide election victory against Sen. Barry Goldwater, LBJ was at the height of his political power. Liberal Democrats commanded huge majorities in both the House and Senate. The coalition of southern Democrats and Republicans had lost much of their power. Conservative Republicans were marginalized since nobody wanted to look anything like a protg of Barry Goldwater. With the backing of a mass civil rights movement and organized labor, the White House was determined to push forward a huge domestic agenda ranging from Medicare to more anti-poverty programs to voting rights. Bills would soon be passing at a breathtaking pace as the nation saw Washington remake the social contract. But in these very same months, Johnson intensified America's involvement in the war against communism in Vietnam -- a war that would prove to be disastrous, devastating and arguably the aspect of his presidency that continues to define him more than anything else. The previous year Johnson had already strengthened the nation's commitment to the conflict in Southeast Asia. While President John F. Kennedy had increased the number of advisors working with the South Vietnamese in the fight against communist forces, Johnson set the groundwork for a much bigger intervention. He didn't do so with great confidence. In one of the most revealing White House recordings -- on May 27, 1964 -- he and Georgia Sen. Richard Russell, a southern hawk who was Johnson's mentor, have a lengthy conversation where both men express their doubts about whether this conflict was essential to the Cold War and whether it could ever be won. Russell said that it's a "damn worse mess that I ever saw." Russell added, "I don't see how we ever going to get out without fighting a major war...." "I just don't know what to do," said Johnson. Regardless, because of the political pressure that Johnson felt from Republicans who were attacking him as weak on defense and since he agreed to the logic of the domino theory -- that if one country fell to communism others would follow -- Johnson requested that Congress authorize the use of force through the Gulf of Tonkin Resolution on August 4, 1964. Based on weak evidence about an attack on U.S. Navy destroyers (Johnson admitted that the attack, if it occurred, was a mistake or the result of a decision by a low-level commander), Johnson worked with Arkansas Sen. William Fulbright to convince Democrats to support him with this resolution. The resolution was "like Grandma's nightshirt," Johnson said of the resolution, "it covers everything." Fulbright assured his colleagues that they needed to pass the resolution to protect Johnson from Republican attack. If he intended to actually use his full power to deploy force in the conflict, Fulbright said, he would return to Congress for their approval. He never did. On February 15, 1965, LBJ received encouragement from a former president about how he was handling the situation. When Johnson told him he was "having hell," including with the situation in Vietnam, President Truman assured him it was fine. Johnson thought he could learn from how Truman handled his problems with Korea. He reminded Truman that as a senator he had sent a letter in support of his efforts in Korea, even when Republicans like Ohio Republican Robert Taft were "raising hell" in the Senate. Johnson said he was "doing the best I can", that when they "go in and kill your boys you to hit back." Truman, who said he was handling the challenges well, gave him support, agreeing that you "bust them in the nose every time you get a chance" and "they understand that language better than any other kind." But as the new year began other Democrats warned Johnson that he should not make use of this resolution for force. Two days after Johnson spoke with Truman, Vice President Hubert Humphrey implored the president in a lengthy and powerful memorandum to pull out. Humphrey argued that, for the first time, Johnson didn't have to fear Republicans attacking him as weak on defense. Liberals controlled Congress and he had just won a great landslide electoral victory. He could make a bold move and get out of this conflict before it was too late. "Politically," Humphrey wrote, the Johnson administration is in a stronger position to do so than any Administration in this history." But Johnson didn't listen to Humphrey's logic, and still feared the danger of being characterized as weak on defense just like Democrats had been in 1952 when they lost control of the White House and Congress. As Democrats in Congress spoke out against LBJ for Vietnam, he became more belligerent. He isolated Humphrey from his inner circle of advisors on foreign policy. He dismissed the criticism from Democrats and warned that they were giving propaganda support to the communists. We can hear this on a tape with one of Johnson's greatest allies in the Senate, Minority Leader Everett Dirksen. On February 17, 1965 , the two men discussed speeches that had been given by Idaho Sen. Frank Church and South Dakota Sen. George McGovern. Dirksen brought up how the two men had been "teeing off" against LBJ's Vietnamese policy. Dirksen thought Johnson needed some defense from his "friend on the other side of the aisle." Johnson told Dirksen that former President Dwight Eisenhower, a Republican, fully supported him. Johnson added that the kinds of speeches Church and McGovern were making posed the "worst problem" to the United States, more so than raids or ambushes or military accidents, since the speeches about the need for negotiation or withdrawal were used by the communists in pamphlets and newspapers. The statements undermined the confidence of the South Vietnamese government that the United States would continue to support them. At the same time that he spoke with such great bravado, he admitted to his advisors all of his fears and concerns. On February 26, LBJ told Secretary of Defense Robert McNamara: "I don't think anything is going to be as bad as losing, and I don't see any way of winning...." On March 6, many months after their haunting conversation about what could likely happen in Vietnam, Johnson didn't sound much better. When explaining that he was preparing to send Marines into the conflict, Johnson they were "getting in worse" and admitted that: "The great trouble I'm under, a man can fight if he can see daylight down the road somewhere. But there ain't no daylight in Vietnam." In response Russell said, "there's no end to the road." During the very month that the House passed a sweeping version of Medicare and Medicaid and Congress prepared to send him an education bill to sign into law, Johnson got deeper into one of the most devastating military quagmires that the United States has ever faced. Johnson's fears of being pummeled by the right, combined with his adherence to the "domino theory" about communism, would gradually drive him deeper and deeper into a disastrous war. Presidents are complex beings. Sometimes the very qualities that allow them to make great breakthroughs in public policy, that greatly improve the condition of the country, also allow them to implement decisions that become highly destructive.  Read CNNOpinion's new Flipboard magazine. Follow us on Twitter @CNNOpinion. Join us on Facebook.com/CNNOpinion.
By Eric Bradner, CNN Updated 9:38 PM ET, Thu December 10, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Washington (CNN)It took just 20 minutes for Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl to realize he'd made a grave mistake by departing his Army unit in Afghanistan in the middle of a June 2009 night. Washington (CNN)It took just 20 minutes for Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl to realize he'd made a grave mistake by departing his Army unit in Afghanistan in the middle of a June 2009 night. He was armed with only knives and aware that he'd face serious punishment -- or perhaps even be shot, if his identity was mistaken as he approached the outpost -- if he turned back. "I'm going, 'Good grief, I'm in over my head,'" Bergdahl said in a "Serial" podcast released on Thursday. "Suddenly, it really starts to sink in that I really did something bad. Or, not bad, but I really did something serious," he said. So he set off to gather intelligence and mimic a film idol: Jason Bourne. He decided to collect intelligence on the Taliban in hopes it would help him eventually return to the U.S. military with something to show for his absence. "Doing what I did is me saying that I am like, I don't know, Jason Bourne," Bergdahl told Mark Boal, the filmmaker whose interviews with the Army private first class will make up the second season of "Serial." "I had this fantastic idea that I was going to prove to the world that I was the real thing," Bergdahl said. "You know, that I could be what it is that all those guys out there that go to the movies and watch those movies -- they all want to be that -- but I wanted to prove I was that." It didn't work. Bergdahl, armed only with a knife, said he was quickly captured by Taliban fighters on motorcycles, starting what would be nearly five years in captivity -- ended only when President Barack Obama swapped five Taliban detainees who had been held at the Guantanamo Bay detention facility for Bergdahl's freedom in May 2014. Bergdahl could now face a court martial and charges that could lead to a sentence of life in prison. He's assigned to an administrative Army job in San Antonio. Boal, a filmmaker who wrote and produced "The Hurt Locker" and "Zero Dark Thirty," conducted 25 hours of interviews with Bergdahl. The podcast's creator, Sarah Koenig, said its second season will focus largely on those interviews. Here are four other interesting tidbits from the first episode, titled "DUSTWUN" -- or "duty status -- whereabouts unknown." -- Bergdahl said he was rebelling against "leadership failures" at his outpost and hoped his departure would provoke investigations by creating a crisis. Bergdahl said he feared "the lives of the guys standing next to me were in danger of something seriously going wrong." -- He quickly realized he couldn't fight off the Taliban. A line of about five motorcycles with Taliban members riding on them found him as he walked along a road in the open desert, and six or seven riders were armed with AK-47s. "All I had was a knife. I'm not stupid enough to try knife off a bunch of guys with AK-47s," he said. -- He was held in grim conditions by the Taliban. He said "standing in an empty, dark room hurts -- physically, but more than that. It's mental. You're almost confused," he said, adding that he would wake up in the dark unable to see his own hands. -- Bergdahl pushed back against claims from other soldiers that he'd left a note behind expressing his disillusionment, saying he'd left no such note. It signaled that he could oppose some elements of the version of events from his departure made public so far.
Jim Sciutto is CNN's chief national security correspondent based in Washington, D.C. He reports and provides analysis across the network's programs and platforms on all aspects of U.S. national security, including foreign policy, the military and the intelligence community. Full Bio Jim Sciutto is CNN's chief national security correspondent based in Washington, D.C. He reports and provides analysis across the network's programs and platforms on all aspects of U.S. national security, including foreign policy, the military and the intelligence community. Sciutto frequently reports from overseas, including the Charlie Hebdo and Paris terrorist attacks in France and the violent elections in the Ukraine. He has traveled to Asia, Europe and the Middle East with senior U.S. leaders as well as Tehran as the U.S. and Iran began implementing the historic nuclear agreement. He has twice interviewed Iranian Foreign Minister Mohammad Javad Zarif, including securing Iran's first reaction to President Barack Obama's 2014 State of the Union remarks. Prior to joining CNN, Sciutto served as ABC News' senior foreign correspondent, based primarily in London and later, from Washington. In his role, he reported from more than 50 countries across the globe. His extensive coverage included dozens of assignments from inside Iraq, Afghanistan and Iran. Sciutto is also the author of a book on the driving forces behind Islamic radicalization, Against Us: The New Face of America's Enemies in the Muslim World. Sciutto's one-hour CNN special, Targeting Terror: Inside the Intelligence War, was recognized with a 2016 Headliner Award for documentaries. His reporting in Iran during the 2009 election protests earned him an Edward R. Murrow award. He was also awarded the George Polk Award and a citation for Excellence from the Overseas Press Club for his undercover reporting from Myanmar, where he bucked government restrictions to tell the stories of that country's repressive regime. His reporting for the series Iraq: Where Things Stand was recognized with an Emmy Award for two consecutive years. Sciutto has also served as chief of staff and senior advisor to the U.S. Ambassador to China, Gary Locke. Prior to ABC News, he served as the Hong Kong-based correspondent for Asia Business News. Sciutto began his career as the moderator and producer of a weekly public affairs talk show on PBS. He graduated from Yale University with a bachelor's degree in Chinese history. Jim is married to Gloria Riviera-Sciutto, Washington Correspondent for ABC News. Follow Jim on Twitter @JimSciutto
By Ryan Browne, CNN Updated 2:05 PM ET, Wed October 4, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Forces aligned with Syrian President Bashar al-Assad made an incursion Wednesday into the 55km "de-confliction zone" surrounding the US base located at the At Tanf garrison in southeastern Syria, according to the US-led military coalition fighting ISIS. (CNN)Forces aligned with Syrian President Bashar al-Assad made an incursion Wednesday into the 55km "de-confliction zone" surrounding the US base located at the At Tanf garrison in southeastern Syria, according to the US-led military coalition fighting ISIS. "There was an incursion into the de-confliction zone," coalition spokesman US Army Col. Ryan Dillon told CNN, adding that after the pro-regime troops entered the zone, the US-led coalition used the pre-established de-confliction hotline and communicated the incursion to the Russians. Following that communication, the pro-regime forces withdrew. But the apparent successful use of the de-confliction channel comes amid new accusations by Russia that the US military is aiding ISIS. The incident comes the same day as the Russian Ministry of Defense said the US was the "the main problem" preventing the defeat of ISIS in Syria," accusing the US military of providing "support and overtures" to ISIS. The ministry's statement said that ISIS fighters had attacked Syrian regime checkpoints located alongside the highway from Palmyra to Deir Ezzor and that those ISIS fighters launched their attack from the de-confliction zone surrounding At Tanf. "The above mentioned terrorist attacks have the only common feature -- they were conducted from 50-kilometer zone round the settlement of al-Tanf, (near the) the Syrian-Jordan boarder. That is the site where the 'US military mission' is deployed," the Russian Ministry of Defense said. The Russians added that its air forces were "ready" to strike the area around At Tanf to eliminate the groups that attacked the regime outposts. Dillon rejected the Russian claims, saying the US-led coalition's goals were "to kill ISIS or compel them to surrender," adding that the coalition does not negotiate with the terror group. He also denied the idea that ISIS fighters were able to operate in the area surrounding At Tanf. "We are hyper aware of what is inside At Tanf and near our forces" Dillon said, saying the coalition would go after them and kill ISIS fighters wherever they were. Coalition officials have said that US troops continue to conduct patrols in the area and use the base to train local anti-ISIS fighters. A group of such fighters left At Tanf in July due to the coalition's insistence that they only fight ISIS and not the regime of Assad, opting to leave and conduct independent operations against the regime. CNN has previously reported that pro-regime forces had established a number of outposts and checkpoints in the area just outside the de-confliction" zone surrounding At Tanf, a buffer area that was negotiated by Russia and the US-led coalition. US officials have told CNN they believe pro-regime militias backed by Iran are setting up a series of checkpoints as part of an effort to establish a strategic overland route from Iran to the Mediterranean coast and have sought to eject coalition troops from At Tanf to facilitate this goal, seeking to encourage US-backed local fighters to defect to the regime and conducting probing activities around the base and nearby coalition combat outposts. The coalition recently shuttered and razed on of its outposts near At Tanf but denied that its closure was part of any arrangement with Russia or the regime. The proximity between the two sets of forces led to some clashes in June, including US airstrikes against regime forces who had encroached on the zone and US F-15 jets shooting down two pro-regime drones that were perceived to pose a threat to local allies and their coalition advisers. Russian accusations of US support for ISIS comes as the US has boosted its surveillance in Syria following a Russian airstrike on US-backed forces and amid Russian threats against US troops and their local allies. The Russian Ministry of Defense issued a warning last month that its forces would retaliate against the US-backed Syrian Democratic Forces and their US military advisers if any of their forces accompanying Syrian regime troops come under attack. The ministry issued a statement saying that already "the Syrian Democratic Forces and US Special Operations Forces have twice targeted Syrian troops with mortars and rocket artillery."
By Andrew Kaczynski and Nathan McDermott, CNN Updated 4:12 PM ET, Thu June 29, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Donald Trump's tweet Thursday attacking MSNBC anchor Mika Brzezinski is just the latest in a long line of disparaging jabs he has hurled at prominent women. (CNN)Donald Trump's tweet Thursday attacking MSNBC anchor Mika Brzezinski is just the latest in a long line of disparaging jabs he has hurled at prominent women. The President referred to Brzezinski as "low I.Q. Crazy Mika" and said she was "bleeding badly from a face-lift" when she came to visit him around New Year's Eve. His tweet, which drew swift and widespread condemnation, fits into a larger pattern for Trump, who has a history of viciously going after women's appearances and mental health. During the campaign, he called then-Fox anchor Megyn Kelly "crazy" and described her during the first GOP presidential debate as having "blood coming out of her eyes, blood coming out of her wherever."He also tweeted out an unflattering photo of Ted Cruz's wife, Heidi Cruz, and threatened to "spill the beans" about her without explaining what that meant. But his pattern of behavior was put on its most public display years before he campaigned for president. During his long-running feud with comedian Rosie O'Donnell in the mid-2000s, Trump repeatedly ridiculed O'Donnell for her weight and once even attacked her for her struggle with depression. "She announced last week that she suffers from depression," Trump told an audience at the Learning Annex in 2007. "They called me for a comment, and rather than saying 'I have no comment' or 'isn't that too bad oh, that's so bad,' I said, 'I think I can cure her depression,'  most of you heard this. 'If she stopped looking in the mirror, I think she'd stop being so depressed.'" In the same speech, Trump said it was "politically correct bullshit" that people would not call O'Donnell fat. "This slob, now I'm not allowed to use the word fat. They say, 'he used the fat word.' I know much worse words," he said. "It's funny, I called her a degenerate, I called her the worst things, nobody cared." He added, "But I go on the Today Show and Meredith Vieira, 'Donald is it true?' -- this is like two weeks ago I was supposed to talking about The Apprentice. She said, 'Is it true that you called Rosie crude?' I said, 'no, I called her a degenerate. I didn't call her crude, it's not strong enough.' She goes, 'But did you call her fat?' I said, 'Let me ask you a question Meredith. Is she fat?' 'I'd rather not comment.' Can you believe this bullshit? This is politically correct bullshit, OK?" O'Donnell would go on to describe Trump's attacks on her as "the most bullying I ever experienced in my life," telling People magazine in 2014: "It was national, and it was sanctioned societally. Whether I deserved it is up to your own interpretation." Over the years, Trump would make some of his most disparaging comments about women on "The Howard Stern Show." Discussing actress Nicollette Sheridan in 2005, Trump said, "A person who is very flat-chested is very hard to be a 10." He also attacked model-turned-reality TV star Anna Nicole Smith's lips days in a 2007 episode after her death, saying, "It is the most disgusting thing to look at these big fat pumped up tires." On Twitter, Trump has lashed out at media executive Arianna Huffington, tweeting in 2012, ".@ariannahuff is unattractive both inside and out. I fully understand why her former husband left her for a man- he made a good decision." In 2015, he hit her again, tweeting, "How much money is the extremely unattractive (both inside and out) Arianna Huffington paying her poor ex-hubby for the use of his name?" In 2012, also on Twitter, Trump went after singer Cher, writing, ".@cher--I don't wear a 'rug'it's mine. And I promise not to talk about your massive plastic surgeries that didn't work." Trump also said it was a double standard that actress Bette Midler could talk about his hair, but he couldn't attack her "ugly face or body." ".@BetteMidler talks about my hair but I'm not allowed to talk about her ugly face or body --- so I won't. Is this a double standard?" he asked on Twitter in 2012. "While @BetteMidler is an extremely unattractive woman, I refuse to say that because I always insist on being politically correct," he added in another tweet. And when he was live-tweeting the Oscars in 2014, Trump said of Kim Novak, "I'm having a real hard time watching the Academy Awards (so far). The last song was terrible! Kim should sue her plastic surgeon! #Oscars" Novak said the tweet devastated her. Trump later expressed regret for the comment, and tweeted: "I was always a big fan of Kim Novak and still ama wonderful actress."
By Carol Costello, Anchor Updated 8:51 AM ET, Mon September 11, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Carol Costello is the host of "Across America With Carol Costello" on HLN. The views expressed in this commentary are her own. (CNN)Are you ready for some football? Join us on Twitter and Facebook Carol Costello is the host of "Across America With Carol Costello" on HLN. The views expressed in this commentary are her own. (CNN)Are you ready for some football? Join us on Twitter and Facebook I am not sure that I am, but it has little to with being a loyal (always-disappointed) Detroit Lions fan. It has to do with -- what else? Politics. Athletes have long had an impact in the political world -- Jim Brown and Muhammad Ali come to mind, but the recent over-infusion of bitter partisan politics into football is, well, overwhelming. It starts with ESPN's decision to reinstate Hank Williams to sing the Monday Night Football song. I love how Hank "brings it," but every time I hear him sing I think of what he said about President Barack Obama: "We've got a Muslim for a president who hates cowboys, hates cowgirls, hates fishing, hates farming, loves gays, and we hate him!" ESPN claims they are bringing Williams and the iconic song -- "All My Rowdy Friends" -- to give the fans what they want. In an official statement, ESPN wrote, "It's a Monday night party, and that's what we're all hoping to get back to." But I can't help but wonder if ESPN is re-hiring Williams because so many people allege the network has a liberal agenda when it comes to recent announcer decisions it has made. The NFL has no horse in that game, and it's likely deliriously happy about that. It's clear the NFL Commissioner Roger Goodell is trying to punt when it comes to admitting politics is at play in his sport. Just consider his cowardly remark -- "I'm not a football expert" answer -- when he was asked to address the Colin Kaepernick controversy as evidence. Kaepernick, as you know, started kneeling during the national anthem last year to protest police brutality. So come on, commissioner, it's clear that Kaepernick is not playing today because his politics are too divisive for team owners. Why not just address it? After all, according to a Washington Post/UMass Lowell poll, 19% of pro football fans say their interest has declined in recent years. And 24% of them say politics is to blame. Christine Brennan, the great USA Today sports columnist and CNN contributor, told me you ain't seen nothin' yet. "I think that protests will be worse this season -- it's what this generation cares about. And these players are playing to youth," she said. Look at what happened in Cleveland a few weeks ago. A dozen players, including a white player, took a knee during the national anthem before a preseason game against the New York Giants. "There's a lot of racial and social injustices in the world that are going on right now," rookie safety Jabrill Peppers said. "We just decided to take a knee and pray for the people who have been affected and just pray for the world in general." It's a lovely sentiment that reflects the millennial generation, but perhaps not all Americans. Steve Loomis, the head of one of Cleveland's police unions, says he and his brothers and sisters will not participate in a pregame flag ceremony at the Browns' home opener because management can't control its players' behavior. "Their politics are ignorant," Loomis told me on HLN. "It's based on a false narrative that white police officers are out there murdering unarmed black people at record rates." Never mind that Cleveland police have settled 26 lawsuits and paid out $13 million over police misconduct since an officer mistakenly shot Tamir Rice, a 12-year-old who wielded a toy gun in 2014. I could delve into Seahawk Michael Bennett's recent allegations that Las Vegas police profiled him after the Floyd Mayweather-Conor McGregor boxing match -- and the police union's insistence the NFL investigate and "take appropriate action" against Bennett. But I won't. Suffice it to say politics infects every facet of our lives -- including football. But shouldn't America's sport be a place of refuge from our political deluge? As a journalist who supports first amendment rights, I'm psyched that the league is socially engaged. But as a fan? I'll admit it: A part of me just wants to drink a beer and watch the Detroit Lions break my heart yet again. So get ready for some politics-infused football, whether you're ready or not.
Nathan McDermott is a reporter and member of CNN's KFILE  the leading investigation team for the social, mobile generation. Full Bio Nathan McDermott is a reporter and member of CNN's KFILE  the leading investigation team for the social, mobile generation. KFILE is widely praised as a "scoop team," known for breaking news by scouring the internet through research, fact checking, and investigative reporting. Prior to joining CNN, McDermott was a political reporter covering the 2016 election for BuzzFeed. There, he became known for unearthing newsworthy archival videos and audio, many of which later went viral. McDermott received a bachelor's degree in international studies at American University, and earned a master's degree in journalism from Columbia University's Graduate School of Journalism. Originally from Houston, Texas, McDermott recently moved from Washington D.C. to New York City, where he currently resides and works.
By Sandra Gonzalez, CNN Updated 5:43 PM ET, Mon September 4, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)"I think now more than ever it's important to strive to be as creative as possible, to use your voice, to use your platform, to express yourself. It's important to keep art alive." (CNN)"I think now more than ever it's important to strive to be as creative as possible, to use your voice, to use your platform, to express yourself. It's important to keep art alive." Mandy Moore, once best known for making music, now makes us cry on NBC's breakout hit "This Is Us," a series with one of the most talented ensembles TV has seen in some time. Still, among a cast of scene-stealers, Moore shows her dramatic strengths as mother-of-three Rebecca, a woman who juggles her family's needs with her own hopes and dreams while navigating a turbulent marriage. At 33, Moore has done a lot of growing up since the days of singing "Candy," but she's found a chapter of her career that's even sweeter. CNN wants to hear from you. When was the first time you saw a woman on television you identified with? And see more from As Told By Her.
Gary Tuchman is a CNN national correspondent based in Atlanta, having joined the network in 1990. Full Bio Gary Tuchman is a CNN national correspondent based in Atlanta, having joined the network in 1990. He is a staff correspondent for the Anderson Cooper 360 program. Tuchman has covered the biggest stories of our times in his years at CNN. He arrived in Japan the morning after the devastating earthquake and tsunami and reported from the hard hit towns on Japan's northeast coast. He also spent months in Haiti covering the earthquake that killed more than 300 thousand people. His live reports the morning after the quake amid the rubble proved stunning to viewers around the world who up until then, had no way of knowing the intensity of the devastation. In between both quakes, Tuchman was in Copiapo, Chile, covering the rescue of the 33 Chile miners who had been trapped underground. He reported live from the rescue site as the miners were triumphantly raised to safety. Earlier in 2010, Tuchman was one of the few international reporters who were able to get to Iceland to report first hand on the volcanic eruption that led to the cancellation of thousands of flights across the globe. Tuchman flew up to the erupting Eyjafjallajokull volcano in a helicopter. The video taken from only a few hundred yards to the west (the winds were blowing east) gave viewers an incredible look at the power of the eruption. Tuchman also spent part of 2010 reporting for the documentary What the Pope Knew. The documentary provided evidence that Cardinal Joseph Ratzinger, now Pope Benedict, had direct knowledge that priests who had committed sexual molestations were being protected by the Church. Tuchman has also spent much time in the border regions of Mexico, reporting on the drug war and the grotesque violence that goes along with it. He has also done many stories on the polygamist cult known as the FLDS (Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-Day Saints), and the child sexual abuse that has been practiced by many within the sect. During the 2008 election, he spent weeks in Alaska; investigating and covering GOP vice presidential candidate Sarah Palin. He also spent time on the trail reporting on both John McCain and Barack Obama. He covered the inauguration of Obama and also provided live reports at one of that night's inaugural balls. In 2007, Tuchman became one of the very few reporters allowed into a coal mine during a search and rescue operation. The drama at the Crandall Canyon mine turned out to be tragic. Not only did all the miners die, but rescuers (including one who trained Tuchman for his trip into the mine) were killed days later in another collapse. Tuchman spent much of the summer and fall of 2005 covering hurricanes Katrina, Rita and Wilma in Louisiana, Mississippi, Florida and Texas. In 2003, Tuchman reported as an embedded journalist with the U.S. Air Force during the war in Iraq, arriving days before the war began. He also went back to Iraq in 2006; once again going on missions with members of the U.S. Air Force. In 2002, Tuchman traveled to Afghanistan; spending weeks reporting throughout the country. He covered the nation's first "Loya Jirga" since the fall of the Taliban; the traditional way Afghans selected their new leaders. Tuchman has covered all the U.S. presidential elections during the years he's been with CNN. The day after the Sept. 11, 2001, terrorist attacks, Tuchman began reporting from Ground Zero in New York City, providing constant updates and detailed descriptions of the devastation. Additionally, he covered the tragedy of the Space Shuttle Columbia disaster, the D.C.-area sniper case, the anthrax scare, the crash of TWA Flight 800, and the capture of the Unabomber in Montana. Most recently, Tuchman's reporting contributed to two 2011 Emmy Awards for AC 360's Haiti earthquake coverage. He was nominated for a 2010 Emmy award for his reporting of a scandal in Texas in which police officers steal from minority motorists. Tuchman's reporting also contributed to a 2010 George Foster Peabody Award for coverage of the Gulf Oil Spill; a 2009 Peabody Award for coverage of the Presidential Primary contests, a 2005 Peabody Award for Hurricane Katrina coverage, and a 1996 Emmy Award for the coverage of the Oklahoma City bombing. Before joining CNN, Tuchman worked for five years as an anchor and reporter at WPEC-TV, the CBS affiliate in West Palm Beach, Fla., where he specialized in political reporting. While at WPEC-TV, Tuchman did a series on the Intifada from the Gaza Strip and West Bank and received an Emmy Award nomination for the series. Before working at WPEC-TV, Tuchman served as the primary anchor and reporter for WBOC-TV, the CBS affiliate in Salisbury, Md. Tuchman received several Associated Press awards while at WPEC-TV for excellence in documentary, enterprise and spot news reporting. Tuchman earned a Bachelor of Science degree in broadcast journalism from Boston University. In 2003, the university honored him with its Distinguished Alumni Award.
By Elizabeth Warren Updated 6:34 AM ET, Sun October 1, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Elizabeth Warren, a Democrat, is the senior senator from Massachusetts. The views expressed are her own. (CNN)President Donald Trump, a loud and persistent critic of the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA), recently began renegotiating this trade deal with Canada and Mexico. The President promised to secure a fair deal for American workers. That sounds great. After all, we don't think Americans should be forced to compete with poorly paid workers from Mexico or elsewhere, and we can demand that companies that want to trade with us lift wages, benefits, and health and safety standards for their foreign workers. Join us on Twitter and Facebook Elizabeth Warren, a Democrat, is the senior senator from Massachusetts. The views expressed are her own. (CNN)President Donald Trump, a loud and persistent critic of the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA), recently began renegotiating this trade deal with Canada and Mexico. The President promised to secure a fair deal for American workers. That sounds great. After all, we don't think Americans should be forced to compete with poorly paid workers from Mexico or elsewhere, and we can demand that companies that want to trade with us lift wages, benefits, and health and safety standards for their foreign workers. Join us on Twitter and Facebook So it probably came as a shock that one of Canada's main goals in this renegotiation is to get the United States to treat our own workers better. Canada doesn't want its workers competing with poorly-treated laborers -- including workers in the United States. And they have a specific target in mind. According to Canada's major newspaper The Globe and Mail, Canadian negotiators are urging the United States to roll back so-called state "right to work" laws that undercut worker power in the US. I'm glad we're renegotiating NAFTA because it has been a raw deal for American workers. But the Canadians are giving America a wake-up call. As negotiations continue, the United States should take a close look at how our own broken labor policies are hurting American workers -- and fix them. The Canadians focused on so-called "right-to-work" laws, the state regulations that make union dues optional even when unions bargain and represent all the workers. These state laws are a powerful weapon in the war against working people. Twenty-eight states have passed these laws, whose main purpose is to make it harder for workers to have the resources they need to stand up for themselves. Because of these laws starving unions of resources, union leaders face an uphill battle when they try to help workers join together to advocate for higher wages and benefits. And the completely predictable consequences for workers in these states have been devastating. Strong unions lift wages for all workers -- even those workers who aren't union members. Union membership is sharply lower in "right-to-work" states -- after all, that was the whole point of these laws. And the impact is clear: In "right-to-work" states, wages are lower and employees are less likely to have access to employer-provided health care and pensions -- and that's true for union and nonunion employees. The decline in unionization over the last 30 years has hollowed out America's middle class. For the more than 40 million nonunion people in America's private workforce, the lost wages add up to about $109 billion every year. Unemployment has declined and corporate profits have gone up, but workers don't have the kind of bargaining power that unions once created. Instead of strengthening the rights of working people, the Trump administration has pushed in the opposite direction. Since taking office, President Trump has signed several laws that directly undermine the wages, benefits, health and safety of American workers. The President and the Republican Congress have rolled back rules designed to make sure federal contractors don't cheat their workers out of hard-earned wages. They've delayed safety standards that keep workers from being exposed to lethal carcinogenic materials. They've given shady financial advisers a few extra months to cheat hardworking Americans out of billions in retirement savings. The list goes on. The assault on America's workers didn't start with President Trump. For decades, armies of lawyers and lobbyists who represent a handful of giant corporations have pressed our federal and state governments to pursue policies that maximize corporate profits at the expense of the health, safety, and financial security of their workers. Over time, those laws have taken their toll. And now, instead of looking to America for the example of workers who enjoy the best pay, best benefits, and best working conditions in the world, our trading partners are complaining about working conditions in America that are falling below their own standards. A nation that cares about its workers shouldn't need foreign negotiators to sound the alarm. It's a national embarrassment -- and it should spur us to action. That's why earlier last week I introduced a bill repealing the provision in the National Labor Relations Act that allows states to implement "right-to-work" laws. Giant companies that have become accustomed to squeezing every last dime of profit out of their workers in "right-to-work" states will fight any effort to improve workers' rights. But let's be clear: we don't allow these corporations to exploit their workers when we negotiate trade deals with countries like Colombia or Panama. As we renegotiate NAFTA, we shouldn't allow them to exploit workers in Canada and Mexico, either. And above all, we must not let them exploit our own workers here at home.
Ana Cabrera is based in New York and anchors the weekend primetime edition of CNN Newsroom. Full Bio Ana Cabrera is based in New York and anchors the weekend primetime edition of CNN Newsroom. Cabrera joined CNN as a correspondent in 2013, based in Denver. Most recently she was part of the CNN Investigative team that revealed systemic failures in reporting, investigating and tracking alleged sexual abuse at elderly living facilities. She has covered the unrest in Ferguson following the shooting of Michael Brown. Cabrera landed an exclusive interview with the St. Louis County Prosecuting Attorney while the grand jury was hearing the case and the Police Chief following his long-awaited public apology. She also did extensive enterprise reporting on the marijuana legalization movement, exploring everything from the economic impact, to regulatory issues, to health concerns. Her pesticide investigation resulted in the recall of thousands of pot products in Colorado. Prior to joining CNN, Cabrera was an anchor for the top-ranked daily morning news program at KMGH-TV 7 News, the ABC affiliate in Denver, where she covered local and national news including the Aurora movie theater shooting, and the 2012 Denver Presidential Debate and election. She earned an Emmy Award for her in-the-field anchoring as a part of the 7 News morning team that was honored for its High Park Fire coverage in 2012. She and the 7 News morning team were also honored with the Associated Press TV and Radio Association's Annual Mark Twain Award for Best Morning Show Broadcast in 2013. From January 2005 to July 2009, Cabrera was an anchor and reporter at NBC affiliate KHQ-TV and FOX affiliate KAYU-TV in Spokane, Washington. Cabrera began her broadcasting career as an intern for Denver's CBS affiliate KCNC-TV and KMGH-TV. Cabrera has served on the Board of Directors of Mi Casa Resource Center and she served on the board of the American Cancer Society. She also speaks at local schools with students who are interested in a broadcasting career. Cabrera is a graduate of the Edward R. Murrow College of Communication at Washington State University with degrees in Communication, and Foreign Languages and Cultures.
Chris Moody is a senior digital correspondent for CNN, where he reports for CNN Politics, CNN Money, CNN Travel and more. Full Bio Chris Moody is a senior digital correspondent for CNN, where he reports for CNN Politics, CNN Money, CNN Travel and more. Moody started covering politics in 2010 in Washington, DC, where he chronicled lawmakers on Capitol Hill. He covered the 2012 presidential race for Yahoo News, traveling with both President Obama and Mitt Romney and he appeared regularly on Fox News, MSNBC and CNN. He joined CNN in 2014 to cover the presidential race, where he interviewed Donald Trump and several presidential contenders. His team's election coverage earned an Edward R. Murrow Award and a Webby Award in 2017 and his CNN political video series, "Being Moody" has been recognized with multiple awards from the White House News Photographers Association. His work has been cited by The New York Times, The Wall Street Journal, the Washington Post, TIME, G.Q. Magazine, ABC News and many other news outlets. Moody's reporting career began at Palm Beach Atlantic University, where he was the senior writer for The Beacon student publication. While a student at PBA, he covered the U.S. Congress for Scripps Howard News Wire in Washington, D.C., and interned at WPTV Channel 5 in West Palm Beach.
Sara Murray is a CNN White House Correspondent based in Washington, D.C. covering the 2016 presidential campaign. Full Bio Sara Murray is a CNN White House Correspondent based in Washington, D.C. covering the 2016 presidential campaign. Murray joined CNN in 2015 to cover the expansive Republican field and now serves as one of the lead reporters covering Donald Trump. Murray joined CNN from The Wall Street Journal, where she most recently served as an anchor for their digital network in New York. Prior to joining the video team, she covered Mitt Romney's 2012 presidential bid, shedding light on the inner workings of the campaign's high command and breaking news on the candidate's private comments to high-dollar donors. During her tenure at The Wall Street Journal, Murray covered Congress's unsuccessful attempt to overhaul the U.S. immigration system in 2013. She also spent years following the 2008 financial crisis and the economic fallout that ensued. Murray was born and raised in Mt. Pleasant. Mich., and graduated from the University of Maryland. She resides in Washington, D.C., with her fianc Garrett Haake and their rescue pup, shiner.
By Mark Preston, CNN Updated 4:51 PM ET, Wed December 14, 2016 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Ronna Romney McDaniel is President-elect Donald Trump's choice to become the Republican National Committee chair next year, the RNC said Wednesday. (CNN)Ronna Romney McDaniel is President-elect Donald Trump's choice to become the Republican National Committee chair next year, the RNC said Wednesday. Romney McDaniel, who is currently the chairwoman of the Michigan Republican Party and the niece of 2012 GOP nominee Mitt Romney, will succeed current RNC chair Reince Priebus, who has been tapped to be Trump's chief of staff. "I'm excited to have a highly effective leader in Ronna McDaniel as RNC deputy chair, and I look forward to her serving as the party's chairman in 2017," Trump said in a statement. Republican National Committee members will need to ratify Romney McDaniel as the new chair when it meets in January, but it is tradition for the incoming president to choose the head of the national party.
By Andrew Kaczynski and Chris Massie, CNN Updated 10:25 AM ET, Wed September 20, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Alabama US senate candidate Roy Moore's foundation shared a video on its Facebook page in 2015 that uses out-of-context video clips of then-President Barack Obama to promote the conspiracy theory that Obama is a Muslim. (CNN)Alabama US senate candidate Roy Moore's foundation shared a video on its Facebook page in 2015 that uses out-of-context video clips of then-President Barack Obama to promote the conspiracy theory that Obama is a Muslim. The Foundation for Moral Law, the non-profit Christian legal organization that Moore founded in the early 2000s, shared the video titled "OBAMA THE MUSLIM, HIS OWN WORDS" on November 18, 2015. Moore currently holds the title of president emeritus at the foundation. It was originally posted by the group Britain First, a far-right British nationalist organization that describes its goals as to "restore Christianity as the bedrock and foundation of our national life," citing "the rapid growth of militant Islam." Moore's wife, Kayla Moore, who has served as the president of the foundation since 2013, also shared the video on her personal Facebook and on the wall of the Friends of Roy Moore Facebook group the same day the foundation shared the video. Opening and closing to ominous music, the video itself presents a version of the widespread but baseless conspiracy theory that Obama, a Christian, is secretly a Muslim. The video shows the then-President praising the historical legacy of the Islamic faith and the contributions of Muslims to the United States and American culture, while displaying text asking if he had ever praised America or Christianity in "similar glowing words." The video also features selectively edited quotes commonly used to promote the conspiracy theory. These include Obama's statement to the Turkish parliament in 2009, referring to the impact of Muslims on his life and his childhood years living in Indonesia, "Many other Americans have Muslims in their families or have lived in a Muslim-majority country--I know, because I am one of them." In another remark, from his address to the Muslim world in Cairo in 2009, a speech that features heavily in the video shared by Moore's foundation, Obama is shown saying, "So I have known Islam on three continents before coming to the region where it was first revealed. That experience guides my conviction..." It cuts off before he finishes the sentence, which clarifies that his conviction was "that partnership between America and Islam must be based on what Islam is, not what it isn't." The video concludes by showing the hijacked planes striking the World Trade Center on 9/11, followed by Obama saying, "Thank you and eid eh shoma mobarak," which means "Happy New Year" in Farsi. Reached by phone, Moore told CNN's KFile that he had not worked at the Foundation for years, but said that the video did not reflect his personal views. Asked if it reflected his wife's views, he said, "Sir, I can't speak for other people. My campaign has nothing to do with Obama. He's not President. This is kind of ridiculous." Asked if his wife wanted to comment directly, he said that she was not with him at the moment and directed the reporter to contact his campaign chairman. Representatives of the Foundation for Moral Law did not respond to requests for comment. A representative for Moore's campaign also did not respond to a comment request. As previously reported by CNN's KFile, Moore himself has fueled the debunked "birther" conspiracy movement, saying as recently as December 2016 that his "personal belief" was that Obama wasn't a natural-born citizen of the United States. He started questioning Obama's birthplace in 2008, when he called for a "major investigation" into Obama's citizenship in an interview with the far-right website World Net Daily. He further questioned Obama's birthplace in 2009 in an interview with conservative internet radio host Andrew Shea King, saying that it was "very strange indeed" that the president had not shown his birth certificate. He made similar comments the following year. In 2011, Hawaii officials released the long form of Obama's birth certificate at the then-President's request, showing that Obama was indeed born in Hawaii.
By Greg Botelho and Holly Yan, CNN Updated 11:50 AM ET, Sun July 14, 2013 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. George Zimmerman never denied shooting Trayvon Martin, but he said he did so in self defense. Late Saturday night, a Florida jury found him not guilty in the teenager's death. The verdict caps a case that has inflamed passions for well over a year, much of it focused on race. The six jurors -- all of them women -- deliberated for 16 hours. Five of the women are white; one is a minority. When he heard his fate, Zimmerman had little visible reaction. He turned and shook the hand of one of his attorneys before sitting back down, smiling only after court was adjourned. Martin's parents, Tracy Martin and Sybrina Fulton, were not in the courtroom when the decision was announced. But they shared their emotions on Twitter shortly afterward. "Even though I am broken hearted my faith is unshattered I WILL ALWAYS LOVE MY BABY TRAY," Tracy Martin tweeted. Martin's dad: My heart is broken Zimmerman's brother, Robert Zimmerman Jr., said words can't express how relieved his family is. "Having said that, I don't think this is a time for high-fiving," the brother said. "I acknowledge -- we all have acknowledged -- that Mr. Martin, Trayvon Martin, lost his life. (But) it was not an act of murder. It was not an act of manslaughter." The decision The jury had three choices: to find Zimmerman guilty of second-degree murder; to find him guilty of a lesser charge of manslaughter; or to find him not guilty. For second-degree murder, the jurors would have had to believe that Martin's unlawful killing was "done from ill will, hatred, spite or an evil intent" and would be "of such a nature that the act itself indicates an indifference to human life." What led jurors to this verdict? To convict Zimmerman of manslaughter, the jurors would have had to believe he "intentionally committed an act or acts that caused the death of Trayvon Martin." That charge could have carried a sentence of up to 30 years in prison, though the jury was not told of that possible sentence. Ultimately, they believed Zimmerman wasn't guilty of either charge. None of the jurors wanted to speak to the media after the verdict. A call for calm Both sides of the case asked for peace after the verdict. In the immediate aftermath, they appeared to have gotten their wish -- even though the Internet erupted with outrage. But now that Zimmerman is a free man, his defense and his brother fear for his safety. "He has to be very cautious and protective of his safety because there is still a fringe element who have said, at least in tweets and everything else, that they want revenge -- that they will not listen to a verdict of not guilty," defense attorney Mark O'Mara said. Anger, sadness but little surprise Robert Zimmerman Jr. said his brother "is going to be looking around his shoulder for the rest of his life." When asked if George Zimmerman will keep the gun he used to shoot Trayvon Martin, his brother said he has good reason to. "I think he has more reason now than ever to think that people are trying to kill him because they express they're trying to kill him, all the time, every day, on my Twitter feed, on the Internet," Robert Zimmerman told CNN's Piers Morgan. "He has always feared for his safety." But Crump said everyone should stay calm, especially for Martin's sake. "For Trayvon to rest in peace, we must all be peaceful." The race debate The trial may be over, but the race debate surrounding the case rages on. "The whole world was looking at this case for a reason ... We'd be intellectually dishonest if we didn't acknowledge the racial undertones in this case," Martin family attorney Benjamin Crump said. "So we have to have very responsible conversations about how we get better as a country and move forward from this tragedy and learn from it." Prosecutor Angela Corey said Martin was unfairly viewed as a criminal before he was shot. Analysis: The role that race played Amid the national debate about whether Zimmerman racially profiled Martin, defense attorney O'Mara suggested his client was actually profiled by critics. "I think things would have been different if George Zimmerman were black for this reason: He never would have been charged with a crime," O'Mara said. He said the country "absolutely" needs to have a conversation about whether young black males are treated differently in the criminal justice system -- but said that conversation is a separate topic from what happened the night Zimmerman and Martin met. Sports stars sound off on verdict Martin family attorney Natalie Jackson commended the millions of people who signed an online petition "not in an effort to persecute George Zimmerman, but in an effort to say a black 17-year-old child should be able to walk home from the store and not be shot." She said their efforts were not in vain. "I don't want them to be discouraged because I think they may have saved the life of another child," Jackson said. "I think that from now on, if there is someone who wants to follow someone with a gun, I think they'll think twice about it." The fateful night The deadly encounter took place on February 26, 2012, as Martin walked back to his father's fiancee's house through the rain from a Sanford convenience store. The 17-year-old was carrying Skittles and a drink. Zimmerman, a neighborhood watch volunteer, spotted him and called police. A 911 dispatcher told Zimmerman that officers were on the way and not to follow the allegedly suspicious person. But Zimmerman still got out of his car, later telling police he just wanted to get a definitive address to relay to authorities. Sometime after that, Zimmerman and Martin got into a physical altercation. Questions later arose about who was the aggressor, about whether Martin may have seen or reached for Zimmerman's gun, and about whether Zimmerman should have had more injuries if he was pummeled, as he claims. Prosecutors never accused Zimmerman, who identifies himself as Hispanic, of being racist. But they did argue that he wrongly and spitefully prejudged Martin as one of those "f***ing punks," as he's heard saying under his breath in his call to police. "The defendant didn't shoot Trayvon Martin because he had to," Assistant State Attorney John Guy said. "He shot him because he wanted to. That's the bottom line." The defense contended that Martin jumped out of some bushes and pounced on Zimmerman as he was walking back toward his car that night, then punched him and slammed his head repeatedly into the concrete sidewalk. Zimmerman's account of what happened the night of the shooting was a central part of the trial. He was the only living person who witnessed the entire incident, and there wasn't much physical evidence for either team to fall back on. What's next? The NAACP has called for the Justice Department to file civil rights charges against Zimmerman and urged the public to sign a petition to support the effort. Feds are asked to act "The most fundamental of civil rights -- the right to life -- was violated the night George Zimmerman stalked and then took the life of Trayvon Martin," the advocacy group said in a statement. O'Mara said if anyone tries to sue Zimmerman, "we will seek and we will get civil immunity in a civil hearing. And we will see just how many civil lawsuits have spawned from this fiasco." But for now, both families will reflect and try to move forward. "Trayvon Martin will forever remain in the annals of history next to Medgar Evers and Emmett Till as symbols for the fight for equal justice for all," Crump said. When asked what he has to say to Trayvon Martin's parents, Robert Zimmerman Jr. said he understands their pain. "There are no winners. They will not win or lose anything more than they already have lost, which is their son's life, by any kind of verdict for George," Robert Zimmerman said. "I applaud them for asking for the verdict to be respected. ... And I will pray for them."
By Nathan McDermott, CNN Updated 2:52 PM ET, Fri November 11, 2016 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. (CNN)Milwaukee County Sheriff David Clarke said in an interview Thursday he was open to serving in the Trump administration if a position was offered. It's incredible that our institutions of gov, WH, Congress, DOJ, and big media are corrupt & all we do is bitch. Pitchforks and torches time pic.twitter.com/8G5G0daGVN (CNN)Milwaukee County Sheriff David Clarke said in an interview Thursday he was open to serving in the Trump administration if a position was offered. It's incredible that our institutions of gov, WH, Congress, DOJ, and big media are corrupt & all we do is bitch. Pitchforks and torches time pic.twitter.com/8G5G0daGVN In an interview with radio host Joe Pags, Clarke was asked if he was expecting a role in Trump's White House. "I don't expect anything, I don't have an entitlement mentality," Clarke said. "I told Donald Trump I wanted to help him, because I thought that this country needed his leadership. That being said, if the President asks you to serve, you step up to fulfill that duty. So if he feels that I can help him and he calls on me, sure I'll accept it, but I'm not expecting anything." Clarke was a surrogate for Trump during the presidential campaign and is known for his tough on crime positions and unapologetically blunt comments. Clarke, who is African American, also made news during the campaign for his opposition to Black Lives Matter activists, whom he predicted would join forces with ISIS. BuzzFeed and Politico reported that Clarke is under consideration to become the next secretary of Homeland Security. Also in the interview, Clarke criticized activists who are protesting the election results, calling them anarchists who don't support the rule of law, though Clarke himself made news last month when he told supporters it was "pitchfork and torches time" in a tweet. "When Barack Obama won in '08 and when Barack Obama won in 2012, I was disappointed, as were a lot of people. We didn't take to the streets, we didn't riot, we didn't even protest," Clarke said.
Jennifer Gray is a meteorologist for CNN based in Atlanta at the network's global headquarters. Full Bio Jennifer Gray is a meteorologist for CNN based in Atlanta at the network's global headquarters and has earned the AMS Seal of Approval from the American Meteorology Society. Prior to joining CNN, Gray was the weekend morning show meteorologist and a feature reporter for WTVJ, the NBC affiliate in Miami, where she covered severe weather in the field and helped produce specials that focused on hurricane preparedness and safety. She co-hosted and co-produced 'Florida Insider Fishing Report' for Sun Sports and 'Beyond The Reef' in conjunction with the Guy Harvey Ocean Foundation, raising awareness of conservation issues facing the oceans and Florida's fisheries. Previously, Gray was a meteorologist for KTBS 3, the ABC affiliate in Shreveport, Louisiana; and KBTV 4, the NBC affiliate in Beaumont, Texas. During this time, she covered hurricanes, tornados, record heat waves, ice storms and flooding; and she reported from live events, including Super Bowl XLIV. Gray earned her bachelor's of science in geosciences, broadcast meteorology program from Mississippi State, and she earned her bachelor of arts in broadcast journalism from Northwestern State University in Louisiana.
By Ralph Ellis, Faith Karimi and Chris Lett, CNN Updated 8:32 PM ET, Mon September 21, 2015 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. San Antonio, Texas (CNN)The Army general who led the investigation into Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl's actions in Afghanistan testified Friday that jail time would be "inappropriate" for the soldier captured and held five years by the Taliban. CNN's Chris Lett reported from San Antonio, Texas. CNN's Faith Karami, Ashley Fantz, Martin Savidge, Ralph Ellis and Tristan Smith contributed to this report. San Antonio, Texas (CNN)The Army general who led the investigation into Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl's actions in Afghanistan testified Friday that jail time would be "inappropriate" for the soldier captured and held five years by the Taliban. CNN's Chris Lett reported from San Antonio, Texas. CNN's Faith Karami, Ashley Fantz, Martin Savidge, Ralph Ellis and Tristan Smith contributed to this report. Maj. Gen. Kenneth Dahl said he interviewed Bowe for a day and a half and "did not find any evidence to corroborate the reporting that Bergdahl was ... sympathetic to the Taliban." Instead, Dahl said, Bergdahl wanted to call attention to what he considered poor leadership of his unit. Bergdal believed that by leaving his observation post and running 23 kilometers (about 14 miles) to a nearby base he could cause a stir and gain access to a high-ranking officer to complain, Dahl said. Dahl testified at an Army Article 32 preliminary hearing held to determine whether Bergdahl will face a court-martial. If his case goes to court-martial and he is found guilty, Bergdahl faces a potential maximum penalty of life in prison. Bowe Bergdahl investigation leader says GI should not face jail time Bergdahl will not testify, defense attorney Eugene Fidell told the military court at Joint Base San Antonio. Bergdahl vanished in June 2009 after deserting his unit, authorities said. The incident set off a series of events that included his five-year capture by the Taliban. President Barack Obama later freed five members of the terror network held at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, in exchange for Bergdahl last year. As part of the controversial prisoner swap, Bergdahl returned to the United States. In March, the military charged him with desertion and misbehavior before the enemy. 'Unrealistic expectations of people' Dahl testified that he thought Bergdahl was "very bright and well-read." When asked what in Bergdahl's background might have caused his behavior in the military, Dahl said that the combination of growing up in rural Idaho on the "edge of the grid ... being home-schooled" and the fact that he "internalized a lot of what he read" resulted in him having "idealistic and unrealistic expectations of people." Though Bergdahl was not duty-bound to comply with the investigation, he did so and submitted to a day and a half interview. Bergdahl did not exercise his right to silence at the start of the interview, Dahl said. New Bergdahl letter outlines torture Dahl said he didn't "believe there is a jail sentence at the end of this process." The last witness from the Bergdhahl defense team was Terrence Russell, a civilian who works for the Department of Defense Joint Personnel Recovery Agency. Russell debriefed Bergdahl. Russell said Bergdahl experienced "horrific" conditions and that his "experience ranks in the same echelon of horrible conditions that we have not seen in 60 years," referring to troops held in Vietnam. He described Bergdhahl as "an army of one, he had to fight the enemy alone for 4 years 11 months. You cannot overestimate how difficult that is. " The hearing began Thursday, when government prosecutors called witnesses who represented Bergdahl's chain of command. His former platoon leader, Capt. John Paul Billings, recounted soldiers awakening him early to say Bergdahl was missing. "I didn't really know what to say. I was in shock, in absolute disbelief that I couldn't find one of my own men. It's a hard thing to swallow," Billings said, adding that a squad immediately went out to look for him. Read the statement and Bergdahl's letter On cross-examination, Billings said Bergdahl appeared to be completely normal the day before he disappeared, that he had been dedicated to the mission and had an outstanding record of performance. The defense asked the platoon leader whether he had been made aware that Bergdahl had a psychological discharge from the U.S. Coast Guard, or that Bergdahl "possessed a severe mental disease or defect?" Billings said he would have recommended Bergdahl to specialist care if he had known of any such mental issue. During the hearing, Berghdahl sat at a long table with his civilian and military defense attorneys. He spent much of the proceedings looking down as he took notes on a pad in his lap. Prisoner swap criticized Some in the military and those who fought alongside Bergdahl in Afghanistan blasted the prisoner swap deal. Obama has hailed Bergdahl's safe return to the United States. "Sgt. Bergdahl has missed birthdays and holidays and the simple moments with family and friends," the President said when the soldier returned. Bowe Bergdahl Fast Facts A court-martial would put the White House in a precarious situation. It has steadfastly defended the decision to recover Bergdahl amid backlash from Republicans and some who served with him in Afghanistan. At the time of his recovery, U.S. officials said Obama's national security team was unanimous in its support of the prisoner exchange that ultimately returned Bergdahl to the United States. Concerns about his physical health prompted them to circumvent a requirement to notify Congress about pending prisoner releases, authorities said at the time. Obama cited a "sacred rule" in attempting to rescue American servicemen and -women, no matter the circumstances surrounding their capture. "We still get an American soldier back if he's held in captivity. Period. Full stop. We don't condition that," he said at the time. Some members of Bergdahl's unit have accused him of purposely abandoning his post before being captured in remote Afghanistan. Some suggested the U.S. effort to rescue him was misguided. Allegations that he abandoned his post were well-known before his rescue became public, though they hadn't yet been subject to the type of Army investigation that followed his return. The White House has expressed no regret at the decision to swap the Idaho native with Taliban prisoners.
Eleni Giokos is CNNMoney Africa Correspondent, based in the network's Johannesburg bureau. Full Bio Eleni Giokos is CNNMoney Africa Correspondent, based in the network's Johannesburg bureau. Born in Greece and raised in South Africa, Giokos has a decade's experience working across TV, radio, print and online media. As a broadcaster she has interviewed a range of heads of state and business leaders, including South African President Jacob Zuma, former Nigerian President Goodluck Jonathan, Virgin founder Richard Branson, and IMF Managing Director Christine Lagarde, amongst others. Giokos began her career at CNBC Africa in 2005. She then became an anchor and correspondent at 24-hour news channel eNCA, covering business stories and breaking news -- including the killing of Reeva Steenkamp by Oscar Pistorius and the Westgate Mall attack. She has reported from key global events such as the World Economic Forum in Davos and the United Nations General Assembly. She has chaired debates at the World Economic Forum, International Monetary Fund, African Finance Corporation and the Africa CEO Forum. She has also contributed regularly to South Africa's Mail and Guardian newspaper, worked as a motivational speaker at public schools, and trained aspiring journalism students. Giokos has an Honors Degree in Journalism and Media Studies from the University of Witwatersrand, and is an International Monetary Fund Fellow -- selected to join the programme in 2014.
By Flora Charner, Euan McKirdy and Steve Almasy, CNN Updated 1:14 PM ET, Thu August 3, 2017 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds. Caracas, Venezuela (CNN)Venezuela's attorney general has initiated an investigation into potential voter fraud in Sunday's election following allegations the government may have inflated voter numbers significantly. CNN's Flora Charner reported from Caracas, while Euan McKirdy wrote from Hong Kong and Steve Almasy from Atlanta. CNN's Julia Jones, Daniel Silva Fernandez and Nicole Chavez contributed to this report. Caracas, Venezuela (CNN)Venezuela's attorney general has initiated an investigation into potential voter fraud in Sunday's election following allegations the government may have inflated voter numbers significantly. CNN's Flora Charner reported from Caracas, while Euan McKirdy wrote from Hong Kong and Steve Almasy from Atlanta. CNN's Julia Jones, Daniel Silva Fernandez and Nicole Chavez contributed to this report. Luisa Ortega Diaz, in an interview Wednesday to CNN en Espaol, said she has appointed two prosecutors to investigate the directors of the National Electoral Council "for this very scandalous act that could generate more violence in the country than what we have already experienced." Venezuelan President Nicols Maduro called for last weekend's vote, which led to the creation of a controversial new legislative body, the National Constituent Assembly. The body takes the place of the opposition-led National Assembly in a move that critics fear will erode democracy. London-based Smartmatic, which provided the voting technology for the controversial vote, said Wednesday that the National Electoral Council voting numbers of more than 8 million people -- about 41.53% of registered voters -- are off by 1 million votes. The opposition had boycotted the election, calling it fraudulent, and said the National Constituent Assembly will have the power to rewrite the Venezuelan Constitution. "It's very serious, I believe we have to investigate and determine who is at fault," said Ortega, a vocal critic of Maduro's government. "Probably, voter data doesn't even match half of it (voter turnout)." She called the formation of the new assembly a "significant event" and said the body has no oversight. "They can do all they want. We are going to have a legislative body with super powers," Ortega said. "It's important for the country to know the reach of this fraud and if it constitutes a crime." Turnout figures 'tampered with' At a press conference Wednesday in London, Smartmatic CEO Antonio Mugica said the turnout figures had been "tampered with." "Based on the robustness of our system, we know, without any doubt, that the turnout of the recent election for a National Constituent Assembly was manipulated," he said. Maduro disputed the assertion Wednesday. "The stupid president of Smartmatic, under pressure from the United States and the United Kingdom, now says only 7.5 million people voted," he said. "I say it was more than 10 million." The attorney general also said her office is considering reaching out to international organizations if it determines that crimes against humanity were committed. The newly elected Venezuelan legislative body will meet for the first time Friday morning, Maduro said in a speech broadcast nationwide. Virtually all the new body's 545 members are supporters of the leftist leader. Opposition groups -- as well as supporters of the government -- said they would march on Friday. More than 350 members of the new assembly were elected in open municipal votes. The remaining members were elected by people from certain social and industry groups such as students, pensioners or workers. Maduro also announced he had named Jorge Arreaza, a former vice president, as foreign minister. Samuel Moncada, who was foreign minister, will become Venezuela's representative to the Organization of American States. OAS to discuss 'illegitimate electoral acts' On Wednesday night, Luis Almagro, secretary-general of the OAS, called for an emergency council meeting regarding "the aggravation of the crisis in Venezuela." Almagro cited "illegitimate electoral acts for the installation of a Constituent Assembly, as well as electoral fraud of more than 1 million votes," arguing that Venezuela is infringing on two articles of the Inter-American Democratic Charter. The meeting is to take place this weekend. Opposition-held referendum In a nonbinding July 16 referendum organized by opposition parties, an overwhelming majority of voters came out against Maduro's plan. The referendum asked voters three yes-no questions. More than 98% chose to reject the proposed constitutional assembly, request the military defend the existing constitution and support fresh elections before Maduro's term ends in 2019. About 7 million Venezuelans voted in that referendum -- 37% of the country's electorate. Attorney general: Why I became a critic In her CNN en Espaol interview, Ortega spoke for the first time about the events that led her to become a vocal critic of the Venezuelan government after years of being a staunch Chavista. She told Fernando del Rincon that the political, social, and institutional crisis in the country were reason enough but said she was also motivated by the kidnapping of her daughter and grandson as well as continuous attacks at her workplace. She said that, while attending a meeting of regional attorneys general, her daughter and grandson were abducted and that she experienced "permanent persecution, the siege to the ... attorney general's office, my house, the house of my relatives has been permanent in recent months." She said she has been consistent in her political views, while others in government have changed theirs. "My position has always been the same, for five, 10 years, two years," Ortega said. "I continue to act in the same way. I believe that those who have to check themselves are others."
Alisyn Camerota is a CNN anchor and co-host on CNN's morning show "New Day" with Chris Cuomo. Full Bio During her tenure at CNN, Camerota has covered breaking news stories on the ground both internationally and domestically, including the Paris and Brussels terror attacks, the tragic South Carolina church shooting, and the Pulse nightclub shooting in Orlando, FL. Additionally, she has been in the forefront of CNN's coverage of the 2016 elections, conducting news-making interviews with the Democratic and Republican nominees and many of the primary candidates. Outside of her role on New Day, Camerota has anchored primetime specials, including "Sexual Assault on Campus," a panel discussion on the epidemic of sexual assaults on college campuses, and "The Cosby Show: A Legend Under Fire," a one hour conversation with the comedian's alleged victims. Prior to joining CNN, Camerota served as co-host of America's News Headquarters on Fox News Channel for 16 years. Before that, she co-anchored Fox & Friends Weekend and contributed to the Fox & Friends weekday franchise where she covered the gamut of hard news and human interest stories. Camerota was live on the air as the Iraq War began, when the space shuttle Columbia exploded, and countless other breaking news events. Alisyn is married and lives in New York area with her three children.
